Electricity in buildings
CIBSE Guide K
The rights of publication or translation are reserved.

No part of this publication may be reproduced, stored in a retrieval system or transmitted in any form or by any means without the prior permission of the Institution.

© January 2004 The Chartered Institution of Building Services Engineers London
Registered charity number 278104
ISBN 1 903287 26 X
This document is based on the best knowledge available at the time of publication. However no responsibility of any kind for any injury, death, loss, damage or delay however caused resulting from the use of these recommendations can be accepted by the Chartered Institution of Building Services Engineers, the authors or others involved in its publication.

In adopting these recommendations for use each adopter by doing so agrees to accept full responsibility for any personal injury, death, loss, damage or delay arising out of or in connection with their use by or on behalf of such adopter irrespective of the cause or reason therefore and agrees to defend, indemnify and hold harmless the Chartered
Institution of Building Services Engineers, the authors and others involved in their publication from any and all liability arising out of or in connection with such use as aforesaid and irrespective of any negligence on the part of those indemnified.

Typeset by CIBSE Publications
Printed in Great Britain by Page Bros. (Norwich) Ltd., Norwich, Norfolk NR6 6SA
Note from the publisher
This publication is primarily intended to provide guidance to those responsible for the design, installation, commissioning, operation and maintenance of building services. It is not intended to be exhaustive or definitive and it will be necessary for users of the guidance given to exercise their own professional judgement when deciding whether to abide by or depart from it.

Foreword
The publication of CIBSE Guide K: Electricity in buildings fills a significant gap in the range of publications produced by the CIBSE.

Work on the Guide has been carried out intermittently for more than 14 years. I wish to express my thanks to all those who have contributed their time and knowledge both under, and prior to, my Chairmanship.

Guide K is not intended as a textbook for those wishing to learn electrical engineering but rather as a reference source for engineers, architects, surveyors and other professionals who requires easy access to the information contained therein.

Similarly, it is not intended that this Guide should be read from beginning to end in one go. Instead, the reader should dip into the relevant section that is of particular interest in respect of the project in hand.

Whilst the authors and contributors have tried to produce a document that will prove to be a valuable source of reference and guidance, it is inevitable that some users will find areas that they consider should include further information. Constructive criticism and comment is welcomed in order to improve and extend the document.

Finally I wish to thank the staff of the CIBSE Publications Department and the members of the Guide K Steering Committee for their valuable assistance in the publication of the Guide.

Richard Cleaver
Chairman, CIBSE Guide K Steering Committee
Guide K Task Group
Richard Cleaver (Chairman) (Ridge)
Ian Bitterlin (Emerson Network Power Ltd)
Roger Cunnings (Zisman Bowyer & Partners)
Jeff Dobson (G K Salter & Associates)
Alwyn Finney (ERA Technology Ltd)
Mick Geeson (N G Bailey & Co Ltd)
Ian Harrison (H I Associates & Co)
John Hewitt (Arup R+D)
Kevin Kelly (ABB Durham Switchgear Ltd)
Anthony Lo Pinto (Jaros Baum & Bolles)
Howard Porter (Arup R+D)
Roy Waknell (Power Systems Design Ltd)
Principal authors and contributors
Section 1: Introduction
Principal author
Richard Cleaver (Ridge)
Section 2: Legislation and standards
Principal authors
John Hewitt (Arup R+D)
Section 3: Load assessment
Principal author
Anthony Lo Pinto (Jaros Baum & Bolles)
Section 4: Power supplies
Principal authors
Richard Cleaver (Ridge)
Roger Cunnings (Zisman Bowyer & Partners)
Section 5: High voltage switchgear and distribution Principal authors
Ian Bitterlin (Emerson Network Power Ltd)
Richard Cleaver (Ridge)
Section 6: Transformers
Principal authors
Kevin Kelly (ABB Durham Switchgear Ltd)
Richard Cleaver (Ridge)
Section 7: Low voltage switchgear and distribution Principal author
Ian Pegrum (Faber Maunsell plc)
Section 8: Building wiring systems
Principal author
Howard Porter (Arup R+D)
Section 9: Uninterruptible power supplies
Principal authors
Ian Bitterlin (Emerson Network Power Ltd)
Jeff Dobson (G K Salter & Associates)
Ian Harrison (H I Associates & Co)
Section 10: Earthing
Principal author
Roy Waknell (Power Systems Design Ltd)
Section 11: Electromagnetic compatibility
Principal author
Alwyn Finney (ERA Technology Ltd)
Section 12: Inspection, testing, operation and maintenance Principal author
Mick Geeson (N G Bailey & Co Ltd)
Editor
Ken Butcher
CIBSE Project Manager
Alan C Watson
CIBSE Publishing Manager
Jacqueline Balian
Contents
1


Introduction

1-1

1.1
General
1-1
1.2
Purpose of the Guide
1-1
1.3
Contents of the Guide
1-1
1.4
Voltage definitions
1-2
1.5
Other sources of information
1-2
References
1-2
2
Legislation and standards
2-1
2.1


Introduction to acts and legislation

2-1

2.2
British (BS), European (BS EN), International (ISO) and 2-1
International Electrotechnical Committee (IEC) standards 2.3
The Building Regulations 2000 and the Building Standards 2-1
(Scotland) Regulations 1990
2.4
Regulations enforced by DTI
2-2
2.5
The Health and Safety at Work etc. Act 1974
2-2
2.6
The Electrocompatibility Regulations 1992, European
2-3
Harmonisation Directives and other European Directives References
2-3
3
Load assessment
3-1
3.1


Introduction

3-1

3.2
Definitions
3-1
3.3
Load assessment
3-2
3.4
Load calculations
3-3
3.5
Harmonics
3-3
3.6
Codes and standards
3-4
3.7
Diversity and demand
3-4
References
3-5
4
Power supplies
4-1
4.1
Off-site supplies
4-1
4.2
On-site power generation
4-3
References
4-11
Bibliography
4-11
5
High voltage distribution
5-1
5.1


Introduction

5-1

5.2
Standards
5-1
5.3
Typical operating voltages
5-1
5.4
HV system design
5-2
5.5
HV switchgear
5-6
5.6
System protection
5-9
5.7
HV cables
5-14
5.8
Safety aspects
5-15
5.9
Operation and maintenance
5-17
References
5-18
6
Transformers
6-1
6.1


Introduction

6-1

6.2
Fundamental principles of transformers
6-1
6.3
Basis of construction and operation
6-2
6.4
Transformer specification
6-2
6.5
Noise levels and means of abatement
6-8
References
6-8
7
Low voltage switchgear and distribution
7-1
7.1
Principles of low voltage distribution
7-1
7.2
Low voltage equipment
7-1
7.3
Equipment selection
7-5
7.4
Protection and control/metering
7-7
7.5
Testing and commissioning
7-10
References
7-10
8
Building wiring systems
8-1
8.1


Introduction

8-1

8.2
Symbols, abbreviations and definitions
8-1
8.3
Circuit types
8-1
8.4
Power cables
8-4
8.5
Cable installation, termination and jointing
8-10
8.6
High voltage installations
8-12
8.7
Containment systems
8-13
8.8
Cable support systems
8-15
8.9
Busbar trunking systems
8-16
8.10
Prefabricated wiring systems
8-17
8.11
Emergency and life safety systems
8-18
8.12
Cable routes within the building
8-18
8.13
Installations in particular building types
8-19
8.14
Hazardous areas
8-19
8.15
Mains signalling
8-20
8.16
Electronic compatibility
8-20
8.17
Earthing
8-20
8.18
Testing and inspection
8-21
8.19
Guidance for designers and specifiers
8-22
References
8-23
Bibliography
8-24
9
Uninterruptible power supplies
9-1
9.1


Introduction

9-1

9.2
Basic types of UPS system
9-1
9.3
System selection
9-7
9.4
Bypass arrangements
9-12
9.5
Normal supply considerations
9-12
9.6
UPS supply considerations
9-13
9.7
Site generated supplies
9-14
9.8
Environmental conditions
9-14
9.9
Battery/stored energy selection
9-15
9.10
UPS installation
9-23
9.11
UPS testing and commissioning
9-23
9.12
Operation and maintenance
9-25
References
9-27
10
Earthing
10-1
10.1


Introduction

10-1

10.2
Statutory requirements, standards and definitions
10-1
10.3
Design principles
10-1
10.4
Calculation methods
10-9
10.5
Special requirements
10-11
10.6
Testing
10-13
References
10-14
11
Electromagnetic compatibility
11-1
11.1


Introduction

11-1

11.2
EMC Directive and UK legal obligations
11-1
11.3
Responsibilities for EMC compliance
11-4
11.4
EMC requirements as part of the project brief
11-4
11.5
Construction management plans
11-6
11.6
Good design practices
11-6
11.7
Hazards of non-ionising radiation
11-9
11.8
Effect of the external EM environment
11-9
11.9
Effect of new technologies on maintaining compliance 11-10
References
11-12
12
Inspection, testing, operation and maintenance
12-1
12.1 Introduction
12-1
12.2
Scope
12-1
12.3
Safety
12-1
12.4
Initial verification
12-1
12.5
Periodic inspection and test
12-6
12.6
Certification
12-7
12.7
Operation and maintenance procedures
12-7
12.8
Test instruments
12-8
References
12-8
1-1
1


Introduction

1.1
General
1.3.4
Section 4: Power supplies
The CIBSE has a large number of members who are
Section 4 discusses the external power supplies provided involved in electrical services but its only publication by the regional electricity companies, both at high voltage covering the mainstream of electrical building services has and low voltage. The section also discusses alternative been CIBSE Guide B10, withdrawn some years ago.

sources of supply.

CIBSE Guide K: Electricity in buildings has been produced to fill the gap for electrical knowledge related to building 1.3.5
Section 5: High voltage
services systems.

switchgear and distribution
This section examines different types of circuits and the 1.2
Purpose of the Guide
available types of high voltage switchgear, and discusses the options for the selection and erection of different types of equipment. The section discusses types of cabling and It is intended that this Guide will be used in conjunction fault level protection in electrical systems.

with established codes to provide guidance to practitioners. It will also be of interest to designers and authorities who, whilst not directly concerned with the design or 1.3.6
Section 6: Transformers
installation of electrical systems, need to understand the advice offered to them by specialists. Furthermore, the Section 6 examines different types of power transformers Guide should be of value to students embarking on a
and discusses the options available for the selection and career in electrical or building services engineering and erection of equipment.

those already practising in these disciplines who wish to enhance their knowledge through a programmed of
continuing professional development.

1.3.7
Section 7: Low voltage
switchgear and distribution
1.3
Contents of the Guide
Section 7 examines the various types of low voltage
switchgear and the forms of switchgear construction. The section also considers protection, metering and sub-1.3.1
Section 1: Introduction
station arrangements.

Section 1 discusses the purpose and scope of the Guide and provides an overview of its structure and contents.

1.3.8
Section 8: Building wiring
systems
1.3.2
Section 2: Legislation and
This section examines the various types of wiring systems standards
in use for final wiring circuits and other electrical applications. The section discusses the construction and This section defines the current legislation relating to use of various types of cables. Part of the section is devoted electrical services and identifies the British and European to considering the opportunities for prefabrication of Standards that are used in the design and installation of wiring systems.

electrical installations.

1.3.9
Section 9: Uninterruptible
1.3.3
Section 3: Load assessment
power supplies
This section considers methods of assessing electrical loads within buildings as a prerequisite to carrying out This section describes the different types of UPS systems design and to defining the size of the incoming supply.

available and gives guidance on the selection of the most This section also gives consideration to the effect of load appropriate equipment for the required application. The assessment on the supply arrangements with regional
section also includes a consideration of the different types electricity companies.

of batteries available for use in UPS systems.

1-2
Electricity in buildings
1.3.10
Section 10: Earthing and
doing so, providing evidence for the safety of an
installation. This section details types of certification and bonding
reports, and the contents of those documents.

Earthing and bonding is an essential part of any electrical Section 12 also considers the need for operation and system and this section considers the requirements for the maintenance (O&M) manuals and the prescribed contents selection and erection of equipment to ensure electrical of such manuals, together with reference to types of safety within buildings. The section includes discussion maintenance and maintenance procedures.

on the provision of lightning protection to buildings.

1.3.11
Section 11: Electromagnetic
1.4
Voltage definitions
compatibility
The voltage definitions used throughout this document This section examines various forms of electrical inter-are those defined in BS 7671(1). These are as follows: ference within the working environment and discusses
—
extra-low voltage (ELV): normally not exceeding methods for minimising the effects of this.

50 V AC or 120 V DC whether between conductors
or to earth
This section examines the need for electromagnetic
—
low voltage (
compatibility and defines the various types of electrical LV): normally exceeding extra-low
voltage but not exceeding 1000 V AC or 1500 V DC
interference that can occur. The section provides guidance between conductors, or 600 V AC or 900 V DC
on the elimination of electrical interference within between conductors and earth
buildings.

—
high voltage (HV): normally exceeding low voltage.

1.3.12
Section 12: Inspection, testing,
operation and maintenance
1.5
Other sources of
Many construction projects involve the remodelling or information
refurbishment of buildings without the extensive
installation of new services. This section considers the It is hoped that this Guide will provide an invaluable issues involved in the inspection and testing of existing reference source for those involved in the design, instal-installations both prior to alteration and as a periodic lation, commissioning, operation and maintenance of
maintenance function during the life of the building. The buildings when considering electrical services. However, it section also considers the day-to-day operation of
does not claim to be exhaustive. The various sections electrical equipment and the maintenance required to contained many references to other sources of infor-ensure safe operation.

mation, particularly British Standards and associated standards and codes of practice, all of which should be The inspection, testing and verification of an installation carefully consulted in conjunction with this Guide,
is essential in confirming both its safety and operation.

together with relevant trade and professional publications.

Section 12 looks at the initial verification of a new installation and the requirements for periodic inspection References
of existing installations. Reference is made to both BS 7671(1) and IEE Guidance Note 3: Inspection and 1
BS 7671: 2001: Requirements for electrical installations. IEE
testing(2).

Wiring Regulations. Sixteenth edition (London: British Standards Institution) (2001)
In carrying out either of these activities, the correct use of 2
Inspection and testing IEE Guidance Note 3 (London: Institution certification is necessary to comply with BS 7671 and, in of Electrical Engineers) (2002)
2-1
2
Legislation and standards
2.1


Introduction to acts and

boundary between consumer and professional electrical legislation
equipment is non-determinable and these Regulations
have a wider impact than just consumer equipment.

The general installation and use of electricity in the UK is Other legislation is enforced by the Department of Trade governed by various acts and regulations. These include and Industry (DTI) such as the Utilities Act 2000 and the the following:
Electricity Act 1989 together with the Electricity Safety
—
The Health and Safety at Work etc. Act 1974(1)
Quality and Continuity Regulations 2002.

—
The Electricity Act 1989(2)
—
The Utilities Act 2000(3)
2.2
British (BS), European (BS
—
The Electricity at Work Regulations 1989(4)
EN), International (ISO)
—
The Building Standards (Scotland) Regulations
1990(5) (Technical Standards(6) Part N)
and International Electro-
—
The Electromagnetic Compatibility Regulations
technical Committee (IEC)
1992(7)
Standards
—
The Management of Health and Safety at Work
Regulations 1999(8)
There are many standards relevant to electrical equipment
—
The Building Regulations 2000(9) (Parts L and P)
and some are in the process of revision. Readers should refer to the British Standards Institution for the latest
—
The Electricity (Standards of Performance)
Regulations 2001(10)
requirements (http://bsonline.techindex.co.uk).

—
The Electricity Safety, Quality and Continuity
Regulations 2002(11)
2.2.1
BS 7671: 2001
In addition to the above, many other regulations direct BS 7671: 2001: Requirements for electrical installations(19) general safe working practices and have an impact on the (previously referred to as the IEE Wiring Regulations) is, in installation and use of electricity. These include:
itself, not a statutory requirement but is primarily a design
—
Various construction regulations including the
standard.

Construction (Design and Management)
Regulations 1994(12) (under review)
Meeting this standard will ensure that the installation is installed, tested and maintained at a safe standard. It
—
Health and Safety (Safety Signs and Signals)
Regulations 1996(13)
applies to systems known as low voltage, i.e. up to
1000 V AC. Any person involved with installation, testing
—
The Provision and Use of Work Equipment
and maintenance of low voltage systems must be
Regulations 1998(14).

thoroughly familiar and well practiced in its interpreta-
—
The Control of Substances Hazardous to Health
tion and application. Various bodies such as the Electricity Regulations 2002(15)
Contractors Association (ECA) and the National
Inspection Council for Electrical Installation Contracting There are many more items of legislation regulating the (NICEIC) offer accreditations for suitably qualified way electricity is generated, distributed, operated, main-persons.

tained and used. Much of the legislation is aimed at health and safety and those regulations made under the Health and Safety at Work etc. Act 1974 are enforced by the 2.3
Building Regulations 2000 and
Health and Safety Executive (HSE).

the Building Standards (Scotland)
Regulations 1990
Other regulations such as Occupiers Liability Acts (1957
and 1984)(16) make the occupier of premises responsible in common law for the safety of all occupants and visitors, Under Part P of the Building Regulations 2000(9), compli-even those intent on criminal activity.

ance with BS 7671(19) has become compulsory for new
domestic buildings in England and Wales. In Scotland The Electrical Equipment (Safety) Regulations 1994(17) are this Standard has been legally binding for a number of primarily aimed at consumer equipment being made
years under The Building Standards (Scotland)
under the Consumer Protection Act 1987(18). However the Regulations 1990(5) (Technical Standards Part N(6)).

2-2
Electricity in buildings
In order to approve the standard of completed work on all clear message ‘Danger of Death’ and accompanied by a but minor alterations in England and Wales the person pictogram showing the electrical flash and a falling carrying out the work must have proof of competence in person.

the form of an accreditation. Alternatively the local building inspector can be engaged to check compliance with BS 7671.

2.5
The Health and Safety at
The Building Regulations 2000 (Part L in England and Work etc. Act 1974
Wales) impacts of the use of energy in commercial and domestic buildings and requires effective energy management with the objective being energy conservation.

The Health and Safety at Work etc. Act 1974(1) places obligations on management and employees to operate in a safe manner and to co-operate to ensure safety standards.

It is policed by the Health and Safety Executive. The Act 2.4
Regulations enforced
controls all risks and ensures good health at work and by DTI
standards of welfare. It is an enabling Act and has enabled the formulation of regulations such as the Electricity at Work Regulations 1989.

The Electricity Act 1988(2) and the Utilities Act 2000(3) determine the way in which the generation and distri-Breach of the Act is a criminal offence and fines of up to bution of electricity are structured and regulated in the
£20 000 can be imposed by magistrates plus up to six UK. In England, Wales and Scotland the industry is
months’ imprisonment. A Crown Court can impose
regulated for the DTI by the Office of Gas and Electricity Markets (OFGEM). A similar body exists in Northern
unlimited fines and up to 2 years’ imprisonment.

Ireland under a statutory order.

Section 2 of the Act places stringent duties on employers Amongst other requirements is the need for generation and Section 3 places similar duties on contractors and and distribution companies to operate under licence
other not in employment. Section 4 controls the safety of conditions. The Act deals with financial issues and
premises. Sections 7 and 8 relate to employees.

metering, conditions for re-sale of electricity, complaints and the right of customers to certain information relating to their supply of electricity. They also oblige suppliers to 2.5.1
The Electricity at Work
utilise renewable energy.

Regulations 1989
The Electricity (Standards of Performance) Regulations The Electricity at Work Regulations(4) place responsibil-2001(10) have laid down performance standards, many of ities on ‘duty holders’ to ensure that safety is maintained which are reflected in the standard licence conditions at all times. Duty holders are defined as anyone who has a under which the companies operate. Speed of response to duty under the Regulations. Duty holders can be
requests for supplies and alterations, the cost of alter-directors, company secretaries, management and
ations, the use of system charges are all determined by employees with responsibilities for the interpretation and reference to these requirements. Some of these are soon to maintenance of safety standards to do with the
be revised.

installation, appliances, work procedures and other
As well as controlling standards of continuity and quality elements.

(e.g. voltage and frequency limits), the Electricity Safety, Quality and Continuity Regulations 2002(11) also control Regulation 4 governs safe working practices and regulation the safety of distribution equipment including cables and 5 governs the system hardware and all equipment in use or lines. It was originally intended that these Regulations available for use. Of particular interest are:
would control distribution systems outdoors with BS
—
Regulation 13 enforces safe working practices to be
7671(19) being the design standard mainly for indoor implemented before work can commence on any
supplies. However they strictly apply only to systems equipment made dead. It also enforces safe
operated by ‘distributors’ (i.e. those who distribute working procedures in making the equipment
electricity to another customer). In the modern world of dead and the HSE’s Memorandum of Guidance on
multi-occupancy these Regulations are applying to a
the Electricity at Work Regulations 1989(22) stipulates greater number of distribution systems than they would that any equipment over 3000 volts, or complex
have done a few years ago.

equipment at any voltage, must be covered by
The position and height of overhead cables are strictly house rules or other written procedures. This rule
regulated but the depth of cable significantly must be at a is seen to enforce the need for mandatory company
‘suitable depth’. Underground cables must be protected, safety rules and procedures and specific step-by-clearly marked and recorded on maps.

step guides such as ‘switching’ or ‘safety’
programmes.

These Regulations protect the public from dangers within
—
Regulation 14 is a three-part strict and absolute
substations. Because of public perception relating danger requirement before any work can be carried out
to voltage levels, the Regulations have abandoned
live.

‘Danger’ signs relating to voltage and now enforce the use of a yellow sign, complying with the Health and Safety
—
Regulation 16 covers the need for competency and
(Safety Signs and Signals) Regulations 1996(13), stating the effective supervision.

Legislation and standards
2-3
2.5.2
Management of Health and
Most of these framework and individual directives are Safety at Work Regulations 1999
made to establish a common European market where
goods and services can be prepared in one nation and sold and various construction
or deployed in another. Thereby equipment will work
Regulations
anywhere in Europe.

Also under the umbrella of the Health and Safety at Work Certain UK regulations have reflected this common
etc. Act 1974(1) are the Management of Health and Safety ground in UK law, for instance the Management of Health at Work Regulations 1999(8) (MHSWR) and various
and Safety at Work Regulations 1999(8) (as did their 1992
construction regulations including the Construction
predecessor) enforce safety standards where the UK was (Design and Management) Regulations 1994(12) (CDM)
deemed to fall short.

(soon to be completely revised).

The Low Voltage Directive(24) enforces a common (low) The MHSWR require risk assessments to be made for
voltage across Europe. In the UK this is currently stated every aspect of the work and these must be written down if as 230 V/400 V +10% / –6%, enforced by the Electricity five or more people are employed. They also require safe Safety, Quality and Continuity Regulations(11).

working practices to eliminate the dangers identified. A new requirement under the 1999 version of the MHSWR
The Electromagnetic Compatibility Regulations 1992(7) is regulation 8(b) which prohibits persons from rooms that seek to impose standards by which one piece of equipment contain dangers (e.g. plant rooms and substations) unless will not interfere with another. Electromagnetic compati-they have adequate knowledge and training to avoid
bility is considered in detail in section 11 of this Guide.

danger. This means that such rooms must remain locked with access restricted to those deemed to be competent.

Compliance with the Harmonisation Directives and
The Regulations were introduced in 1992 and were
regulations enables the attachment of the ‘CE’ label to heavily revised in 1999 to enable the UK to comply with show that the equipment is suitable for use across Europe.

various European Directives affecting safety, health and welfare.

The CDM Regulations are particularly stringent govern-References
ing the management of construction works, including
1
The Health and Safety at Work etc. Act 1974 (London: Her works on electrical plant and mains.

Majesty’s Stationery Office) (1974)
2
The Electricity Act 1989 (London: Her Majesty’s Stationery 2.5.3
Other miscellaneous regulations
Office) (1989)
3
The Electricity at Work Regulations 1989 Statutory Instrument Other sets of regulations include the Control of
1989 No. 635 (London: Her Majesty’s Stationery Office) (1989) Substances Hazardous to Health Regulations 2002(15), 4
The Building Standards (Scotland) Regulations 1990 Statutory impacting on the use of substances such as mineral switch Instruments 1990 No. 2179 (S. 187) (London: Her Majesty’s oil, PCBs, SF6 gas and other potentially hazardous
Stationery Office) (1990)
substances. The Control of Asbestos at Work Regulations 2002(20) and The Control of Lead at Work Regulations 5
Technical standards for compliance with the Building Standards 2002(21) and their associated licensing conditions may also (Scotland) Regulations 1990 (as amended) (London: The be appropriate. The Provision and Use of Work
Stationery Office) (2001)
Equipment Regulations 1998(14)
ensure that such
6
The Electromagnetic Compatibility Regulations 1992 Statutory equipment is suitable for the task and well maintained.

Instruments 1992 No. 2372 (London Her Majesty’s Stationery The Confined Spaces Regulations 1997(23) may also apply.

Office) (1992)
7
The Management of Health and Safety at Work Regulations 1999 Statutory Instruments 1999 No. 3242 (London: The 2.6
The Electromagnetic
Stationery Office) (1999)
8
The Building Regulations 2000 Statutory Instruments 2000 No.

Compatibility Regulations
2531 (London: The Stationery Office) (2000)
1992, European Harmon
9
The Electricity (Standards of Performance) Regulations 2001
isation Directives and
Statutory Instruments 2001 No. 3265 (London: The Stationery Office) (2002)
other European Directives
10
The Utilities Act 2000 (London: The Stationery Office) (2000) Directives are issued by the EC legislature and the UK is 11
The Electricity Safety, Quality and Continuity Regulations obliged to comply with their requirements. Central to the 2002 Statutory Instruments 2002 No. 2665 (London: The Stationery Office) (2002)
Directives are:
12
The Control of Substances Hazardous to Health Regulations
—
to ensure a common standard of safety at work
2002 Statutory Instruments 2002 No. 2677 (London: The across the European Community
Stationery Office) (2002)
—
by harmonisation of delivery (e.g. voltage
13
The Construction (Design and Management) Regulations 1994
standards) and equipment, to enable equipment to
Statutory Instruments 1994 No. 3140 (London: Her Majesty’s be used across the European Community.

Stationery Office) (1995)
2-4
Electricity in buildings
14
The Health and Safety (Safety Signs and Signals) Regulations 20
Control of Asbestos at Work Regulations 2002 Statutory 1996 Statutory Instruments 1996 No. 341 (London: Her Instruments 2002 No. 2675 (London: The Stationery Office) Majesty’s Stationery Office) (1996)
(2002)
15
The Provision and Use of Work Equipment Regulations 1998
21
The Control of Lead at Work Regulations 2002 Statutory Statutory Instruments 1998 No. 2306 (London: The Stationery Instruments 2002 No. 2676 (London: The Stationery Office) Office) (1998)
(2002)
16
Occupiers Liability Act 1957 and Occupiers Liability Act 1984
22
Memorandum of Guidance on the Electricity at Work Regulations (London: Her Majesty’s Stationery Office) (1957/1984) 1989 Health and Safety Executive HS(R)25 (London: Her Majesty’s Stationery Office) (1998)
17
The Electrical Equipment (Safety) Regulations 1994 Statutory Instruments 1994 No. 3260 (London: Her Majesty’s Stationery 23
The Confined Spaces Regulations 1997 Statutory Instruments 1997 No. 1713 (London: The Stationery Office) (1997) Office) (1994)
24
Directive 73/23/EEC of the European Council of 19 February 18
The Consumer Protection Act 1987 (London: Her Majesty’s 1973 on the harmonisation of the laws of Member States Stationery Office) (1987)
relating to Electrical Equipment designed for use within 19
BS 7671: 2001: Requirements for electrical installations. IEE
certain voltage limits Official J. of the European Communities Wiring Regulations. Sixteenth edition (London: British Standards 26.03.1973 L77/29 (Brussels: Commission of the European Institution) (2001)
Communities) (March 1973)
3-1
3
Load assessment
3.1


Introduction

3.2.2
Apparent power
Modern buildings contain an increasing amount of
Apparent power is the product of RMS voltage and current, electrical apparatus. This technological explosion is expressed in volt-amperes, and is calculated as follows.

increasing the demand for electrical power to support the For single-phase:
equipment which has become an integral part of the way people conduct business. This section outlines the basic AP = V I
(3.3)
items for consideration when evaluating the electrical load for a commercial building. Operating load requirements For three-phase:
must be estimated realistically if a properly engineered electrical distribution system is to be achieved.

AP = V
I √3
(3.4)
(ph–ph)
Detailed information about the equipment to be installed where AP is the apparent power (volt-ampere).

in a building, whatever its intended use, is unlikely to be This is often the basis for rating the electrical require-available at the early planning stages.

ment. This traditional definition is based upon sinusoidal waveforms. For non-sinusoidal waveforms other charac-In order for planning to proceed, utility companies to be teristics of the voltage and current wave shape may need to contacted and decisions to be taken so as to enable major be considered when rating equipment. For example, the elements of plant and service equipment to be specified, peak voltage levels or current levels may be considerably the design engineer must be able to confidently produce higher than those for a sinusoid of the same RMS value.

load estimates. These estimates should be based upon These voltages and currents can contribute to excessive experience and a broad database of actual operating loads insulation stress, thermal stress etc.

for similar projects.

3.2.3
Connected load
3.2
Definitions
The sum of all the loads connected to the electrical system; usually expressed in watts.

3.2.1
Active power (useful power)
3.2.4
Demand factor
Active power, also known as real power, is the time average This is the factor applied to the connected load of an of instantaneous power when the average is taken over a installation to assess the maximum demand value. This complete cycle of an AC waveform. This is expressed in will take account of the fact that not all installed watts (W).

equipment is used at full load or at all times. The demand factor is always less than or equal to unity, and is given by: The active power when the voltage and current waveforms are sinusoidal can be calculated by the following.

Maximum demand
Demand factor = ————————
(3.5)
For single phase:
Connected load
P = V I cos φ
(3.1)
3.2.5
Load factor
where P is the active power (W), V is the voltage (V), I is the current (A), φ is the angular displacement between the Load factor is the ratio of the average demand to the maximum demand over a defined interval. In most
voltage and current waveforms and is known as the power commercial office buildings, for example between the factor angle; cos φ is known as the power factor.

hours of 09:00 to 18:00 the load factor is usually close to unity. A typical load profile for a commercial office For balanced three-phase:
building is graphically represented in Figure 3.1.

P = √3 V
I cos φ
(3.2)
(ph–ph)
The maximum demand, or demand load, is the actual
operating load (in kW) of a system. The demand load may where V
is the phase-to-phase voltage (V).

(ph–ph)
be measured using a wattmeter or calculated by multi-
3-2
Electricity in buildings
100
Figure 3.1 Typical load profile
for an office building
80
60
40
Approximate demand load / %
20
0
0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10
11
12
13
14 15
16 17
18
19 20 21
22
23
Time of day
plying the connected load by the demand factor. For the In some areas of a building special-purpose lighting is purposes of revenue metering for electrical energy
likely to result in higher electrical loads greater than this.

suppliers, maximum demand is averaged over a small
Special-purpose lighting includes theatrical lighting, increment of time, usually over 30 minutes, or sometimes display lighting in retail establishments, lighting for over 15 minutes.

medical treatment areas and operating theatres etc. The impact of these types of lighting should be evaluated on a case by case basis. However, areas requiring speciality 3.2.6
Power factor
lighting, when part of a large office building, may
represent a small fraction of the total floor area and Power factor is defined as the ratio of the apparent power therefore may have a small or negligible effect on the in a circuit (V·A) to the useful power (W) if the voltage overall electrical capacity required from the lighting and current are sinusoidal; i.e. power factor = kW/kV·A.

system.

For broad planning purposes, taken over the whole of a large office building, a unit load of 12–20 W·m–2 is 3.3
Load assessment
reasonable.

The electrical load within most commercial buildings can be arranged into the following broad categories:
3.3.2
Small power and special user
—
lighting
equipment
—
small power and special user equipment
Small power and user equipment generally consists of
—
heating, ventilating and air conditioning (
items which are plugged into socket outlets or perma-HVAC)
equipment
nently connected. Most of this type of equipment is
brought into the building by the occupants and not
—
lifts and escalators.

selected by the building services designer.

The electrical demand is directly connected to the heat The small power requirements vary widely throughout a output and this is discussed in section 6 of CIBSE Guide building, from some areas having virtually no small power A: Environmental design(1).

loads to other areas, such as financial trading rooms or computer rooms, which have a relatively high unit
loading.

3.3.1
Lighting
If special areas exist with known loads, a higher average The design of lighting systems is provided in the CIBSE
load should be used for these areas. For example,
Code for lighting(2) and CIBSE/SLL Lighting Guides.

equipment loads in excess of 250–500 W·m–2 and
200–300 W·m–2 may be required for a large computer
Case studies carried out on a number of offices built or room or a financial dealing area, respectively. It is of refurbished since 1983 found that the lighting loads were extreme importance that the engineer obtains details of all between 8 and 18 W·m–2 for maintained illuminance levels the connected equipment and includes an appropriate
of 350–500 lux.

allowance for future expansion or load increase.

Load assessment
3-3
3.3.3
Heating, ventilating and air
Table 3.1 Minimum design load capacities for
lighting and small power equipment for
conditioning equipment
various types of building
Building type
Minimum load
In modern ventilated and air conditioned buildings the capacity / (W/m2)
load required for HVAC apparatus can represent 40–50% of the total building load. Such loads are affected by the Office 60
School
30
nature of the building fabric, fresh air requirements and Residential building
30
internal heat gains from lights, people and equipment, and Hospital
25
should be determined by the project mechanical engineer.

Hotel
25
Typically, the electrical load resulting from a mechanically Church
15
ventilated and cooled building could be in the order of 40–50 W·m–2, but requirements must be assessed for each project.

Table 3.2 Measured total maximum demand loads for representative sample of large office buildings
In electrically heated buildings, the required load must be similarly calculated by the project mechanical engineer.

Building
Gross area / m
Maximum
Maximum
Since the heating and cooling loads are not usually
demand / MW
demand / W·m–2
simultaneous, only the larger of the two should be used for A
35 000
2.32
67
system calculation.

B
28 000
2.34
84
C
40 000
3.28
82
D
46 000
2.42
53
3.3.4
Lifts
E
50 000
2.1
42
The evaluation of lift requirements must be undertaken by a lift specialist who, on the basis of the building population, should determine the number, speed and capacity mechanical apparatus such as lifts, air conditioning of lifts. Further guidance on the planning and design of equipment, pumps etc., should be added to each of these lifts is provided in CIBSE Guide D: Transportation systems figures. These loadings are recommended minimum
in buildings(3).

requirements.

A large, tall building may have several hundred kilowatts Table 3.2 presents a summary of measured maximum
of lift equipment installed. Of particular interest to the operating demand loads for modern ‘high-tech’ commer-electrical engineer, however, is the fact that peak lift loads cial office buildings. Each building is fully air
can be considered short time loads and their impact on conditioned and contains dealing facilities of various overall building demand discounted (but not ignored).

sizes, some accommodating as many as 250 traders. It is significant to note that the highest recorded demand is The starting current of a large lift motor must be
considerably below some recent user expectations of
evaluated for potential effects on system voltage.

150–200 W·m–2.

Additionally, the nature of solid state speed controllers commonly used today may create disturbances on the
distribution system, particularly when the lift load is a large percentage of system capacity as in a small building 3.5
Harmonics
or when operating on a standby generator.

All electrical installations must comply with the
requirements of Electricity Association Engineering
Recommendation G5/4(4), which imposes limits on the
3.4
Load calculations
extent of harmonics that can be generated in an electrical system.

An evaluation of the main electrical services requirements in a building should begin with an estimate of the likely Harmonics are typically generated by inductive
load requirements. This is usually based upon a unit luminaires, computers, rotating machines, electronic loading on a square metre basis. The unit loading used speed controllers, arc furnaces and uninterruptible power should be based upon a reasonable figure, statistically supplies (see section 9).

determined from an analysis of similar buildings.

Harmonic currents may cause distortion of the voltage When applying unit loads on a W·m–2 basis for initial waveform (known as notching) and high neutral currents.

design calculations, it is suggested that the gross area of The notching effect on the voltage waveform can be
the building be utilised, subtracting the known areas of particularly troublesome on small distribution systems lifts, shaftways, etc. Reducing areas to take account of the (i.e. high-impedance systems such as standby generators) thicknesses of exterior walls or columns is an unnecessary as a result of instantaneous voltage drop occurring with level of precision for estimating loads. The difference each pulse of input current as solid state switching between lettable areas and building gross areas has little devices fire. This can cause equipment malfunction due to impact on equipment selection, unless unreasonably large line voltage conditions being outside accepted tolerances.

unit loads are used for the calculations.

It is essential for the equipment designer to have an understanding of load characteristics so that provisions Table 3.1 summarises unit load estimates for lighting and may be designed into the system to accommodate the
small power for various types of building. An estimate for equipment.

3-4
Electricity in buildings
Where possible, the electrical engineer should persuade Store rooms and other ancillary areas are often left those responsible for the purchase of equipment to specify unlit for long periods.

maximum permissible levels of input current harmonics.

—
Equipment connected to socket outlets or fused
In addition, the manufacturer of the equipment should be connection units are often used intermittently.

required to provide suitable filters, input isolation This would apply to such equipment as photo-transformers etc., as needed to maintain the permitted copiers or hand driers.

harmonic levels.

—
Motors do not usually operate at their nameplate
High neutral currents may be present in systems
rating, i.e. the mechanical load on the rotating
containing harmonic current due to the fact that third shaft is less than the rated load. This could be due order harmonic current components in a three-phase,
to operating variations in load, as in an air
four-wire system (TPN) may become arithmetically
conditioning system with variable air volume
additive in the neutral. For this reason, multicore cables controls or due to conservative equipment
with reduced neutrals should not be specified for
selection by the designer.

installations where significant harmonic currents are likely to occur.

—
Some loads are cyclic in nature, as with sump
pumps, sewage ejector pumps, air compressors,
lifts, etc. This means that probably not all loads
will be operating simultaneously.

3.6
Codes and standards
—
Some loads rarely operate, except in unusual
circumstances or for testing, such as in the cases of There are no regulations in the UK for minimum design sprinkler booster pumps or hose reel pumps.

capacities for various buildings; this is left to the judgement of the electrical designer. This is not the case
—
Once they have reached a set operating temper-
in all inspection jurisdictions. Where the engineer is ature many items of electrical cooking equipment
designing an electrical installation for use in another draw full load only for short periods to retain this country, codes or standards may require a minimum stated level.

capacity in order for a building to be considered adequate
—
Other equipment often operates at less than
for its intended purpose. Therefore, the engineer should manufacturers’ nameplate ratings.

determine the following early on in assessing load
requirements:
The diversity factor recognises that the load does not
—
What codes and standards apply?

equal the sum of its parts due to time interdependence (i.e.

diversity). It is defined as the ratio of the sum of the
—
What regulations, if any, dictate minimum
individual demands in a system to the maximum demand provisions for electrical capacity?

for the system. It is always equal to or greater than unity.

—
What local practices and conventions apply,
A diversity factor of unity indicates that all loads are regarding earthing, cable calculations, over-coincident. An example would be a conveyor belt made up current and short circuit protection etc?

of six sections, each driven by a 2 kW motor. As material is transported along this belt, it is initially carried by the first section, then by each section in succession until the final section is reached. In this simple example only one 3.7
Diversity and demand
section of conveyor is carrying material at any moment.

Therefore five motors are handling no-load mechanical losses (say 0.1 kW), keeping the belt moving, whilst one 3.7.1
General
motor is handling the load (say 1 kW). The demand
presented by each motor when it is carrying the material is The actual operating load rarely, if ever, equals the sum of 1 kW and the sum of the demand loads is 6 kW, but the all the loads installed. The maximum operating load can maximum load presented by the system at any time is only be related to connected loads or to the sum of demand 1.5 kW.

loads by the demand factor or the diversity factor. To avoid confusion designers must always keep in mind
The diversity factor for this system is given by:
actual operating conditions in an installation. An
electrical distribution system can be broken down into groups of smaller systems or branches, successively
∑ (Demands)
Diversity factor = ————————–
(3.6)
connected together forming the whole network. Each
Maximum demand
branch of the network can contain smaller branches and individual items of equipment. The operating load
Therefore, for the above example:
existing at any location in a system at a given point in time is the sum of the loads downstream existing at that Diversity factor = 6 / 1.5 = 4
time. Diversity occurs in an operating system because not all loads connected are operating simultaneously or are From equation 3.5, the demand factor for the system is: not operating simultaneously at their maximum rating.

Examples of this occur in a building as follows:
Demand factor = 1.5 / (2 × 6) = 0.125
—
Lighting is often used in response to the amount
of daylight or to occupancy, particularly if auto-
If, however, the carrying rate of the conveyor is increased matic controls have been installed. It is unusual
such that each section is carrying a load, the maximum for all the lighting to be operated at the same time.

load would increase to 6 kW. Therefore the diversity factor
Load assessment
3-5
would decrease to unity and the demand factor would
3.7.4
Power factor
increase to 0.5.

In an operating system various loads comprising the
Many building services engineers find it convenient to system may have differing power factors. This must be work with the demand factor and will often express the considered when totalling loads at any point in the
effect of diversity as a percentage of connected load.

system, and loads should be added algebraically. It is often convenient for initial analysis to work in real loads (in kW) only.

3.7.2
Lighting
In commercial or industrial buildings, lighting demand is 3.7.5
Electric heating
often assumed to equal 100% of the connected load.

However, some luminaires will not be operating. In
When a building is electrically heated, the heating load installations provided with local switching, daylight must be considered independently from any unit load
linking (or occupancy-sensing) lights in unoccupied areas design guidelines and generally added to the maximum may not be on. The extent of this diversity may be very demand calculations. In an air conditioned building, small but nonetheless it exists.

however, it is likely that maximum heating load will not occur simultaneously with cooling loads. Therefore, this diversity must be considered in determining maximum
3.7.3
Small power
demand.

Recently, there has been a trend to anticipate the use of large quantities of electronic equipment in general office 3.7.6
Voltage variation
spaces. As a result design levels for small power loads have been rising. Experience has shown, however, that demand In general, all load evaluation is based upon nominal loads have not grown as rapidly as connected loads. This system voltage. The designer should always be aware of may be due to several factors, including the following: the effects of voltage drop or variations in supply. Voltage
—
overestimating loads: in some cases the quantity of
drops within the range recommended by various codes
equipment anticipated is never actually installed
and standards or supply company regulations will not usually present any problems.

—
under-estimating or neglecting the effect of
diversity and demand factors.

The design engineer must have an understanding of
References
realistic values for operating demand as a percentage of connected loads. This understanding can be assisted by 1
Environmental design CIBSE Guide A (London: Chartered Institution of Building Services Engineers) (1999)
good record keeping and gathering operational data from completed installations.

2
Code for lighting (London: Chartered Institution of Building Services Engineers) (2002)
Small power loads can significantly affect the capacity of 3
Transportation systems in buildings CIBSE Guide D (London: air conditioning plant. A reasonably accurate assessment Chartered Institution of Building Services Engineers) (2000) of operating demand loads will enable an HVAC design 4
Planning levels for harmonic voltage distortion and the connection of engineer properly to select equipment for a project.

non-linear equipment to transmission systems and distribution Oversized equipment can be extremely difficult to control networks in the United Kingdom Engineering Recommendation when operating at very small percentages of rated capacity.

G5/4 (London: Electricity Association) (2001)
In some cases, as in variable air volume (VAV) systems, occupied spaces may be severely over-cooled even at
minimum control settings.

4-1
4
Off-site supplies and on-site power
generation
4.1
Off-site supplies
4.1.2
Electricity transmission
The UK transmission system, the National Grid, was
4.1.1


Introduction

established in the 1930s and was designed to operate at 132 kV. In the early 1950s, the operating voltage was raised Prior to the introduction of The Electricity Act 1989(1), to 275 kV and in 1960 the CEGB decided to introduce new electricity was generated and distributed in England, transmission lines operating at 400 kV.

Wales and Scotland by the Central Electricity Generating Board (CEGB). The CEGB sold electricity in bulk to 12
Figure 4.1 shows generating and transmission arrange-area distribution boards, each of which served a closed ments within the National Grid.

supply area or franchise. A co-ordinating body, the
Electricity Council, dealt with overall policy matters.

The power dissipated in a resistance (such as a length of transmission cable) is proportional to the square of the The 1989 Electricity Act(1) laid the legislative foundations current passing through the resistance (i.e. P = I 2 R).

for the restructuring and privatisation of the electrical Therefore, the lower the current passing through the supply industry whereby the CEGB was split into three cable, the lower the losses generated in that cable which generating companies and a transmission company. The are dissipated as heat.

power stations were divided between two fossil-fired Since power is the product of voltage and current, these generating companies, National Power and PowerGen and losses can be reduced by the adoption of higher trans-a nuclear generating company, Nuclear Electric.

Power station
National Power and PowerGen became private companies in 1992 while Nuclear Electric was privatised as part of British Energy in 1996.

The ownership and operation of the transmission system were transferred in 1990 to the newly created National 400 kV substation
Grid Company as the transmission system operator.

National Grid was responsible for the transmission of 400 kV system
electricity to the Regional Electricity Companies (RECs).

Power station
National Grid was jointly owned by the Regional
Electricity Companies but was floated on the stock market as an independent company in 1995.

Transformer
Twelve Regional Electricity Companies were created as the successors to the previous area boards and were privatised 275 kV substation
in December 1990. The RECs are responsible for the
distribution of electricity over their network and the 275 kV system
supply of electricity to final customers.

In Scotland, vertical integration was maintained in the 275 kV substation
new structure with the creation of Scottish Power and Transformer
Scottish Hydro-Electric. As in England and Wales,
nuclear generation was assigned to a separate company, Scottish Nuclear, which became part of British Energy in 132 kV substation
1996.

132 kV system
132 kV system
In Northern Ireland, Northern Ireland Electricity became responsible for transmission, distribution and supply.

The 1989 Electricity Act(1) also created a system of Transformer
independent regulation. In 1999, the Regulatory Offices for electricity and gas in England, Wales and Scotland were merged to form the Office of Gas and Electricity Markets (OFGEM). Northern Ireland has it own
33 kV distribution system
Regulatory body, the Office for the Regulation of
Figure 4.1 Generating and transmission arrangements within the Electricity and Gas (OFREG).

National Grid
4-2
Electricity in buildings
mission voltages. However, the higher transmission
during the winter months when electric heating
voltages increase the risk of flashover between adjacent demands are high
cables or between the cables and the supporting struc-
—
a charge for the number of units (kilowatt-hours)
tures. In the design of transmission systems, a balance used; this charge may vary between units
must be struck between acceptable transmission losses and consumed during the day and those used at night.

the high cost of HV transmission equipment.

In general, a supply provided by a REC at high voltage (HV) will attract lower tariff charges than those provided at low 4.1.3
Quality of electrical supply
voltage (LV). This is a reflection of the reduced amount of plant that has to be provided and maintained by the RECs The load on the National Grid varies considerably during for high voltage consumers.

the day and from season to season. The generating and distribution companies have a statutory obligation to satisfy the load and, at the same time, maintain the quality 4.1.6
Incoming electrical supplies
of the power supply within 1% of the declared supply frequency and within +10% and –6% of the declared
Regional electricity companies have a variety of guides supply voltage. The quality of the electricity supply is that are freely available to designers to assist in the defined in the Electricity Safety, Quality and Continuity procurement of potential supplies for projects.

Regulations 2002(2).

As a prerequisite to providing a supply, the REC would require basic information about the project such as the 4.1.4
Wholesale electricity market
location, size and type of development, the type of load and the maximum power required. In addition, the REC
All generating companies are required to sell the
will wish to know the method of heating the building.

electricity they produce into an open commodity market, known as the Pool. Each generating company has to
When the incoming supply is small, the building can be declare in advance its availability to the market, together connected to the existing LV network without the need for with a price at which it is prepared to generate. From this reinforcement of the supply network. For large building information, the National Grid Company establishes a loads, it will be necessary to establish a new substation to schedule of generating plant in ascending order of price.

serve the project and alteration of the HV network may be The Pool has been overlaid with contracts, short and long required. The need for a new substation will depend on a term, to reduce volatility in the market and to make variety of factors including the location of the site (i.e.

capacity and energy prices more predictable.

rural or urban), the nature of the project and the existing load on the REC network.

The RECs buy electricity in bulk from the Pool and, in turn, sell the electricity to consumers at a voltage It is important that the maximum power requirement for appropriate to the load of the consumers installation. For a the project is assessed as accurately as possible. Too low a large industrial site, the electricity may be supplied at a figure could result in the rating of the supply equipment voltage of 33 kV.

being insufficient to meet the actual power requirements.

However, if the assessed value of maximum power is set For commercial or industrial premises where the load too high, this will result in unnecessarily high availability exceeds approximately 1 MW, the supply voltage would be charges being levied by the REC.

11 kV. The smaller commercial or industrial premises, electricity would be provided as a 3-phase low voltage The substation may be owned and operated by the REC, providing the user with a
(400 V) supply. Domestic premises would be supplied with LV supply, or the supply may be
provided by the
a single phase (230 V) supply.

REC at high voltage (11 kV) with the
substation owned and operated by the building owner.

4.1.5
Tariffs
4.1.7
Substation planning
The RECs offer a range of tariffs to suit a variety of There are usually three main electrical components
consumer types. For domestic consumers, the choice is contained in a substation. These are HV switchgear, one or generally between a standard rate with all units charged at more transformers and LV switchgear. These may be con-the same value and an off-peak rate with low cost units tained in a single area or enclosure or may be segregated during night time hours.

into separate rooms, depending on the circumstances of the building. In general, REC substations are contained For non-domestic users, the most widely used tariff is the within a single room.

maximum demand tariff which is a complex pricing
system consisting of several different components:
As an approximate guide, the internal space requirements
—
a standing monthly charge
for substations are as follows:
—
substation containing a single transformer:
—
an availability charge, based on the maximum
4500 mm × 3500 mm × 2800 mm high
anticipated electrical load of the installation
—
substation containing two transformers: 6700 mm
—
a demand charge for each kilowatt of the maxi-
× 4500 mm × 2800 mm high
mum demand in each month; this is generally
small for the summer months when demand on
—
high-voltage switch room: 4000 mm × 2200 mm ×
the supply is light but increases considerably
2800 mm high.

Off-site supplies and on-site power generation 4-3
The dimensions given are approximate and are the
can be terminated on the glanding plates of the switchgear minimum required. Larger supplies will inevitably
or transformers.

necessitate greater space requirements to house the
equipment.

The electrical installation at each substation requires earthing to meet the requirements of the REC and BS
In addition, space will be required to install the LV
7430(3). This may be carried out using rods driven into the switchgear and this should be positioned in a switch room ground or by a coarse mesh made up from buried copper immediately adjacent to the substation or transformer tape. The subject of earthing is discussed in detail in chamber.

section 10.

Layouts for typical substations are shown in section 7.

4.2
On-site power generation
4.1.8
Wayleaves and easements
Where a REC installs cables or equipment as part of a 4.2.1


Introduction

project, there will be a requirement to negotiate a wayleave or easement to ensure that the REC has a legal right to gain There are clear a number of fundamental reasons for
access to the equipment in the future. It is normally a considering the provision of private or standby generation condition of the agreement for a new supply that
wayleaves/easements are granted under the terms as
of electricity, independent from the incoming REC supply.

agreed, and that all documentation is signed before
Three of the most common of these are:
electricity is provided through the supply connection. The
—
standby generation: if the particular application term of the lease is not normally less than 99 years.

demands an alternative source of supply to protect
against failure or disruption of the public supply
It is a standard requirement of all RECs that each substation on the REC network is provided with a means for
—
private generation: if a total independence from the 24-hour personnel access for switching off that part of the public supply is required; either for security or
network and with suitable vehicle/craneage access to the economic reasons
installed plant during working hours.

—
combined heat and power (CHP): where electricity is produced as part of a CHP scheme.

4.1.9
Substation construction
4.2.1.1
Standby generation
Many issues require consideration in the design of substations, whether or not they are owned and operated by This is commonly used where it is necessary to maintain a the REC or by the building owner.

secure supply for special equipment such as computers, communications or similar high risk systems, or for safety The substation needs to be securely constructed where it purposes to maintain supplies for firefighting equipment, is enclosed and, when necessary, fire separation must be other life safety systems, lifts in high-rise buildings, water provided between the substation and the adjacent accom-and sewage pumps and services.

modation to meet the requirements of the Fire Officer and other regulatory bodies.

When selecting loads to be supported by standby
generation it is necessary to study each item of plant and Equipment within the substation can produce a
considerable amount of heat, necessitating adequate
decide which are absolutely essential.

ventilation to maintain the environment within the
substation below the condition at which equipment and Should one set of a multi-set installation fail there must be cables need to be derated. Ideally, the ventilation should a control programme immediately available to reduce the be configured to be natural, thus avoiding maintenance of load to the remaining sets.

mechanical ventilation systems, and to achieve this, the substation should be situated close to a source of fresh air.

4.2.1.2
Private generation
Where a substation is located outdoors, adequate
The RECs have adopted a flexible approach, such that protection in the form of vandal-proof fencing with
private generation has become attractive, both for peak lockable gates should be provided to avoid unauthorised lopping and base load purposes. Should there be a
access. In this situation, the equipment specified must be requirement for heating, then an integrated CHP system fully weatherproof. New requirements for external
(utilising the waste heat from the engines or turbines) substations have been introduced in The Electricity
Safety, Quality and Continuity Regulations 2002(2).

may be adopted which would increase the thermal
efficiency of the installation from approximately 40% to The substation needs to be designed to ensure the easy 80% for a reciprocating engine and 28% to 80% for a gas installation and possible future replacement of cables.

turbine, thereby improving the economics of private
Where the cables enter the switchgear or transformer from generation.

below, trenches and/or ducts of appropriate dimension and depth should be installed. Consideration needs to be given For base load with reciprocating engines, it would be ideal to the bending radius of each cable (see section 8.6.1) that to install two extra sets, one for on-line/off-line reserve, is to be installed to ensure that, at the depth proposed, it and one out of service for maintenance.

4-4
Electricity in buildings
In order to reduce the number of sets, generator failure
—
steam turbine
could be covered by connection to the REC supply. An
—
wind generator.

important factor is the cost of such a connection and has to be included in the evaluation. Financial benefits may be In addition to the above, water wheels and water turbines gained by exporting to the grid when possible, making it could provide the source of the motive power.

necessary to run in parallel with the supply. Such arrangements will require appropriate controls and agreements with the REC and all customers wishing to install private 4.2.2.1
Prime mover selection
generation must comply with the Electricity Association’s Engineering Recommendation G59/1(4).

The selection of prime mover is governed by:
—
physical size
The Electricity Association has also produced
Engineering Technical Report ETR113: Notes of guidance
—
weight
for the protection of private generating sets up to 5 MW for
—
location
operation in parallel with PES distribution networks(5).

—
choice of fuel
4.2.1.3
Combined heat and power
—
performance
—
capital and running costs.

Combined heat and power (CHP) schemes offer a
significantly greater efficiency than conventional power stations, typically converting 25–35% of the fuel energy to 4.2.2.2
Reciprocating engines
electricity and 50–60% as heat. CHP units can run on a variety of fuels including natural gas, bio-gas and diesel In order to obtain maximum power output from recipro-oil.

cating engines it is necessary to provide turbocharged engines, either with or without air coolers (intercoolers).

Electrically, CHP units should be treated as private The latter reduces the size of the engine and hence the generators as described in 4.2.1.2.

space required.

Further guidance on CHP systems is given in CIBSE Guide Sets operating at 1500 rev/min and above are normally F: Energy efficiency in buildings(6) .

selected for standby duty. These higher speeds may be utilised for base load applications where restricted space and power-to-weight ratios are important. To meet these 4.2.1.4
Temporary/mobile sets
requirements turbines should also be considered.

In cases where temporary power is needed suitable sets Reciprocating engines of up to 10 MW should start up and can either be purchased or hired. These include:
accept load in approximately 10 to 20–30 seconds.

—
hand-portable units
Acceptable steps in load should be discussed with the manufacturer and are dependent on the type of engine.

—
hand trolley units
—
trailer-mounted units
4.2.2.3
Gas turbines
—
skid-base units
It is uncommon for gas turbines to be considered for loads
—
low-load transportable units.

below 500 kW. Starting times are normally around
45–60 seconds, but rated full load can normally be
Starting can be by hand start, electric hand start or accepted in one step when the turbine is up to running automatic start.

speed.

The arrangement for connecting these types of set to the Single shaft turbines are generally considered the best site load vary. The smaller hand-portable or hand trolley option for standby purposes and in situations subject to sets will normally have their own panel with simple plug-large load variations.

in connection as part of the unit. The larger mobile sets may have their own control and protective equipment as an integral part of the unit. However, in some instances 4.2.2.4
Wind generators
this may need to be provided separately. Care should be taken that proper protection and safety measures are In general the design and application of wind generators is provided in all instances.

complex and involves aerodynamics, mechanics and
geography in addition to electrical engineering. Wind energy is freely available, avoids fuel transportation 4.2.2
Prime mover
problems and is virtually inexhaustible, but cannot be completely relied upon. There is a wide range in
The main power source is termed the prime mover, and application size and can it therefore be used for peak for standby or private generation the most commonly used lopping and large distribution systems.

at present are:
When site conditions are being considered, it should be
—
internal combustion reciprocating engine, either
noted that the power output is proportional to the cube of diesel, gas or dual fuel
the windspeed. Therefore all aspects relating to its
—
gas turbine
location are vital, the height above the ground, the
Off-site supplies and on-site power generation 4-5
proximity to any obstruction, the noise generated and the 4.2.2.6
Prime mover starting
size of unit. If the unit is to be mounted on top of a building, it will be necessary to investigate the effect the The prime mover is started by means of an electric motor aerodynamic forces will have on the structure.

or direct injection of air into cylinders. The latter applies more usually to slow running sets. High speed sets of up to Information relating to the wind pattern in the particular 1800 kV·A for standby use are commonly started using an area covering wind speed and time can be obtained from electrically powered starter motor.

the British Wind Energy Association*.

Provision is made for multiple starts, typically three, on a single occasion and the battery or air supply is sized 4.2.2.5
Prime mover rating
accordingly. After three failures to start, the set would normally be shut down and an alarm sounded.

The declared power output of a prime mover is the power available continuously at the output shaft. It is normal to accept 10% overload capability for one hour in a 12-hour 4.2.3
Generator size
period, but this should be confirmed by the manufac-
turers.

4.2.3.1
Generator size related to load
A standby rating is not recognised by the current British When considering private or standby power plant it is Standards but some manufacturers will provide special necessary to carry out a full investigation into the ratings dependent on the required duty.

characteristics of the load that has to be catered for, such as the method and type of starting of the largest motor, the The relevant British Standards covering the rating of number of motors likely to be starting together, the machines are as follows:
existence of non-linear loads etc. The end result of such an investigation will ensure that the units installed will meet
—
BS EN 60034-2: 1999: Rotating electrical machines.

the load pattern and total power required.

Methods for determining losses and efficiency of rotating electrical machinery from tests (excluding machines for traction vehicles)(7)
4.2.3.2
Load characteristics
—
BS 5000: Rotating electrical machines of particular The different load characteristics likely to be encountered types or for particular applications: Part 3: 1980
will fall under one or more of the following:
(1985): Generators to be driven by reciprocating
—
electric motors for normal continuous use, such as
internal combustion engines(8)
driving fans and pumps for building services and
—
BS ISO 3046-1: 2002: Reciprocating internal
motor drives in process and industrial plant
combustion engines. Performance. Declarations of
—
electric motors for intermittent operation, such as
power, fuel and lubricating oil consumptions, and test lifts, multi-stage refrigeration equipment, cranes
methods. Additional requirements for engines for general and process plant needing high inertia starting
use(9).

—
non-linear loads, including discharge and
It should be noted that the site conditions play an
fluorescent lighting and solid state controlled
important part in rating a set. These include the operating devices for battery charging, uninterruptible
ambient temperature, the relative humidity and altitude.

power supplies and rectifiers and switch mode
In the case of the turbocharged reciprocating engine with power supplies on variable speed motor drives
charge air cooling and water-cooled intercooler the lowest
—
large linear loads, including electric heating and
good quality water temperature available is relevant to the hot water systems, and tungsten lighting (unless
site rating.

fitted with thyristor-controlled dimmers)
—
industrial welding equipment
Typical values relating to site conditions for a standard set are:
—
loads requiring stability of voltage, frequency and
waveform within specified tolerances to ensure
—
maximum ambient temperature of 40 °C
correct operation; these include mainframe
—
maximum altitude of 1000 m
computers, X-ray machines, and other medical
diagnostic equipment.

—
harmonic content not greater than 10%
—
power factor of 0.8 lagging.

In most buildings a mixture of the types of load
mentioned will normally be found. It is necessary to Full information on the values can be found in BS EN
consider the relative properties and characteristics of these load to ensure the proper selection of generating
60034-2(7) and BS 5000: Part 3(8).

equipment.

Detailed information giving manufacturers’ guaranteed output for the prime mover and alternator are given on the 4.2.3.3
Choice of engine and alternator
rating plate of the set. This provides a permanent record.

The rating of engine and alternator needed properly to
*British Wind Energy Association, 4 Hamilton Place, London W1V 0BQ
support the load under start and operating conditions (www.bwea.com)
should be carefully considered. An oversized system is
4-6
Electricity in buildings
expensive and this includes the space it takes up and 4.2.4
Choice of high or low voltage
associated distribution system. Furthermore it will not operate at an efficient point on its load curve and, in the systems
case of a diesel prime mover at low loads, could fail due to over-oiling.

4.2.4.1
Cost implications
4.2.3.4
Loads and characteristics
Throughout Europe, the normal LV distribution is
400/230 V three-phase, four-wire at 50 Hz, with a tolerance of +10% and –6%. The generation voltage will normally General motor loads
be at one of the distribution voltages already in use on the Industrial and commercial installations normally include site. As a result, if high voltage is used, it will generally be induction motors (i.e. machine drives, fan drives,
due to the fact that this is already available from the REC
compressors etc.).

with metering.

A substantial voltage dip may occur at the alternator Justification for high voltage generation will be made terminals during motor starting, affecting the starting using assessments similar to those for any other electrical performance, and other connected loads. This can be
distribution systems.

estimated by referring to the nomograms and data
provided by the manufacturers.

4.2.4.2
Operational and other implications
The rated kV·A of an alternator is related to the output All electrical installations require stringent safety rated voltage and full load running current. The total considerations, irrespective of the voltage at which they apparent power for a three-phase alternator is given by: operate, and are subject to the Electricity at Work
Regulations 1989(10). Only authorised and properly trained V I
S
l
l
= 3
(3.1)
a
personnel should be involved in the operation of gener-1000
ation plant and no work should be carried out without certification that the equipment has been isolated, locked where S is the rated kV·A of the alternator (kV·A), V is a
l
off and earthed. A safe-working installation has to be the rated output line voltage (V), and I is the rated full l
provided with barriers, together with a description and load line current (A).

sketch on the ‘authority to work’ permit.

The starting kV·A of the motor is related to the voltage It is possible to utilise outside qualified organisations, and current at the moment of switch-on of the motor, and such as the RECs, to undertake switching and maintenance should be considered when selecting the size of the
operations.

alternator.

In some circumstances it may be more attractive to use a Regenerative effects
number of smaller low voltage sets around the site to eliminate expensive long cable runs, which may provide a A generator set providing power for motor drives with greater, desired level of security at the individual centres.

dynamic or regenerative braking (e.g. cranes, lifts) need to be capable of accepting the regenerated power, and reverse High voltage generation is more cost effective above about power protection must be applied to prevent ‘motoring’
1.25 MV·A. These sets are normally manufactured for a that could result in damage to the alternator and, possibly, specific project with resultant longer delivery and little the prime mover. Special starters are available that will chance of ex-stock sets.

prevent regenerated feedback.

The fault level increases with the rating of the set up to a Non-linear loads
point where it becomes necessary to review the earthing of the high voltage system but this can be reduced by
Solid state devices which include discharge and fluores-introducing an earthing transformer, reactor or resistor.

cent lighting, rectifier/invertors and computer power supplies, do not draw sinusoidal currents from the supply.

In these circumstances it is recommended that a specialist The effect can be a distorted current wave which may be consulted.

contain a high percentage of third harmonic (150 Hz) current (up to 80% of the total current). The result is a flow of third harmonic current within the generator
4.2.5
Mode of operation
windings which could cause overheating of the windings and connecting cables.

4.2.5.1
General
The line conductors should be protected by conventional over-current devices; however the neutral is not so
Generator systems may be provided for standby, peak-
protected. For sensibly balanced 50 Hz loads the neutral lopping or base load with operation modes outlined below.

current will be relatively low. Where triple n harmonics exist (i.e. third harmonic plus multiples), the possibility of In a standby application the system may consist of one or overloading the neutral conductor must be carefully
more sets to cover all or part of the normal load require-considered in consultation with the equipment manufac-ments, but in some applications a redundant set could be turer.

required for increased security.

Off-site supplies and on-site power generation 4-7
Peak-lopping is often economical where an abnormally Table 4.1 Minimum clear room dimensions for single high load occurs at certain known times each day.

generating sets of various ratings
Generating sets may be installed to cover these daily load Output
Length
Width
Height
peaks, and such sets, which should be continually rated,
/ kV·A
/ mm
/ mm
/ mm
are then available as standby sets in the event of mains 30
4000
2500
2500
failure. Peak-lopping will reduce the registered maximum 50
4350
2500
2500
demand on the REC metering and hence reduce the tariff 100
6150
3500
3000
charge.

150
6150
3500
3500
250
6800
4500
4000
In base load applications there may be an option to obtain 300
7100
4500
4000
a standby facility from the REC but this may not be
400
7500
4500
4000
economically viable. It may be necessary to provide a 700
9000
5000
4500
redundant set to cover for maintenance and failure.

1000
9000
5000
4500
1500
9750
6000
4500
2000
12 000
6500
5000
4.2.5.2
Individual generating systems
If the individual set required for standby is well
maintained and used at times within the running
programme of the station, there is little likelihood of Typical examples of fittings and equipment include the set failure.

control panel, output switch, starting system, fuel storage, exhaust with silencer plus inlet, and exhaust cooling air 4.2.5.3
Parallel operating generator systems
with attenuators. The cooling of the diesel engine block is commonly by means of a water jacket and air-cooled
If there is a need to match load efficiency, reliability and radiator.

increase flexibility, together with allowing one set to be off-line for maintenance, parallel operation of the system Minimum clear room dimensions for a range of ratings of will meet one or more of these requirements.

single generating sets with a skid-mounted control panel and daily service tank are given in Table 4.1.

Operating efficiency and running costs are affected by the management of the load in relation to the number of sets A gas turbine prime mover is much smaller but demands considerably more combustion air than a reciprocating in operation.

diesel engine. It also mixes the burnt gases with the outlet cooling air prior to exhausting them. The turbine would Automatic control systems are available which provide require larger attenuators. It is fully air-cooled.

continuous load optimisation while the plant is running.

As the load is reduced, sets are disconnected progressively and shut down. Such control systems usually enable the 4.2.6.2
Cooling
operating parameters to be adjusted to avoid unnecessary operations and to maintain a minimum percentage of
Where a diesel-engined generating set is proposed, cooling spinning reserve (i.e. the spare generating capacity of sets will usually be by means of a set-mounted radiator with fan assisted airflow for exhaust air, and supply air entering running on load). This allows for starting of larger loads the generator room naturally through wall mounted
and for fault clearing.

louvres. However, there are alternative ways of achieving cooling.

It is recommended that a specialist be consulted where there are sets operating in parallel, or in parallel with the Where space is limited in the area available for the set, or REC mains.

there is inadequate access to outside air, then the radiator for a water-cooled engine may be remote from the engine.

If the distance is only a couple of metres, then the existing 4.2.6
Installation
or uprated water pump may be adequate with a piped
connection.

4.2.6.1
Space requirements and room layout
If the radiator is removed to another floor of a building or Generating sets are normally installed in purpose-built is more than a few metres from the engine, then a water-to-water heat exchanger and pumped secondary water
rooms, existing rooms, weatherproof enclosures or sound-circuit may be necessary to minimise operating pressures and weather-proof enclosures. An enclosure may allow on the water jacket. Consideration must be given to
access to the set by either incorporating space on the maintaining reliability and providing desirable engine inside, or by removable covers.

operating temperatures.

In hot climates the set may be located externally beneath a Some diesel engines with exhaust driven turbochargers sun shade. The size of the space for the set and the access may require cooling for the charge air intercooler. This needed will increase with the rating of the engine. High will need to be accounted for in any modification to speed engines tend to be more compact than low speed maintain the rating of the prime mover.

ones. The set itself comprises the prime mover (engine) and alternator. Allowance must be made for associated The advice of the set supplier and engine manufacturer fittings and equipment.

should be sought.

4-8
Electricity in buildings
4.2.6.3
Environmental requirements
Diesel oil systems
The environment should be considered both for its effect It is usual to provide a day tank fitted above the set or on the set and the effect of the set on it. The prime mover incorporated into the base frame.

will demand air for combustion. As a result of com-
bustion, it will discharge noxious fumes and noise into the Diesel fuel may be stored in bulk in surface, buried or environment.

underground tanks. This allows fuel to be pumped to the day tank and returned to the bulk tank in the event of an Air at high altitudes is less dense than at sea level. This overflow. The pumping would be controlled by level
will reduce the power output of the prime mover, affecting switches. The day tank provides an acceptable source for a turbine more than a diesel engine.

the engine fuel pump.

A turbine will be de-rated as air temperature rises because Tanks may be buried or placed in bunded pits to fully the maximum power output is governed by the combus-contain any spillage. The local authority may insist on a tion temperature. This occurs to a lesser extent with a particular arrangement.

diesel engine.

A fill point for delivery tankers should be provided within reach of their hoses. These are generally in lengths of 15 m For anything other than normal temperatures and
and 30 m. In special circumstances, longer hoses can be altitudes, the advice of the engine manufacturer should be supplied.

sought to ensure that the prime mover will deliver
adequate power to the alternator.

The fill point will typically contain the tanker connection point, a level indicator and a ‘tank full’ alarm depending Atmospheric humidity is less of a factor when considering upon requirements.

engine performance, but it could lead to corrosion.

Typical dimensions for cylindrical tanks for a range of It is common with standby sets to provide some means of capacities are listed in Table 4.2.

warming the engine lubricant to ease starting, reduce wear at the moment of starting and assist rapid load acceptance.

Table 4.2 Typical dimensions for cylindrical
Where necessary, manufacturers can provide a lubrication tanks of various capacities
oil priming pump with timed operation to maintain an oil Capacity / litre
Diameter / m
Length / m
film around the bearing surfaces.

5000
1.50
2.80
10 000
2.00
3.00
There is little point in fitting highly effective silencing if 25 000
2.50
5.00
the room itself does not by virtue of its mass provide a 50 000
2.75
9.00
similar level of sound reduction. In lightweight structures used today, it may prove necessary to introduce denser materials for the room containing the set. Doors must be Stored energy systems
selected to effect adequate sound reduction and be a good fit to avoid leakage of noise.

In appropriate circumstances, the source of energy may not be a fuel, it may be a form of stored energy. This Alternatively, the set may be housed in a sound-proof would include water pumped to a higher level reservoir to enclosure within the building.

provide a static head or air held under pressure, perhaps in underground caverns.

To avoid transmission of noise and vibration through the structure, the set should be supported on anti-vibration In these cases, the prime mover would comprise a water or mountings. Associated equipment connected to the set air turbine. The same turbine driven in reverse may be the means of re-establishing the stored energy. Alternatively a and to the structure should be fitted with flexible joints.

completely independent pump of some type may be used.

There is a good example of pumped water storage in
4.2.6.4
Primary fuel considerations
Dinorwic in North Wales.

The primary fuel to the prime mover may be natural gas, liquefied petroleum gas, petroleum, diesel or industrial 4.2.7
Testing and commissioning
fuel oil.

4.2.7.1


Introduction

Diesel oil is commonly used to fuel standby sets. It is readily available, easy to store and relatively inert. As the The testing and commissioning of a generating set (or amount of fuel used is low, the cost of the fuel is less combination of sets) and the associated control equipment relevant than the capital cost of the set and its installation.

are vital functions needing to be properly carried out and recorded. Tests will normally be divided into the
For base load and continuously operated sets, the type, following:
availability and cost of fuel becomes a significant factor.

The fuel may be available as a factory or process by-
—
works tests: covering the manufacture, assembly product, e.g. steam, where it is desirable to convert it to and performance of the main component items of
the generating plant and control equipment
electrical energy. There are numerous options and
alternatives which are outside the scope of this section of
—
site tests: proving the installation standards and the Guide.

operational performance, under site conditions, of
Off-site supplies and on-site power generation 4-9
the complete generating plant installation includ-
( i)
Governing and voltage regulation (hot conditions).

ing interfaces with other associated engineering
( j)
Transient switching tests.

systems.

( k)
Insulation tests.

4.2.7.2
Works testing
( l)
Final re-run of set to observe correct performance.

( m)
Final check and clearance including draindown,
General
disconnections and completion of test certificates.

The complete generator set assembly, including its control Type tests
equipment and switchgear, must be tested as a composite unit at the generator set manufacturer’s works in order to Apart from the above standard tests, there may be a
prove that its performance meets specified requirements, requirement for certain type tests to be carried out at the in so far as is practicable in the absence of the actual manufacturer’s works. The requirement to perform such dynamic loads of the eventual building installation.

tests must be agreed beforehand with the manufacturer With large base load sets, however, it may often be
and therefore should be included in the specification.

impracticable to perform a full works test on the complete engine, alternator and auxiliary equipment assembly. Such Examples of such tests include the following:
sets are more usually subjected to works tests on the
—
cold resistance of electrical windings
separate alternator and engine assemblies at the appropriate manufacturer’s works, with combined assembly
—
winding resistance and temperature rise following
tests being carried out on-site as part of the extensive hot shutdown
erection and testing procedures.

—
transient performance test
It is important to maximise the benefits gained from
—
vibration tests
works tests rather than to leave certain tests to be carried
—
noise tests
out during on-site commissioning since the latter option is likely to create programme delays in completing the
—
ability to withstand short circuit.

installation should a malfunction be found.

Any type test certificates required should be requested All reputable generator manufacturers have their own from the manufacturer.

series of works tests and details of these should be sought from the particular manufacturer. A code of practice(11) 4.2.7.3
Site testing and commissioning
published by the Association of British Generating Set Manufacturers (ABGSM) sets down a basic standard test The generator plant, including its associated fuel, cooling, schedule. However, the basic tests included in this
exhaust, electrical and fire safety systems, must be schedule should be regarded as the minimum required
thoroughly checked for correct operation in both manual and it may be appropriate to specify that additional ‘type and automatic modes during, and upon completion of, site tests’ also be carried out.

installation. The initial checks will consist largely of static checks to ensure that the installation has been carried out The basic requirements for performance are set down in correctly in readiness for full testing and commissioning.

BS EN 60034-2(7), BS 5000(8) and BS ISO 3046-1(9).

The engine/alternator shaft alignment must be checked Standard tests
where the set is not skid-mounted or where the assembly has been dismantled for transportation to the site.

These should be conducted on every generating set before despatch and should include the following standard tests.

The generator output voltage, frequency and phase
The main components of this standard test schedule are rotation should be checked before further tests are carried listed in the preferred sequence:
out and before final connection to the electrical
distribution system.

( a)
Check plant build against specification.

( b)
Record reference and rating data.

It is desirable to carry out a load test with the standby generator supplying the full site load. Since it is unlikely ( c)
Prepare generating set for test with connections
that the actual building load will be available at the for exhaust, cooling system, lubricating oil,
commissioning stage, consideration should be given to the electrical power, control wiring etc.

inclusion in the contract of a suitably rated load bank.

( d)
Preliminary starting and running checks/adjust-
Such a load bank should be specified as multi-stage and ments.

preferably capable of offering loads at power factor 0.8
lagging. The test load bank may also provide a test facility ( e)
Performance tests (initial set up checks).

for routine maintenance where it is not practicable or ( f)
Load acceptance tests.

desirable to use the actual building load.

( g)
Governing and voltage regulation (cold con-
The duration of the site full load test should be at least ditions).

four (preferably eight) hours for all sets above 100 kW.

( h)
Load duration tests with detailed examination of
Sets rated at less than 100 kW are usually tested for one set immediately following hot shutdown.

hour.

4-10
Electricity in buildings
In all cases, the test should be carried out at varying loads 4.2.8.1
User training
up to the full rated load, with instrument readings
recorded every fifteen minutes. These readings should It is vital that the staff responsible for operating the include jacket water temperature, exhaust temperature, generating plant are given proper instruction prior to lubricating oil level, temperature and pressure, output handover by the equipment supplier.

voltage and frequency. The room temperature should also This must particularly deal with all safety aspects in be monitored.

accordance with the Health and Safety at Work etc. Act 2002(12), the Electricity at Work Regulations 1989(10), and It may be necessary to use an oscilloscope for voltage and any HSE guidance notes.

frequency measurements, particularly where close
tolerances are specified.

Apart from the moving parts of the equipment, the user’s attention must also be drawn to the safety and health Noise and vibration measurements should also be
aspects of ancillary static components such as batteries, monitored if the generator installation is likely to cause a fuel oil, anti-freeze, lubricating oil and electrical hazards.

disturbance to nearby occupants.

The period of user training will vary depending upon the Multiple set installations will need to be commissioned so number and size of sets, calibre/experience of the
as to demonstrate synchronisation with any combination operating staff, any ongoing involvement from the
of sets available and, where appropriate and by prior generating set supplier etc., but as a preliminary guide, agreement, in parallel with the REC. In the latter case, it is should be for a minimum of one full working day.

often possible to arrange for power to be exported to the It is useful for the user to be taken through the
REC network for load testing purposes.

commissioning reports, with demonstrations wherever
practicable, as part of the training. This is in addition to a All local/remote controls, emergency stop and all
thorough explanation of the content of the full operating protection devices/interlocks etc. should be proven during and maintenance instructions.

on-site commissioning tests.

The time interval should be noted between initial start up 4.2.8.2
Operating and maintenance
and load acceptance for the lead machine and, for multiple instructions
set installations, the time taken for the remaining sets to The operating and maintenance manual should cover all synchronise and accept load. Load sharing between sets parts of the generating plant installation including the should also be checked.

prime mover, alternator, control system and all ancillary equipment.

Site testing of a generator set intended to supply power and start a large induction motor, such as a chiller The contents should include:
compressor, may prove to be impracticable at the time of commissioning the generator installation. However, it is
—
data sheets
vital that this is proven before final acceptance of the
—
health and safety warnings
installation. In advance of this test, the generator works
—
description (general and detailed)
test data should be checked against the motor manufacturer’s data for compatibility with the performance
—
installation guidance notes
requirements. The motor data should include proven data
—
commissioning procedures and records/test sheets
on the characteristics of the motor starting device in
—
general arrangement drawings
starting the actual motor to similarly prove compatibility.

—
circuit/schematic diagrams
4.2.8
Operating and maintenance
—
operating instructions
—
maintenance instructions
Upon completion of all site commissioning tests the
—
fault finding guidance
generating set supplier should provide the following:
—
recommended spares and ordering information.

—
an appropriate period of user training before final
handover to the building owner/operator
4.2.8.3
Special tools
—
full operating and maintenance instructions,
together with comprehensive record drawings and
The generator supplier must provide, upon handover, all descriptive documentation upon handover
special tools necessary to maintain or operate the equipment in a safe and proper manner.

—
any special tools required for maintenance
(irrespective of who will maintain the equipment)
These tools are necessary irrespective of whether or not
—
spare parts (as recommended and/or included in
the supplier has a maintenance contract for the instal-the contract price)
lation.

—
proposals for ongoing maintenance contract (if
Details of such tools should be included in the operating required).

and maintenance manuals.

Off-site supplies and on-site power generation 4-11
The tools should be housed in a clearly marked location, More detailed maintenance, including replacement of
preferably close to the main generating plant equipment.

items such as lubricants, filters, belts and coolant, can be expected every, say, 500 hours.

4.2.8.4
Spare parts
Major maintenance activities are required typically after 5000 hours. This may involve a complete strip-down of The contract specification for the generating plant should the engine, and inspection and replacement of worn or allow for the provision of those spare parts recommended defective parts.

by the supplier to be immediately available for maintenance purposes. Such spares should therefore be
provided upon handover to the user.

References
Other spare parts, to be ordered as necessary, should be 1
Electricity Act 1989 Chapter 29 (London: Her Majesty’s detailed in the spares section of the operating and main-Stationery Office) (1989)
tenance manual. This should include all references and sources where these can be obtained, together with
2
Electricity Safety, Quality and Continuity Regulations 2002
Statutory Instruments 2002 No. 2665 (London: The Stationery ordering information.

Office) (2002)
3
BS 7430: 1998: Code of practice for earthing (London: British 4.2.8.5
Maintenance contract
Standards Institution) (1987)
4
Recommendations for the connection of private generating plant to the Serious consideration needs to be given at an early stage of Electricity Boards’ generating system Electricity Association the contract to the ongoing maintenance responsibilities.

Engineering Recommendation G59/1 (London: The Electricity Association) (1991)
The building owner/main tenant may already have
5
Notes of guidance for the protection of private generating sets up to suitably qualified and experienced engineering staff 5 MW for operation in parallel with PES distribution networks capable of carrying out the necessary maintenance
Electricity Association Engineering Technical Report ETR113
activities.

(London: The Electricity Association) (1995)
6
Energy efficiency in buildings CIBSE Guide F (London: A serious alternative would be to negotiate a maintenance Chartered Institution of Building Services Engineers) (2004) contract with the generator set supplier. This may be preferred whether or not the building owner/main tenant 7
BS EN 60034-2: 1999: Rotating electrical machines. Methods for determining losses and efficiency of rotating electrical machinery from has also own in-house engineering staff. It is likely to be tests (excluding machines for traction vehicles) (London: British particularly beneficial where there is a multi-set instal-Standards Institution) (1999)
lation.

8
BS 5000: Rotating electrical machines of particular types or for particular applications: Part 3: 1980 (1985): Generators to be driven 4.2.8.6
Periodic maintenance
by reciprocating internal combustion engines (London: British Standards Institution) (1985)
Generating plant, in particular the engine system, requires 9
BS ISO 3046-1: 2002: Reciprocating internal combustion engines.

regular attention to ensure reliability, optimum perform-Performance. Declarations of power, fuel and lubricating oil ance and long life.

consumptions, and test methods. Additional requirements for engines for general use (London: British Standards Institution) (2002) All maintenance procedures should be fully in accordance 10
The Electricity at Work Regulations 1989 Statutory
with the generator set operating and maintenance instruc-Instruments 1989 No. 635 (London: Her Majesty’s Stationery tions. A maintenance log book should be established upon Office) (1989)
accepting the plant after commissioning. This should 11
A code of practice for designers, installers and users of generating sets include a full record of hours-run readings and a summary ABGSM TM3 (Redhill: Association of British Generating Set of all servicing and repairs carried out, together with fuel Manufacturers) (1985)
and lubricating oil consumption totals.

12
The Health and Safety at Work etc. Act 2002 (London: Her Majesty’s Stationery Office) (2002)
Whatever the mode of operation, the generating plant must operate when called upon to do so. Failure of the battery starting system will prevent the generator set starting and hence this needs regular and frequent
Bibliography
checking.

Electrical services: supply and distribution Health Technical Memorandum HTM 7 (London: Department of Health and Social Security/Welsh Periodic maintenance recommendations from the supplier Office/HMSO) (1977)
will normally cover routine checks on a frequent basis Emergency electrical services Health Technical Memorandum HTM 11
(possibly after 100 hours of use or at monthly intervals) (London: Department of Health and Social Security/Welsh depending upon various operating factors.

Office/HMSO) (1974)
5-1
5
High voltage distribution
5.1


Introduction

—
BS 3941: Voltage transformers( 16)
—
BS 5207: Specification for sulphur hexafluoride for The primary reason for the transmission of power at high electrical equipment( 17)
voltage (HV) is an economic one. The power loss in a cable is a function of the square of the current carried, as given
—
BS 5311: HV alternating current circuit breakers( 18) by the formula:
—
BS 5992 (IEC 60255): Electrical relays( 19)
P = I 2 × Z
(5.1)
—
BS 6480: Impregnated paper-insulated lead or lead L
c
alloy sheathed cables of rated voltages up to
where P is the power loss (W), I is the current carried in 33 000 V( 20)
L
the cable (A) and Z is the impedance of the cable (Ω). By c
—
BS 6553: Guide to the selection of fuse links of HV fuses increasing the voltage and, hence, reducing the current, for transformer circuit applications( 21)
the power loss is reduced and the transmission efficiency improved.

—
BS 6622: Cables with extruded cross-linked
polyethylene or ethylene propylene rubber insulation for In this section, consideration is given to system design rated voltages up to 19/33 kV( 22)
and to the selection and installation of equipment and
—
BS 6626: Maintenance of electrical switchgear and cables. Consideration is also given to the calculations controlgear for voltages above 650 V and up to and involved in assessing fault levels and the protection including 36 kV( 23)
necessary to deal with over-current and earth faults.

—
BS 6878: HV switchgear and controlgear for industrial use. Cast aluminium alloy enclosures for gas-filled HV
switchgear and controlgear( 24)
5.2
Standards
—
BS 7197: Performance of bonds for electric power cable The main standards that apply to
terminations and joints for system voltages up to HV switchgear and
cables are as follows:
36 kV( 25)
—
BS EN 50187: Gas-filled compartment for
—
BS 7315: Wrought aluminium and aluminium alloy
AC
switchgear and controlgear( 1)
enclosures for gas-filled HV
switchgear and
controlgear( 26)
—
BS EN 60129: Specification for alternating current disconnectors and earthing switches( 2)
—
BS 7835: Armoured cables with extruded cross-linked polyethylene or ethylene propylene rubber insulation for
—
BS EN 60255: Electrical relays( 3)
rated voltages up to 19/33 kV having low emission of
—
BS EN 60265: Specification for
smoke and corrosive gases when affected by fire( 27).

HV switches( 4)
—
BS EN 60282: HV fuses. Current limiting fuses( 5)
—
BS EN 60298: AC metal-enclosed switchgear and
5.3
Typical operating voltages
controlgear( 6)
—
BS EN 60420: Specification for HV AC switch-fuse Electrical supplies are generally distributed at a number of combinations( 7)
standard voltages, typically 400 kV, 275 kV, 132 kV, 33 kV
—
BS EN 60470: HV alternating current contactors and and 11 kV. This is discussed in section 4.1.

contactor-based motor starters( 8)
However, in some parts of the country other voltages may
—
BS EN 60644: Specification for HV fuse-links for be provided by the Regional Electricity Company (REC) motor control applications( 9)
e.g. 20 kV, 6.6 kV, 3.3 kV. The reasons for this are mainly
—
BS EN 60694 : Common specifications for HV switch-historical due to older equipment (particularly trans-gear and controlgear standards( 10)
formers) being installed and the cost of replacement to provide a standard voltage being prohibitive.

—
BS EN 61330: HV/LV prefabricated sub-stations( 11)
—
BS EN 62271: HV switchgear and control gear( 12) In general, the building services engineer is unlikely to be involved with voltages greater than 11 kV.

—
BS 159: Busbars and busbar connectors( 13)
—
BS 923: Guide on HV testing techniques( 14)
The selection of the most appropriate voltage will depend upon:
—
BS EN 60044-1: Instrument transformers. Current
transformers( 15)
( a)
the voltage available from the REC
5-2
Electricity in buildings
( b)
the load capacity requirement
—
Standby substation: This substation is provided to control standby generators if they feed energy into
( c)
the general nature of the load and load profile i.e: the HV distribution network.

—
constant
The relative functions of these types of substations is
—
motor starting
shown in Figure 5.1. Different types of substation may be
—
harmonic generation.

combined in a single location.

5.4.1.2
Location of substations
5.4
HV system design
Intake substation
An HV distribution system is used in preference to an LV
distribution system because of the following advantages: If the intake substation is to be the only substation on site then it should be placed as near to the load centre as ( a)
For the same electrical load the current require-
possible. This is because LV cabling is much more
ment is significantly reduced. Typically, 1000 kV·A
expensive than HV cabling. Other considerations are: of AC power at 400 V, 3-phase equates to a balanced
—
the point of supply of the electricity supply
load of 1443 A per phase but only 52 A at 11 kV.

company (usually the Regional Electricity
( b)
Because of ( a) above, it is possible to use smaller Company (REC))
diameter, lower cost, cables when power is trans-
—
access requirements
mitted at higher voltages. Typically, a balanced
load of 1000 A would require two 240 mm2 copper
—
any physical restraints.

conductors per phase at 400 V (assuming buried,
XLPE-insulated, multi-core cables) but only a
If the intake substation is part of a large network with single 25 mm2 (the minimum standard size
many distribution substations, then its location is of less available) 3-core cable at 11 kV.

importance. In this case it should be sited at a point for ( c)
The voltage drop along the distribution system is
easy access for the point of supply from the electricity reduced and is a smaller fraction of the initial
supply company.

voltage
Distribution substation
( d)
The power losses in the transmission system are
reduced.

The ideal positions for distribution substations are at the load centres that they serve.

Disadvantages of using HV as a distribution system are: ( a)
increased danger because of the higher voltage
Standby substation
( b)
the need for a higher level of insulation, which is
more expensive
The standby substation has the control circuit breakers for the standby generator sets and should therefore be sited as ( c)
higher levels of training required to install and
near to the standby generators as possible.

maintain the equipment.

The first step in designing a distribution system is to 5.4.2
Distribution methods
establish the magnitudes and locations of loads. Having established these, the designer should identify the number Where HV distribution is used within a site, various and locations of switchrooms and substations. Since LV
arrangements are possible. What is best for any particular distribution is generally more expensive (per kV·A
project will be influenced by the magnitude, location and carried) than HV distribution, and problems with voltage importance of the loads. The eventual choice will be an drop appear if the LV cable runs become too long, it is economic one, based on the costs to the consumer of the often better to have too many substations than too few.

loss of electrical supply to a particular area, weighed against the cost for the provision of the increased
redundant electrical capacity.

5.4.1
Substations
The design of the system should be kept as simple as possible; simple and straightforward systems are easier to 5.4.1.1
Types of substation
operate and less expensive to maintain.

If an HV distribution network is being used then it will The design should also consider the expected expansion of consist of the following types of substations.

the site. If the area is restricted, future development is
—
Intake substation: This substation is the point of unlikely and the HV distribution system provided will be incoming supply from the electricity supply
on a ‘once and for all’ basis. However, if areas are available company.

within the site for further development, the long term plans for these areas should be ascertained and the HV
—
Distribution substation: This substation is the point system configured to accommodate possible future expan-of distributing the electrical energy to the load
sion. A decision taken at this stage will affect the site for centres.

some 20 or 30 years to come on the basis that the HV
High voltage distribution
5-3
Standby
generator
Standby
substation
Distribution
sub-stations
Intake
substation
Figure 5.1 Schematic arrange-
ments of substations serving an
industrial site to illustrate
11 kV incoming supply
11 kV incoming supply
different substation types
distribution system is a long-term infrastructure
where security of supply is not particularly important. As provision.

the size of the site or building increases or where the load increases, it will be necessary to provide additional sub-There are two basic methods of distributing loads on HV
stations as radial supplies.

systems. These are ‘radial feeders’ and ‘ring mains’. These are illustrated in Figures 5.2 and 5.3 respectively. In each Radial circuits are the easiest to design and cheapest to case, it is assumed that the local REC will provide a 3-phase install, but they do not provide the provision of alternative supply at 11 kV and terminate this in HV switchgear that is methods of supply that ring mains can offer.

part of the REC’s network.

5.4.2.1
Radial feeders
The arrangement shown in Figure 5.2 is the one that the building services engineer is most likely to encounter in a LV switch panel,
4-core LV cable
typical project where the REC provides the substation. The air circuit breaker
simple radial system shown consists of only one sub-
or moulded case
11 kV/416 V transformer
station, which incorporates both the incoming supply and circuit breaker with
protection relay
the distribution switchgear. In this arrangement, the REC
3-core HV cable
switchgear is usually a ring main unit (as their supply is likely to be taken from an HV ring circuit) incorporating isolating switches on the ring main and a fuse switch or Fuse or circuit
circuit breaker for the consumer. If the ring main unit is breaker
located adjacent to the transformer, no additional HV
isolation is required. However, if the transformer is located at a distance from the supply switchgear, a local HV ring main
isolating switch should be installed at the transformer.

unit
11 kV ring main
The arrangement shown in Figure 5.2 is suitable for
installations which the supply serves only one building or Figure 5.2 Radial HV distribution system
5-4
Electricity in buildings
The type of switchgear used for this type of distribution circuit becomes two radial circuits but it permits simple will dependent on the size of the load that is being reconfiguration of each side of the ring by changing the supplied. If the load is less than 1000 kV·A and there is no open point of the circuit.

standby generation then the normal method of supply is by fuse switches or ring main units because of their cost This type of network, when compared with a radial
advantage over circuit breakers.

service, gives improved speed of restoration of service in the event of a fault and more flexibility when carrying out If the load of the distribution centres is greater than maintenance.

1000 kV·A and if there is standby generation then the switchgear required will usually be circuit breakers.

When selecting the location of the open point of the ring the following points need to be considered:
5.4.2.2
Ring mains
—
the importance of the individual distribution
substations
Where more than two substations are installed on radial
—
the load on each side of the open ring
circuits, consideration should be give to connecting the substations into a ring circuit. This provides the user with
—
the cable length involved between distribution
the ability to isolate items of switchgear or sections of the substations.

circuit for maintenance without losing the supply to all the loads.

If there were to be a fault on one of the cables in the ring, the supply circuit breaker serving that side of the ring There are two types of ring mains, open or closed. The would trip. This would result in the loss of supply to all system that is chosen will depend on the level of security the distribution substations between the circuit breaker that the distribution system is being designed for.

and the open point in the ring. When the location of the fault is identified, the faulty part of the ring main can be isolated and, by moving the open point of the circuit, the Open ring main
other substations re-energised.

Figure 5.3 illustrates an open ring main using ring main units.

Closed ring main
With an open ring system, all of the substations are A closed ring main is illustrated in Figure 5.4. In this connected together in a ring configuration but one of the system, substations use circuit breakers for protection and switches in the ring is left open. Effectively, the ring control.

One leg of ring main 'open'
at distribution substation
All switches closed
All switches closed
A
B
Non directional protection
relays at A and B
Figure 5.3 Open ring main HV
11 kV incoming supply
11 kV incoming supply
distribution system
High voltage distribution
5-5
A closed ring main is where the intake and distribution 5.4.3
Design of substations
substations are connected in a ring configuration and all the switchgear is closed. However, as each substation is fed The design, layout and size of a substation is primarily from both directions of the ring main, it is necessary to determined by the type and extent of equipment that is provide sophisticated unit protection against over-current being installed. Manufacturers’ dimensional data should and fault currents that can flow in either direction around be consulted to ensure that adequate space is provided.

the ring main, depending on the location of the fault. This is discussed in more detail in section 5.6.7
The cubicle switchgear in an indoor substation will
normally be sited in a panel. The minimum clearance
With the closed ring main, all the switchgear used will be around this panel should be 800 mm. However, it is
circuit breakers. Under normal conditions they will all be normal to have a clearance of 2000 mm at the front of the
‘on’, unless they have interlocking devices (standby panel to allow the truck part of circuit breakers to be breakers). On each of the circuit breakers, network
withdrawn and maintained, and for access in front of the protection equipment will be fitted to isolate any faulty circuit breakers with the panel doors open and the circuit piece of apparatus in the event of a fault. For example, if there were a fault in one of the interconnecting cables breaker trucks rolled out.

then the two connecting circuit breakers at either end would be automatically disconnected, isolating the faulty It is also normal practice for HV cables to be installed in piece of equipment only.

trenches, rising into the back of the HV switchgear.

Cubicle HV switchgear is generally designed for this The network protection system (unit protection) on each installation method although the switchgear manufacturer of the circuit breakers is interconnected by a signalling can usually provide other cable arrangements for switch-cable between the substations.

gear located in a basement where cables are installed at high level.

Switching of HV systems must only be carried out by HV-authorised persons (see section 5.7.1) who have the
The minimum width of a cable trench should be 600 mm.

necessary training and experience to safely operate these The depth of the trench should depend on the finished systems. In view of the cost of providing such personnel, ground level outside and inside the building but it should this function is often contracted to a specialist HV
be deep enough to cater for the bending radius of the contractor or to the local REC.

cables. The trench should be protected by covers made of metal or hardwood. Hardwood covers have the advantage that, if they were to fall into the trench, they would do less damage to the cables than steel covers.

Direction protection
All switches closed
relays on all HV
switches
P
P
Pilot wire
P
P
P
P
All switches closed
All switches closed
P
P
Directional protection
relays on all HV switches
to protect ring
Figure 5.4 Closed ring main HV
11 kV incoming supply
11 kV incoming supply
distribution system
5-6
Electricity in buildings
Where an oil filled transformer is specified (see section 6),
—
Safety signage should be provided in accordance
precautions should be included against the possibility of with statutory regulations.

an oil leak. This should include appropriate bunded areas and provision for safely pumping any spilt oil.

Outdoor substation
Typical layouts for distribution substations are shown in To ensure that the design of an outdoor substation is section 7, Figure 7.7.

adequate the following items need to be considered:
Where space is limited, it may not be appropriate to
—
A concrete slab should be laid to support the
separate the HV switchgear, transformer and LV switchgear weight of the equipment. The slab should be
but rather to combine them in a composite unit called a smooth and level. Around the slabs should be open
packaged substation. In this arrangement, the HV and LV
pits with cable access to them. The pits should be
switchgear are connected directly to the terminations of of sufficient size to completely absorb the total
the transformer using short busbar connections instead of volume of oil in any switchgear or transformers.

cables, the whole installation being installed within a After the substation has been installed and cabled
common enclosure. Packaged substations should comply the pits should be filled with 10–20 mm grade
with BS EN 61330(11).

shingle. Space around the transformer and switch-
gear should permit the removal of the shingle in
5.4.2.3
Environmental considerations
the event of an oil spill.

—
The substation should have a surrounding fence or
Indoor substation
wall. This is a requirement of the Electricity,
Safety, Quality and Continuity Regulations 2002(28)
To ensure that the design of an indoor substation is for all new substations.

adequate the following items need to be considered:
—
External power sockets should be installed to aid
—
The floor should be smooth and level and it
maintenance personnel in the use of lighting or
should be so constructed that it can support the
power tools. The sockets should be in a lockable
total weight of the equipment being installed
enclosure.

(including the provision for future expansion).

Where appropriate, a structural engineer should be
consulted.

5.5
HV switchgear
—
Adequate access should be provided for installing
and removing the largest transportable item of
equipment.

HV switchgear is provided to:
—
enable an
—
Lifting beams should be provided.

HV network to be broken down into
smaller sections for maintenance
—
It is not advisable to install a window in a
substation as it could aid unauthorised access.

—
provide circuit protection
Ventilation should be provided by louvres
—
isolate faulty pieces of apparatus.

installed in the walls or doors.

—
The ends of all cable ducts should be sealed after
The basic types of HV switchgear are:
the cables have been installed. Where ducts enter
—
circuit breakers
buildings the seal should form a barrier against oil, gas, water, fire and attack by vermin.

—
oil switches
—
External doors should preferably open outwards to
—
switch fuses (or fuse switches)
a free access area of hard standing.

—
ring main units
—
A substation should have an emergency exit which
—
isolators.

should be secured by panic bolts only.

—
Each substation should have general electrical
services, consisting of:
5.5.1
Circuit breakers
( a)
general and emergency lighting
A circuit breaker is a switching device which is capable of ( b)
heating
making, carrying and breaking currents under normal
circuit conditions and also making, carrying for a
( c)
ventilation
specified time and breaking currents under specified ( d)
a main earth bar which has the substation
abnormal conditions such as a short circuit.

earth and the HV earth connected
The standards for circuit breakers are defined in BS
( e)
general socket outlets.

5311(18). The main differences between different manu-
—
In the substation the ambient temperature should
facturers of circuit breakers is the type of arc suppression.

be maintained between 10 °C and 35 °C. This is
On making or breaking a circuit an arc will be drawn important if a transformer is sited in the sub-between the fixed and moving parts of the circuit breaker.

station because of the large amount of heat that it
The size and duration of the arc is determined by the can dissipate.

medium within which the switching occurs.

High voltage distribution
5-7
At one time, oil was the predominant insulation medium However, ring main units are generally unable to
in circuit breakers due to its low cost and high availability accommodate system protection relays and are therefore and a considerable number of oil-filled circuit breakers limited in their ability to provide sophisticated system continue in use throughout the country. In the 1970s, oil protection.

was overtaken in popularity by vacuum and sulphur
hexafluoride (SF ) switchgear as the cost of this equip-6
ment fell and the electricity supply industry embraced this 5.5.5
Isolators (disconnectors)
new technology. However, SF has been found to be
6
ozone-depleting and considerable care should be taken in An isolator is a device that is capable of opening or closing its specification and use.

a circuit either when negligible current is broken or made, or when no significant change in the voltage across the A circuit breaker can carry out the following duty
terminals of each of the poles of the isolator occurs. The functions, but it can only carry a fault current for a device has no making or breaking capacity. The current specified time:
standard for isolators and earthing switches is BS EN
—
make ‘normal’ current
60129(2).

—
carry ‘normal’ current
5.5.6
Ancillary equipment
—
break ‘normal’ current
—
make ‘fault’ current
HV switchgear can be provided with a variety of ancillary
—
carry ‘fault’ current
equipment and features as described in the following sections.

—
break ‘fault’ current.

5.5.6.1
Auxiliary switches
5.5.2
Oil switches
These are switches that work in conjunction with the An oil switch is a device that is suitable for making a main phase contacts of an HV switch to control a circuit for circuit in oil under normal and fault conditions and is also operating auxiliary devices. The switches are low current capable of breaking a circuit in oil under normal
and low voltage devices which are operated by the same conditions. This device can perform the same duties as a mechanism as the main switch.

circuit breaker except for being unable to break the circuit under fault conditions.

5.5.6.2
Earthing
Switches are fitted with earthing facilities to enable the HV switchgear is usually provided with facilities to enable cable side to be earthed. The arrangement is integral and either the main busbar or the outgoing circuit to be the earthing switch has the same rating as the main
connected to earth for the purpose of making either safe.

contacts of the switch.

The methods used for earthing are as follows:
The switches normally have a mechanical arrangement on
—
Use of a specially designed earthing truck which
the operating handle to prevent the switch being directly replaces the circuit breaker and is located into
switched on and then off immediately.

position and closed to earth either the main busbar
or outgoing circuit.

5.5.3
Oil switch fuses (or fuse switches)
—
Fitting of special earthing gear. These are purpose
made items which are first connected to a suitable
These devices are the same as oil switches with the
earth point and then connected to the main busbar
addition of
or circuit spouts.

HV high rupturing capacity (HRC) fuses to give
a fault breaking capacity. They are normally used for the
—
Integral earthing where the HV switch itself is
protection of distribution transformers up to 1000 kV·A.

moved to an alternative position within its
housing to connect to earth either the main busbar
Oil switches and switch fuses are extendible and can be or the outgoing circuit as required.

connected together to form any combination required for a distribution substation.

5.5.6.3
Auxiliary transformers
5.5.4
Ring main units
HV switchgear can be fitted with protective devices and metering etc. The supplies for these are provided from This is a standard unit which consists of incoming and voltage or current transformers fitted to the switchgear.

outgoing oil switches supplying a common busbar, and one or two outgoing fuse switches to provide power to Voltage transformers (VTs) have a secondary voltage of dedicated loads.

110 V and the primary voltage to suit the supply voltage.

The transformers will normally be oil-immersed, with star Ring main units provide a very economic solution to
wound HV and LV, both windings being fused. On the LV
providing HV switchgear in substations and are frequently side it is normal for the yellow phase to have a linked used by RECs. They are suitable for external use, thereby connection to earth and the neutral fused. The standard often avoiding the cost of a substation enclosure.

for VTs is BS 3941(16).

5-8
Electricity in buildings
Current transformers (CTs) normally have a secondary conditions, the DC current value of the fault would
rating of 1 A or 5 A and the primary rating dependent on have decayed away. Therefore when considering
the load. Separate CTs are provided for protection and the breaking capacity of a circuit breaker it is
measurement, the protection CTs having a higher accuracy normal to consider only the AC component.

rating. The standard for current transformers is BS EN
Therefore the rated short circuit current (
60044-1(15).

RSCC) is
equal to the RMS value of the AC component of the
rated short circuit breaking current. The standard
5.5.6.4
System protection
ratings are 6.3 kA, 8 kA, 10 kA, 12.5 kA, 16 kA,
20 kA etc. It is essential that HV switchgear is
Over-current and earth fault protection are usually
selected with the correct RSCC to ensure that no
provided by either electronic relays or time-limit fuse mechanical damage occurs in the event of a fault.

links operating trip coils in the circuit breaker.

Historically, electromechanical relays were used to provide ( f)
Rated short time making current: the peak value of this protection. Whilst many electromechanical relays are the maximum current (including DC) that the
still in service, their use has generally been superseded by circuit breaker is capable of making and carrying
electronic equivalents.

instantaneously at the rated supply voltage. BS
5311(18) requires that the rated short time making
Circuit breakers are designed to accommodate system pro-current of a circuit breaker shall be the rated short tection relays and are therefore used by system designers circuit breaking current multiplied by 2.5.

where distance protection or complex local protection is ( g)
Duration of short current: the period of time for required. Ring main units are normally fitted with simple which the circuit breaker, when closed, can carry a
protection on the outgoing circuit, based on a time
current equal to its rated short circuit breaking
delayed fuse.

current. These are normally expressed in kA for
one second.

System protection is dealt with in more detail in section 5.6.

( h)
Closing mechanisms: with a circuit breaker there are four types of closing mechanisms; these are
classified by the method of achieving the power
5.5.7.

HV switchgear selection
required to complete the closing operation. The
four types are as follows:
5.5.7.1
Circuit breakers
—
Dependent manual or hand closing: this is a closing operation by hand without the use
The rating of circuit breakers is specified in BS 5311(18) of any stored or other supply of energy.

and is given in the following terms:
The speed of closure is therefore depen-
(a)
Service voltage: the upper limit of the highest dant on the speed of the operator.

voltage of the systems for which the circuit
This type of circuit breaker is no longer
breaker is intended. The BS standard ratings are
manufactured although they are frequently
3.6 kV, 7.2 kV, 12 kV and 13.8 kV.

found on existing systems. Due to the
( b)
Insulation level: the maximum voltage that the possible destructive consequences of the
switchgear can withstand for a short time under
contacts being closed/opened slowly, warn-
fault level.

ings to that effect should be fitted onto the
equipment and consideration should be
( c)
Frequency: normally 50 Hz.

given to the replacement of the equipment.

( d)
Normal current: the RMS value of the current which
—
Independent manual closing: this is a closing the circuit breaker shall be able to carry continu-operation by hand in a single operation in
ously without deterioration under the prescribed
which energy supplied during the initial
conditions. The normal BS ratings are 400 A,
part of the operation is used to close the
500 A, 630 A, 800 A, 1250 A.

circuit breaker independent of the
( e)
Short circuit breaking current: the current that the operator. The energy is usually that of a
circuit breaker can break at the stated voltage. The compressed spring.

breaking capacity determines the maximum fault
current that the circuit breaker can break. Under
—
Spring assisted: this is a form of closing by fault conditions the current that flows in a distri-hand where springs are compressed by one
bution system is made up of two components:
operation and their energy is released by a
separate later operation to close the
—
a symmetrical AC component: the level of
contacts. This is one of the commonest
this is determined by the amount of power
types of circuit breaker found on HV distri-
available and the network impedance
bution systems.

—
a DC component: this is caused by the
—
Power closing: this is where the circuit
discharge of the magnetic energy into the
breaker is fitted with a solenoid closing
fault and will be of short duration.

mechanism. Closure of the circuit breaker
It is not easy to determine the value of the DC
can be remote. This type of circuit breaker
component because it depends on the value of the
is commonly used in large installations
instantaneous voltage at the time of the fault. Also such as industrial and defence establish-by the time a circuit breaker operates under fault
ments.

High voltage distribution
5-9
5.5.7.2
Switches
—
the impedance of the network from source to the
point of the fault
BS EN 60265(4) gives details for the service, definitions,
—
the impedance of the fault
design and construction, type and testing of HV switches.

—
the voltage at the time of the fault
Normally the parameters used in selecting switches are:
—
any stored energy within the HV network.

—
service voltage
—
normal current
In addition, the type of fault will have an effect on the calculation as there are several ways in which faults can
—
number of poles, normally three
occur. These include:
—
frequency, normally 50 Hz
—
phase to earth
—
breaking current: the current that exists at the
—
phase to phase
instant of contact separation expressed as an RMS
value
—
phase to phase to earth
—
making capacity: the current that a switch is
—
phase to phase to phase.

capable of making and carrying instantaneously at
the rated voltage.

These represent a large number of variables and so it is normal to assume the worst case; i.e. that the fault has negligible impedance and is a three-phase symmetrical 5.5.7.3
Fuse switches, switch fuses and ring
short circuit (phase to phase to phase).

main units
The calculation of a three-phase short circuit current is These are selected on the same basis as switches except for given by the formula:
the addition of the HRC fuse.

MVA × 103
s
I = ————–
(5.2)
sc
5.6
System protection
V × 1.732
where I is the maximum prospective short circuit current sc
5.6.1
Need for system protection
(kA), MVA is the fault level at the point of supply (MV·A) s
and V is the voltage (kV).

When a fault occurs in any electrical system, the energy that flows as a consequence usually has the potential to The fault level at the point of supply can be obtained from damage equipment and cables. In certain circumstances, it the supply authority although, for public network HV
can also endanger life, either through electrocution or by supplies, a maximum value of 250 MV·A is normally
consequential fire.

advised by RECs.

To minimise the damage and disruption caused by
Having assessed the fault level at the intake to the network electrical faults, protection must be provided that will being considered, the fault level at different points around isolate that part of the system in which the fault has the network can be calculated. To calculate the fault level occurred. This protection can be provided by various accurately, the vector sum of the impedances between the types of fuses and relays, as discussed later in this section.

supply and the fault have to be known but this cannot However, before protection equipment can be selected, it always be found because items such as transformers give is necessary to carry out an assessment of the anticipated percentage impedance.

fault levels in the network.

Therefore it is normal to use percentage impedance when Advances in computer-aided design have produced
calculating fault levels. To do this all figures have to be excellent software for the calculation of fault currents and converted to a common kV·A rating, known as a base
the selection of protective devices. However, it is
kV·A value (KVA ). This can be any figure but 1000 kV·A b
important to understand the underlying principles prior or the relevant transformer size is usually selected for ease to adopting a software-based approach.

of calculation.

The formulae for calculating the percentage impedance for 5.6.2
Fault calculations
the various items of plant are as follows.

The fault level should be determined at various locations For the source:
within the electrical network to ensure that the switchgear and cable which are provided can withstand the energy of
×
a fault without damage or degradation.

KVA
102
b
Source impedance reactance (%) = ————–
MVA × 103
It is usual to express the fault level in
s
HV and LV networks
(5.3)
in terms of MV·A at the supply voltage. The fault level will depend on:
where KVA is the base kV·A value (kV·A) and MVA the
b
s
—
the power available from the source
fault level given by the supply authority (MV·A).

5-10
Electricity in buildings
For cables:
50 mm2
2 x 400 mm2
3c XLPE
1c XLPE/SWA/PVC
KVA ( X l) × 105
b
Cable impedance reactance (%) = ————–——
1·5 m
25 m
V 2
11 000 V
800 kV·A
LV
supply
11 000/416 V
switch
(5.4)
250 MV·A
4·75%
board
where KVA is the base kV·A value (kV·A), X is the imped-Figure 5.8 A typical HV/LV radial circuit
b
ance per unit length of the cable (Ω·m–1), l is the length of the cable (m) and V is the phase-to-phase voltage (V).

XLPE/SWA/PVC cable has an impedance of 0.110 × 10–3 ohms/m.

A 25 metre length of paralleled cable will have a
Equation 5.4 applies for both the HV and LV cables.

percentage impedance of:
For a transformer:
1 800 × 0.11 × 10–3 × 25 × 105
LV cable imp. = — × ————–———————
2 4162
KVA × Z
b
Transformer impedance reactance (%) = ———––
TR
= 0.636%
(5.5)
Total impedance is:
where Z is the normal reactance of the transformer (see Total imp. = 0.32 + 0.005 + 4.75 + 0.636 = 5.71%
section 6.4.8) (%) and TR is the transformer rating (kV·A).

From equation 5.6, the fault level at the LV switchboard is: The fault level is given by:
800 × 102
= ————– = 14.01 MV·A
KVA × 102
MVA
b
f
5.71 × 103
MVA = ————–——————
(5.6)
f
Total % impedance × 103
Hence, the maximum short circuit current is:
where MVA is the fault level (MV·A) and the total
f
percentage impedance reactance is the sum of the source, 14.01 × 103
I = ———–—– = 20.22 kA
transformer and cable percentage impedance reactances (%).

sc
400 × 1.732
From this, the short circuit current (kA) at the fault will It can be seen from the calculation that the transformer be:
impedance has the greatest effect on the prospective fault level and the size and length of cables have the least effect.

MVA × 103
f
I = ———–—
(5.7)
On the basis of the calculation, the designer must ensure sc
V × 1.732
that the LV switchgear is cable of withstanding a short circuit current in excess of 20.22 kA for the duration of the fault to prevent any damage or danger arising from such a Example: fault level calculations
fault. In addition, the switchgear must incorporate
protection devices in the HV and LV switchgear to safely Consider the simple HV/LV network shown in Figure 5.8
isolate any fault that occurs in the shortest possible time.

To simplify the calculation, select the base level to be the same as the transformer. Therefore:
5.6.3
Discrimination
800 × 102
Discrimination is the ability of protective devices to detect Source impedance = ———— = 0.32%
and correctly respond to a fault condition, so that the 250 × 103
faulty circuit or apparatus is isolated with the minimal From manufacturer’s cable data, 50 mm2
disruption to any other electrical circuits or apparatus.

XLPE/SWA/PVC
cable has an impedance of 0.505 × 10–3 Ω·m–1. Therefore, a 15-metre length of cable will have a percentage impedance Two methods used to obtain discrimination are:
of:
—
Time grading: where the protective devices are selected and set to operate faster the further they
800 × 0.505 × 15 × 10–3 × 105
are from the source of supply. This is also known
HV cable imp. = ————–———————–
as unrestricted protection.

11 0002
—
Unit protection: where the protection is only given
= 0.005%
to the apparatus with which the protective device
is associated. This is also known as restricted
800 × 4.75
protection.

Transformer imp. = ————– = 4.75%
800
Discrimination needs to be designed to ensure that
protective devices operate under all condition of over-Using two single core 400 mm2 copper cables in parallel per current (i.e. phase-to-phase) faults and phase-to-earth phase, from manufacturer’s cable data, each 400 mm2
faults.

High voltage distribution
5-11
5.6.3.1
Time graded protection systems
—
a TLF in series with an HRC fuse should have a time
differential of 0.2 seconds
The types of HV devices used in time graded protection
—
an HRC fuse in series with an HRC fuse should
systems are:
achieve discrimination by comparing the ‘let-
—
high rupturing capacity (HRC) fuses
through’ energy of each HRC fuse, which is
available from the manufacturers. The total energy
—
AC trip coils fitted with time limit fuses (TLFs)
required to operate the smaller fuse should be less
—
inverse definite minimum time (IDMT) relays.

than the pre-arcing energy of the larger fuse
—
a
The types of
TLF in series with another TLF is not recom-
LV devices used in time graded protection
mended because there are problems in obtaining
systems are:
the necessary discrimination at high values of fault
—
high rupturing capacity (HRC) fuses
level.

—
inverse definite minimum time (IDMT) relays
The time separations given above should be obtained over
—
moulded case circuit breakers.

the complete operating curve up to the likely fault level.

Originally, IDMT relays were of the electromechanical type 5.6.3.2
Discrimination across HV/LV
using a rotating disc to operate contacts. The relays were transformers
available in three time–current characteristics (standard, very inverse and extremely inverse), the curves for which were defined by the relevant British Standard in force at An LV fuse or IDMT/MCCB characteristic can be plotted on the time. In the event that a different characteristic was an HV discrimination grading chart by making allowances required, it was necessary to change the relay for one of a for the differences in voltage (i.e. divide the LV current by different characteristic.

11 000/416). This method is acceptable for a three-phase fault on the LV side but problems can occur because a two-Static protection relays began to be introduced in the phase fault on the LV side will be approximately 0.866 of 1970s. These perform the same function as the electro-the equivalent current on the HV side.

mechanical relays but operate with a greater degree of accuracy and allow characteristic changes to be made Therefore when checking the discrimination between the without the need to replace the relay.

HV and LV for a two phase fault it is normal to:
—
Plot the HV
fuse characteristics on the
The time–current characteristic for each protective device time–current grading chart.

in series in a circuit is entered on a discrimination grading chart such as that shown in Figure 5.9, and the relay
—
Draw the LV device characteristics plus 10%
settings adjusted as necessary to ensure that discrim-multiplied by 0.866, and check that the LV device
ination is achieved. Modern circuit protection software is is below the HV fuse at the fault level. (10% is
available that automatically generates these character-added because the characteristics are the mean
istics.

values for the devices, but the devices can operate
within ±10% of these mean characteristics.)

However, where a designer chooses to carry out the
assessment manually, it is normal to use the following When designing an installation it is possible to calculate time separation in obtaining the necessary time intervals the maximum fuse/relay that it is possible to install on the between protective devices:
LV side of the distribution.

—
a relay in series with another relay should have a
The maximum LV device can be selected by ensuring that time differential of 0.4 seconds
the LV device operating time is less that the HV fuse or
—
a relay in series with the new cartridge type of TLF
relay operating time, i.e:
should have a time differential of 0.4 seconds
—
a relay in series with an
HV fuse current
HRC fuse should have a
LV device operation < ——————–
(5.9)
time differential of 0.2 seconds
0.05
10 000
The figure 0.05 has been selected because it is
MCCB
approximately equal to the fuse tolerance (1.1) times the 1000
LV ACB
LV fault factor (1/0.866) times the transformation ratio (416/11000).

100
HV fuse
10
5.6.4
High rupturing capacity (HRC)
Time / s
MCB
fuses
1
High voltage HRC fuses are normally fitted in switch fuses 0·10
or fuse switches for the protection of transformers up to 0·01
the maximum rating of:
0.01
0.1
1
10
100
1000
—
11 kV, 1000 kV·A
Current / kA (at 400 V)
Figure 5.9 Protection grading chart
—
6.6 kV, 500 kV·A
5-12
Electricity in buildings
—
3.3 kV, 300 kV·A
Busbars
Generally an HRC fuse is only suitable for fault protection because of the difference between its current rating and its minimum fusing current. Typically, the minimum fusing current for an HRC fuse is 11/2 to 2 times the rated current for the fuse.

Time fuse link
If a fuse is required to carry for any long period a current greater than its rated current, but less than its minimum fusing current, deterioration may occur which could result in unwanted or incorrect operation at a later time.

Overcurrent
Earth
fault
In selecting a suitable fuse, consideration should be given to the following factors:
—
maximum load current
Time fuse link
—
transformer magnetising in-rush current (the
actual values of in-rush currents are impossible to
predict because of the instantaneous value of the
voltage at the time of switch-on; a general figure
Overcurrent
used in designing a network is that the fuse should
withstand an in-rush of 10 times the full load
current for 0.1 seconds)
—
the fuse should protect the installation, consisting of the
Disconnectable
HV cable, HV/LV transformer and the LV
earth link
cabling.

Current
When specifying fuses it is important to state the medium transformers
in which the fuses will be required to operate, i.e. air or Cable box
oil.

Figure 5.10 Connection of over-current trip coil and time limit fuse When looking to replace or install a fuse for the first time, mechanism. The solenoid or over-current trip coil is the following items need to be considered:
instantaneous in operation for all currents in excess of the
—
the current rating
coil rating. The device is given an inverse time characteristic by having the TLF in parallel. The fuse connected
—
the system voltage
in parallel has a low impedance and so carries most of the
—
the system fault level
current from the current transformer (CT) and prevents the coil from operating until the fuse ruptures.

—
the time–current characteristics of the fuse
—
the I 2 t characteristics of the fuse The manufacturers of time limit fuses publish time–current characteristics which can be multiplied by the CT ratio to
—
if a striker pin is required
give the time–current characteristics for the circuit breaker
—
the physical dimensions of the fuse
fitted with the TLF fuse.

—
the maximum size of fuse that the switch fuse can
hold
5.6.6
Inverse definite minimum time
—
if replacing a ruptured fuse then all three phase
(IDMT) relays
fuses should be replaced.

IDMT relays are normally fitted to circuit breakers which supply:
5.6.5
Trip coils and time limit fuses (TLF)
—
distribution transformers
Over-current trip coils are normally fitted on circuit
—
incoming supply
breakers which supply:
—
generator supply
—
radial feeders
—
ring feeders in open ring configuration.

—
ring feeders in open ring configurations
The
—
transformer feeders up to 1000 kV·A.

IDMT relays can provide just over-current or over-
current and earth fault protection, just like the TLFs and trip coil devices. However greater adjustment is available The basic connection of an over-current trip coil and time of the operating characteristic.

limit fuse is shown in Figure 5.10
Other facilities on the
The device consists of the
IDMT relay are:
TLF in parallel with a trip
solenoid which has a central plunger. The plunger is
—
instantaneous settings: where the relay operates arranged to operate the circuit breaker tripping
instantaneously on any current above the setting
High voltage distribution
5-13
—
definite time setting: where the relay will operate for flow through the pilot wires and so the trip coils will not a definite time for any current in excess of the
operate.

instantaneous current setting.

If there is an internal fault in the cable section, the current With all the terms now defined a standard table can be flowing through each circuit breaker will be different. The used when carrying out the grading of IDMT relays.

voltage generated by the two CTs will be unbalanced and current will flow through the pilot wires causing the trip When determining the time–current characteristics for coils to operate and open the supply circuit breakers.

the IDMT relay the following information is required: The systems which use this principle are Solkor A, Solkor
—
the circuit breaker rating
B and Translay.

—
the CT ratio.

5.6.7.3
Circulating current relays
From this information, the maximum current I is defined n
and, from this figure, switches are set on the relay to select Again, these relays are designed to protect a particular the required protection curve to provide discrimination cable section on a distribution system. The relay only with downstream protective devices.

operates if there is a fault in the cable section that the relay is protecting.

5.6.7
Unit protection
The trip coils are connected in parallel to the CTs at a Unit protection works on the principle that if the current point that is at the same potential from each CT.

entering and leaving the apparatus is the same then the apparatus is considered healthy. If there is a difference in Under normal conditions or for through faults, the
the two current readings, the apparatus is considered to current generated in each CT is equal and, as the trip relay have a fault. As unit protection systems are stable they is connected to the electrical midpoint, no current flows.

have low trip settings and fast operating times. Some types Therefore the trip relay does not operate.

of unit protection are:
If there is an internal fault in the cable section the current
—
restricted earth fault relays
flowing through each circuit breaker will be different.

—
balanced voltage relay
Therefore the current generated by the two CTs will be unbalanced and so the trip coil will no longer be at the
—
circulating current relay.

electrical midpoint. Therefore the trip coil will operate and so disconnect the supply circuit breakers. This is Unit protection is a relatively specialist subject and is illustrated in Figure 5.11.

unlikely to be encountered by the building services
engineer.

A system which uses the circulating current principle is the Solkor R relay.

5.6.7.1
Earth fault protection
Earth fault protection is designed to operate for current levels less than full load, when there is a fault between any phase and earth.

Where the CTs of the earth fault relays are connected determines the zone of protection that the earth fault relay R
provides. The two types of earth fault protection are:
—
restricted earth fault protection: the protected zone is (a)
the windings of either a transformer or an
alternator
—
unrestricted earth fault protection: the zone of protection is all the external wiring down stream
of the CT connection.

5.6.7.2
Balance voltage relays
R
These relays are designed to protect a particular cable (b)
section on a distribution system. The relay only operates if there is a fault in the cable section that the relay is Figure 5.11 Basic arrangements for unit protection; (a) current protecting.

distribution with ‘through fault’, (b) current distribution with ‘in-zone fault’ resulting in unequal currents from current transformers Considering the closed ring arrangement in Figure 5.4, under normal conditions or for through faults the voltage generated by the relay CTs at each end of the cable will be equal but opposite in direction. Therefore no current will
5-14
Electricity in buildings
5.6.8
Intertripping of HV and LV
circuit breakers
It is recommended that, on supplies over 1 MV·A, a
system of intertripping be incorporated into the electrical design. Depending on the type of supply it may be
beneficial to provide this arrangement on smaller sized supplies. The idea behind intertripping is to ensure that 1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
the HV breaker does not close onto a live system.

1 Conductor
4 Copper tape
7 Sheath
2 Insulation
5 Fillers
8 Armour
This requirement is normally carried out with auxiliary contacts on the circuit breaker, relays and ‘send’ and 3 Insulation screen
6 Tape binder
9 Sheath
‘receive’ signalling cables. Using this arrangement, when Figure 5.12 Construction of a typical HV cable the HV circuit breaker trips (under fault etc.) a signal is sent which also trips the LV breaker on the other side of armouring and a low smoke, zero halogen outer sheath.

the transformer. Similarly, if the LV breaker trips (under The cable would be rated for a phase-to-phase voltage of fault etc.) then a signal is sent to trip the HV breaker.

11 kV.

Cables are often identified by a four-letter code that 5.7
HV cables
identifies the number of conductors, the conductor type, the type of screen and whether the cable is armoured.

Table 5.1 gives details of different cables that can be used 5.7.1
Cable construction
for HV installations. This table is not exhaustive and cable manufacturers should be consulted for advice on cables for HV cables are produced in a wide variety of types to suit specific applications.

various applications. The construction of a typical HV
cable is shown in Figure 5.12, which illustrates the various layers as follows:
5.7.2
Selection of cables
( a)
A conductor core of stranded copper or solid
aluminium in standard sizes of cross-sectional area
The cables should be selected by using manufacturers’
(
design information and considering the following factors: CSA). Manufacturers’ cable data should be
consulted for the current carrying capacities of the
—
operating voltage
different cable sizes.

—
normal full load current
( b)
Insulation of either cross-linked polyethylene,
(
—
prospective short circuit fault rating,
XLPE), cross-linked ethylene propylene rubber
(EPR), polyvinyl chloride (PVC) or paper impreg-
—
derating factors due to:
nated with insulating compound. XLPE is usually
specified for normal industrial applications as this ( a)
thermal resistivity of soil
has a higher operating temperature than PVC.

( b)
ground temperature
However, EPR may be required where the cable is
continuously subject to wet conditions.

( c)
ambient air temperature
( c)
Semiconducting insulating screen.

( d)
depth that the cable is to be installed
( d)
Metallic screen of overlapped copper tape to
( e)
grouping and proximity of other cables
provide an earth fault current path. In some types
—
prospective fault current and the type of system
of cable, this layer comprises a lead sheath
protection
( e)
Filler to form a circular section.

—
voltage drop
( f)
Bedding sheath of PVC.

—
degree of mechanical protection required and the
( g)
Armouring of galvanised steel wires or tape to
method of installation
provide mechanical protection and an earth fault
—
overall diameter, flexibility and minimum bending
current path.

radius
( h)
An oversheath of PVC, reduced flame propagation
—
type of termination.

PVC (RPPVC), low smoke zero halogen compound
(LS0H) or medium density polyethylene (MDPE).

MDPE is specified where greater permeability to
5.7.3
Testing of cables
moisture and greater resistance to abrasion is
required but this type of sheath is not recom-
All HV cables need to be pressure tested prior to
mended in areas of fire risk.

commissioning and after repairs or alterations. Such testing must be undertaken by an HV ‘authorised person’, Thus a typical cable may be specified as 3 × 70 mm2 Cu, see section 5.8.1.

XLPE, CTS, PVC, SWA, LS0H, 11 kV. This cable would have three copper conductors of 70 mm2 CSA with XLPE
The pressure test should only be carried out after an insulation, a copper tape screen, PVC bedding, steel wire insulation test (1000 V) has been carried out between each
High voltage distribution
5-15
Table 5.1 Types of cable used in HV installations Designation
Cable description
Relevant
standard
—
Copper or aluminium conductor, paper insulated, screened, lead alloy sheathed, BS 6480(20)
single wire armoured with/without serving, PVC oversheath
—
Copper or aluminium conductor, paper insulated, belted, lead alloy sheathed, BS 6480(20)
single wire armoured with/without serving, PVC oversheath SCTA
Single core, copper conductor, XLPE/EPR insulated, copper tape screened, single BS 6622(22)
wire armoured, PVC/RPPVC/LS0H/MDPE oversheath
TCTA
Three-core, copper conductor, XLPE/EPR insulated, copper tape screened, single BS 6622(22)
wire armoured, PVC/RPPVC/LS0H/MDPE oversheath
SATA
Single core, aluminium conductor, XLPE/EPR insulated, copper tape screened, BS 6622(22)
single wire armoured, PVC/RPPVC/LS0H/MDPE oversheath TATA
Three-core, aluminium conductor, XLPE/EPR insulated, copper tape screened, BS 6622(22)
single wire armoured, PVC/RPPVC/LS0H/MDPE oversheath SCTU
Single core, copper conductor, XLPE/EPR insulated, copper tape screened, IEC 502(33)
unarmoured, PVC/RPPVC/LS0H/MDPE oversheath
TCTU
Three-core, copper conductor, XLPE/EPR insulated, copper tape screened, IEC 502(33)
unarmoured, PVC/RPPVC/LS0H/MDPE oversheath
SATU
Single core, aluminium conductor, XLPE/EPR insulated, copper tape screened, IEC 502(33)
unarmoured, PVC/RPPVC/LS0H/MDPE oversheath
TATU
Three-core, aluminium conductor, XLPE/EPR insulated, copper tape screened, IEC 502(33)
unarmoured, PVC/RPPVC/LS0H/MDPE oversheath
SCWU
Single core, copper conductor, XLPE/EPR insulated, copper wire screened, BS 6622(22)
unarmoured, PVC/RPPVC/LS0H/MDPE oversheath
TCWU
Three-core, copper conductor, XLPE/EPR insulated, copper wire screened, BS 6622(22)
unarmoured, PVC/RPPVC/LS0H/MDPE oversheath
conductor, and each conductor and earth. It is normal When the test is finally completed, care should be taken to practice for this test to be carried out for a duration of not ensure that the cable has discharged prior to handling the less than one minute.

test connections. If tests are carried out via switchgear with earthing facilities, the cable should be discharged by The HV pressure test will use a DC voltage of the value connecting it to earth.

specified in BS 6480(20) and applies to paper insulated cables. The voltage must be applied and increased
Further information on testing is contained in section 12.

gradually to the full value and maintained at that value for 15 minutes.

When an HV pressure test has to be carried out on a
5.8
Safety aspects
mixture of old and new cables then the test voltage for the old cables should be used.

The Electricity At Work Regulations 1989(29) are designed to require precautions to be taken against the risk of death When testing cables the age of switchgear may limit the or personal injury from electricity in work activities.

maximum permissible test voltage. The test voltage for the cable should be compared with the maker’s recommen-Regulation 4, which is split into four parts, covers the dations for the switchgear and the lower test voltage of the aspects of electrical systems and equipment which are two applied.

fundamental to safety.

Tests on cable should normally always be carried out with When working on HV it is necessary to ensure that
a double isolation. If it is impracticable to achieve this personnel have the necessary experience and training for then the following should be followed:
the tasks that they are required to perform. It is normal to distinguish such staff as authorised and competent
—
The test voltage must not exceed the value
persons.

specified for old cables.

—
All access to live equipment must be locked off
and danger notices displayed.

5.8.1
Authorised person (AP)
—
Should a breakdown occur then no further tests
An authorised person should have the following qualifi-should be carried out until the cable or equipment
cations and qualities:
has been completely isolated with a double break.

—
be technically competent
—
If double isolation is available but at only one end, then the test should be applied at the end with
—
be familiar with the electrical distribution system
double isolation.

for which he/she is authorised
5-16
Electricity in buildings
—
have adequate training on the system and work
—
the receipt of any operational restriction notices
which he is required to perform
(e.g. notices that highlight/advise of possible
defects with equipment).

—
been appointed by a suitably qualified HV engineer
—
be able to recognise danger
5.8.4
Permit to work
—
be familiar with first aid, including resuscitation
—
be familiar with the site/organisation, electrical
A permit to work should be issued whenever work is being safety rules and relevant electrical legislation
carried out on HV equipment. Before the work is carried
—
be methodical and level headed.

out, the equipment should be:
—
isolated from the supply
5.8.2
Competent person (CP)
—
securely locked off so that it cannot be energised
—
tested to ensure that the equipment is dead
A competent person should have the following qualifications:
—
earthed
—
have sufficient technical knowledge and experi-
—
have ‘CAUTION — DO NOT INTERFERE’ warning
ence to avoid danger
notices placed where the equipment is isolated
—
be competent for the duties to be performed
—
have ‘DANGER — LIVE APPARATUS’ warning notices
placed on live adjacent equipment.

—
been appointed by a suitably qualified HV engineer
—
be familiar with first aid, including resuscitation.

The permit to work should clearly indicate the following:
—
the date and time that it was issued
5.8.3
Access and control of work
—
the competent person that it was issued to
—
the authorised person in charge of the substation
All substations on a site should be under the control of an authorised person (
who issued the permit to work
AP) and all work to be carried out in
the substations must be addressed to the AP.

—
the address, location and identity of the equipment
to be worked on
The AP should be aware at all time of any work that is being carried out in a substation under his/her control.

—
the location and identity of where the equipment
The
has been isolated
AP should control the access to the substation and
should have the power to refuse entry to the substation to
—
the location of where the equipment is earthed,
any person, regardless of position or status, who does not and whether the earth can be removed for testing
have a valid reason for entry.

—
the locations where ‘DANGER’ or ‘CAUTION’ notices
When a substation is unattended it should be kept locked.

are displayed
No person other than an authorised person, or a com-
—
the work or test which is to be carried out on the
petent person working under the direct control of an AP, piece of equipment
should carry out any work on any HV equipment; and then only when the AP in charge of the substation where the
—
the signatures of both the issuing AP and receiving
work is to be carried out has been notified and given CP stating that they understand the work that is
his/her permission.

being carried out and that they confirm that the
equipment is safe to work on
When contractors are employed to carry out work on HV
—
an area where the permit can be signed-off, giving
equipment, the contractor must appoint authorised and competent persons to carry out the work. At all times details that the work has been completed
these persons must ensure that the safety regulations are
—
details of any other permits in existence in the
complied with.

vicinity of the work being undertaken.

A new installation should be considered to be a substation on reaching the stage of completion where any part of the 5.8.5
Safety equipment
equipment is, or could be energised by normal operation of the equipment and this results in a potential exceeding Safety equipment should be provided and regularly tested 650 V (phase-to-earth) being developed within the
in accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions, and equipment.

available at all times to the persons requiring it.

No person should carry out work on HV equipment alone.

Safety equipment should always be worn and used
whenever necessary to avoid danger. Safety equipment A log book should be provided to record the following: should include, rubber gloves, rubber mats and isolation
—
all switching operations
padlocks.

—
the issue and cancellation of all permits to work
Safety equipment should be inspected by the user for
—
the handover of system responsibility from one
visible defects every time that it is used. Any suspect item authorised person to another
should be withdrawn and replaced.

High voltage distribution
5-17
Safety equipment should be stored in accordance with the (14)
Never work on any HV equipment after the permit
manufacturer’s recommendations.

to work has been cancelled.

5.8.6
Earthing equipment
5.9
Operation and
Only the earthing equipment provided by the equipment maintenance
manufacturer should be used. The equipment should be tested before use.

5.9.1
General
5.8.7
Testing equipment
The Electricity at Work Regulations 1989(29) cover
maintenance under Regulation 4(2). These require that: A suitable HV indicator, voltage tester or other equipment should be used to ensure that equipment is dead. The test ( a)
maintenance is carried out in order to ensure the
equipment should be tested by using a proving unit before safety of the system
and after use.

( b)
the quality and frequency of maintenance is
sufficient to prevent danger
5.8.8
Safety rules to be used when
( c)
records of maintenance is kept through out the
working life of an electrical system
working on HV
( d)
regular inspection of plant is carried out.

The following rules must be observed when working on Planned maintenance is essential to ensure continuity of HV installations:
service and economy of labour and material. BS 3811: (1)
People are responsible for their own safety and the
Maintenance terms in terotechnology(30) gives a combination safety of those around them.

of management financial, engineering and other practices (2)
There is always time for safety. Never take risks to applied to physical assets in pursuit of economic life cycle save time.

costs.

(3)
Never work without a valid permit to work.

The complete planned maintenance and operation system (4)
Never rely on the word of somebody else, see for
should embrace the following:
yourself.

—
a detailed list of local instruction, which itemises how to perform switching operations and testing
(5)
Never work alone.

operations to make a piece of equipment dead and
(6)
Refuse to carry out work that you consider
safe to work on
dangerous, that you do not understand or that you
—
a job sheet, which provides information on the
have not been trained for.

work to be done
(7)
Danger signs and barriers are put there as a
—
a planning chart, which provides overall planning
warning; do not interfere with them.

of the work
(8)
Never leave an unlocked substation unattended.

—
a permit to work, which issues orders for the work
(9)
Make sure that you fully understand the work to
to be done.

be performed.

The frequency and details of maintenance requirements (10)
Ensure that rubber mat are in position in all places will depend on the manufacturers’ recommendations.

where work is to be performed.

Additional information on the inspections, operational (11)
Remove any metal or loose objects from pockets
checks and examination of HV switchgear can be obtained before work commences.

from BS 6626(23).

(12)
Always remember the basic principles when
working on HV equipment:
5.9.2
Maintenance period
—
MAKE SURE IT IS DEAD: by discon-
necting the equipment to be worked on
The safety of people and buildings depends on the correct from the load and from the supplies.

operation of equipment such as protection relays, circuit breakers and automatic fire extinguishing systems. This
—
MAKE SURE IT IS DEAD: by testing at
essential equipment must be regularly maintained, and all points that have been or could have
details of the work recorded.

been live. Use an HV indicator to prove that
the equipment is dead. Afterward confirm
The following routine intervals may help as a general your findings with an earthing stick.

guide for maximum values and they can be shortened at the discretion of a suitably qualified
—
MAKE SURE THAT IT STAYS DEAD:
HV engineer following
consideration of such items as:
by earthing down at the point of work.

—
the environmental conditions
(13)
Ensure that every operation, test or check is
observed by another AP or CP.

—
the degree of normal use
5-18
Electricity in buildings
—
the number of operations under fault conditions
References
—
historical information on the most appropriate
1
BS EN 50187: 1997: Gas-filled compartments for a.c. switchgear maintenance period.

and controlgear for rated voltages above 1 kV and up to and including 52 kV (London: British Standards Institution) (1997) Every 13 weeks:
2
BS EN 60129: 1994 (IEC 60129: 1984): Specification for
—
Check
alternating current disconnectors and earthing switches (London: HV accommodation.

British Standards Institution) (1994)
—
Check safety equipment and tools.

3
BS EN 60255: Electrical relays (16 parts) (London: British
—
Inspect
Standards Institution) (1995–2003)
LV control battery unit.

4
BS EN 60265: Specification for high-voltage switches; Part 1: 1998
—
Check and record instrument readings.

(IEC 60265-1: 1998): Switches for rated voltages above 1 kV and
—
Visually inspect all equipment externally for signs
less than 52 kV (London: British Standards Institution) (1998) of distress/deterioration.

5
BS EN 60282: High-voltage fuses: Part 1: 2002: Current-limiting fuses (London: British Standards Institution) (2002) Every 52 weeks:
6
BS EN 60298: 1996 (IEC 60298: 1990): AC metal-enclosed
—
Check fire suppression system (if installed).

switchgear and controlgear for rated voltages above 1 kV andd up to and including 52 kV (London: British Standards Institution)
—
Inspect and operate circuit breakers or fuse
(1996)
switches.

7
BS EN 60420: 1993 (IEC 60420: 1990): Specification for high-
—
Inspect and operate
voltage alternating current switch-fuse combinations (London: LV switchgear associated with
British Standards Institution) (1993)
transformer output.

8
BS EN 60470: 2001 (IEC 60470: 2000): High-voltage alternating
—
Inspect transformers and HV cubicles.

current contactors and contactor-based motor starters (London: British Standards Institution) (1990)
—
Clean out any air cooled transformers.

9
BS EN 60644: 1993 (IEC 60644: 1979): Specification for high Every 156 weeks:
voltage fuse-links for motor circuit applications (London: British Standards Institution) (1993)
—
Test HV earth electrode system.

10
BS EN 60694: 1997 (IEC 60694: 1996): Common specifications for
—
Test transformer oil.

high-voltage switchgear and controlgear standards (London: British Standards Institution) (1997)
—
Check protection equipment
11
BS EN 61330: 1996 (IEC 61330: 1995): High-voltage/low-voltage prefabricated substations (London: British Standards Institution) Every 312 weeks:
(1994)
—
Pressure test automatic fire extinguishing system.

12
BS EN 62271: High-voltage switchgear and controlgear (4 parts) (London: British Standards Institution) (2001–2004)
—
Examine oil circuit breakers and change oil.

13
BS 159: 1992: Specification for high-voltage busbars and busbar
—
Examine vacuum circuit breakers.

connections (London: British Standards Institution) (1992)
—
Examine SF circuit breakers.

6
14
BS 923: Guide on high-voltage testing techniques: Part 1: 1990
(IEC 60060-1: 1989): General (London: British Standards
—
Examine oil filled switches and change oil.

Institution) (1990)
When working normally on
15
BS EN 60044-1: 1999 (IEC 60044-1: 1996): Instrument HV equipment, ensure that:
transformers. Current transformers (London: British Standards
—
only suitably qualified personnel operate the
Institution) (1990)
equipment
16
BS 3941: 1975: Specification for voltage transformers (London:
—
all safety warning notices are complied with, and
British Standards Institution) (1975)
that all enclosures are closed and all covers in
17
BS 5207: 1975: Specification for sulphur hexafluoride for electrical place
equipment (London: British Standards Institution) (1975)
—
all operatives are trained to recognise indications
18
BS 5311: 1996: High-voltage alternating-current circuit-breakers (London: British Standards Institution) (1996)
of mal-operation or malfunction and are aware of
the actions to take in the event of such indications.

19
BS 5992: Electrical relays: Part 1: 1980 (IEC 60255-0-20: 1974): Specification for contact performance of electrical relays; Part 4: 1983 (IEC 60255-14:1981): Specification for contact loads of When personnel are carrying out maintenance operations preferred values used in endurance tests for electrical relay contacts; they should:
Part 5: 1983 (IEC 60255-15: 1981): Specification for test equipment
—
comply with all safety working procedures
used in endurance tests for electrical relay contacts; Part 6: 1984: Specification for the basic modules for the dimensions of general
—
be fully conversant with all information on
purpose all-or-nothing relays (London: British Standards measures relating to personnel safety
Institution) (1980–1984)
20
BS 6480: 1988: Specification for impregnated paper-insulated lead
—
ensure that work is only carried out on the
or lead alloy sheathed electric cables of rated voltages up to and equipment for which a permit to work has been
including 33 000 V (London: British Standards Institution) issued.

(1988)
High voltage distribution
5-19
21
BS 6553: 1984 (IEC 60787:1983): Guide for selection of fuse links 27
BS 7835: 2000: Specification for armoured cables with extruded of high-voltage fuses for transformer circuit applications (London: cross-linked polyethylene or ethylene propylene rubber insulation for British Standards Institution) (1984)
rated voltages from 3.8/6.6 kV up to 19/33 kV having low emission of smoke and corrosive gases when affected by fire (London: British 22
BS 6622: 1999: Specification for cables with extruded cross-linked Standards Institution) (2000)
polyethylene or ethylene propylene rubber insulation for rated voltages from 3.8/6.6 kV up to 19/33 kV (London: British Standards 28
The Electricity Safety, Quality and Continuity Regulations Institution) (1999)
2002 Statutory Instruments 2002 No. 2665 (London: The Stationery Office) (2002)
23
BS 6626: 1985: Code of practice for maintenance of electrical switchgear and controlgear for voltages above l kV and up to and 29
The Electricity at Work Regulations 1989 Statutory
including 36 kV (London: British Standards Institution) (1985) Instruments 1989 No. 635 (London: The Stationery Office) (1989)
24
BS 6878: 1988 (EN 50052: 1986): Specification for high-voltage switchgear and controlgear for industrial use. Cast aluminium alloy 30
BS 3811: 1993: Glossary of terms used in terotechnology (London: enclosures for gas-filled high-voltage switchgear and controlgear British Standards Institution) (1993)
(London: British Standards Institution) (1988)
31
IEC 60502: Power cables with extruded insulation and their 25
BS 7197: 1990: Specification for performance of bonds for electric accessories for rated voltages from 1 kV (Um = 1,2 kV) up to 30 kV
(Um = 36 kV): Part 1: 2004: Cables for rated voltages of 1 kV (Um power cable terminations and joints for system voltages up to 36 kV
= 1,2 kV) and 3 kV (Um = 3,6 kV); Part 2: 1998: Cables for rated (London: British Standards Institution) (1990)
voltages from 6 kV (Um = 7,2 kV) up to 30 kV (Um = 36 kV); 26
BS 7315: 1990 (EN 50064: 1989): Specification for wrought Part 4: 1997: Test requirements on accessories for cables with rated aluminium and aluminium alloy enclosures for gas-filled high-voltage voltages from 6 kV (Um = 7,2 kV) up to 30 kV (Um = 36 kV) switchgear and controlgear (London: British Standards (Geneva: International Electrotechnical Commission)
Institution) (1990)
(1997–2004)
6-1
6
Transformers
6.1


Introduction

windings. Where the secondary voltage is lower than the primary voltage, the transformer is termed a ‘step-down’
The purpose of a transformer is to convert, i.e. transform, transformer; where the secondary voltage is higher than electrical energy from one voltage to a higher or lower the primary voltage, the transformer is termed a ‘step-up’
voltage with a corresponding decrease or increase in transformer.

current respectively.

The primary winding is that winding that is connected to Transformers are used in many applications from small the supply, irrespective of whether the transformer is of domestic products like televisions and hi-fi systems at the step-up or step-down type. The secondary winding is very low voltages to electrical transmission distribution always that winding that is connected to the load.

systems via overhead power lines at many hundreds of thousands of volts.

The transformer operates using the principle of electromagnetic induction. When an alternating voltage is
It is not the intention of this document to cover all applied to the primary winding, an alternating magnetic possible applications for transformers, rather those that flux is generated in the core. This in turn generates a are likely to be encountered by the building services voltage in the secondary winding. This principle applies engineer in the course of a typical, large project. Power whether the transformer is single phase (not a normal transmission transformers (i.e. those transforming
arrangement in building power systems) or three-phase.

voltages between 400 kV and 11 kV) are specialist in their The voltage generated is determined by the number of nature and will normally be specified and installed by turns in the primary and secondary windings. Increasing National Grid or a regional electricity company (
the number of turns in the secondary winding increases REC).

This section will, therefore, concentrate on power
the voltage produced.

transformers that are installed to convert a supply voltage of 11 kV received from a
Nearly all power transformers encountered in building REC to low voltage, or to convert
one low voltage to another.

power systems are three-phase units. These normally have the primary windings connected as a delta arrangement Transformers used for instrumentation, lighting and other with each phase of the incoming supply connected to two applications are considered to be outside the scope of this windings. Since the secondary loads on the transformer Guide.

are rarely balanced between phases, it is normal for secondary windings to be connected in a star configuration with each phase of the load connected to a single winding and for the other ends of the three winding to be 6.2
Fundamental principles
connected together and brought out as a neutral
of transformers
connection. This is shown diagrammatically in Figure 6.2.

The capacity of a power transformer is defined by the full-A transformer consists essentially of a magnetic core built load power, in kV·A, that it can produce. For single-phase up of steel laminations, upon which are wound two sets of transformers, this is expressed as:
coils for each phase, suitably located with respect to each other, and termed the primary and secondary windings S = U
I
× 10–3
(6.1)
respectively, see Figure 6.1.

ph
ph
where S is the full load power (kV·A), U
is the secondary
The number of turns within each coil will determine the ph
(no-load) voltage (V) and I
is the rated output current
voltage ratio between the primary and secondary
ph
(A).

Primary/secondary coils
Primary
Secondary
1
1
Phase
numbers
Phase
numbers
N
2
3
Laminated core
2
3
Figure 6.1 Magnetic circuit design for a typical 3-phase transformer Figure 6.2 Diagrammatic representation of a delta-star transformer
6-2
Electricity in buildings
For three-phase transformers, this is expressed as:
minations are usually bought out on opposite sides of the assembly.

S = U
I
× 10–3 × √3
(6.2)
ph
ph
The complete assembly is mounted on a support frame
The values for voltage and current in star- and delta-that either forms the roller base for dry-type units or tank connected three-phase windings are as follows.

spacer for liquid-filled units. Manufacturing techniques vary considerably between liquid-filled units and dry-type For star connection:
transformers but their object or purpose is identical.

S × 10–3
Phase current = ————
(6.3)
√3 × U ph
6.4
Transformer specification
U ph
Phase voltage = ——
(6.4)
To enable a manufacturer to design and construct a trans-
√3
former, it is necessary for the specifier to provide/confirm where S is the rated power (kV·A).

the following information:
—
design and construction standards
For delta connection:
—
type of transformer
I
S × 103
ph
Phase current = —— = ————
(6.5)
—
method of insulation and cooling
√3 √3 × U ph
—
transformer rating
Phase voltage = line voltage = U
(6.6)
—
vector group
ph
—
primary and secondary electrical supplies
A power transformer is not a perfect transmission device and suffers both ‘iron losses’ and ‘copper losses’. Iron loss
—
transformer duty
is predominantly the energy required to sustain the
—
location
magnetic field, even when no current is being drawn in the secondary windings. Copper loss is the energy lost due
—
impedance
to the winding resistances. The efficiency of power
—
neutral and earthing arrangements
transformers is generally very high with losses typically less than 5%.

—
tappings
—
terminals and cable boxes
When specifying transformers, consideration should be given to the maximum demand in kV·A at which the
—
accessories and tank fittings
transformer is expected to operate, making due allowance
—
enclosures
for future load expansion. It should be noted that transformers are normally rated in kV·A at a power factor of 0.8.

—
testing requirements.

It is important to consider the size of the transformer in Expressing transformer details as described above gives relation to the harmonics that will be generated in the simplistic guidelines to provide rating, ratio, vector loads and that will consequently flow in the secondary reference, impedance, protection and cooling. An example windings. These can raise the neutral current to above the of this nomenclature applied to a typical external
rated value and produce a considerable heating effect.

1000 kV·A oil-filled transformer would appear as follows:
—
Rated power: 1000 kV·A
Information on the loads, anticipated load cycle and harmonics should be issued to the transformer manufac-
—
Ratio: 11 kV/416 V (primary winding/secondary turer as part of the specification. Current flowing in the winding)
windings creates internal heat and hence expansion of the
—
Vector group: Dyn11 (delta/star connected with windings. Where frequent load cycles are likely to occur neutral brought out and 30° phase shift)
(e.g. a large motor), the design of the transformer must
—
Impedance: 6%
take account of the stresses arising from frequent motor starts.

—
Protection: IP65
—
Cooling: AN (air natural)
—
Rated insulation level: 12 kV
6.3
Basis of construction and
—
Insulation system/class: O
operation
—
Haulage/lifting lugs: Yes
The design of a typical three-phase power distribution
—
Rollers: No.

transformer incorporates a laminated iron core of three vertical limbs surmounted by a top and bottom yoke. The Each of these items will be considered separately in the conductor windings, which can be either aluminium or following paragraphs.

copper, are concentrically wound to form a coil around each vertical limb. The whole assembly is held together A schedule of information that is required is included as between top and bottom core clamps. The HV and LV ter-Annex A of BS EN 60076-1(1).

Transformers
6-3
6.4.1
Standards
throughput power is transferred partly by conduc-
tion and partly by induction.

The selection, construction and use of power transformers Autotransformers are available as both star and
is covered by BS EN 60076: Power transformers(1), together delta units and provide a solution for either step-with a variety of standard specifications, as follows: up or step-down transformers. Autotransformers
—
BS EN 60044-1(2): current transformers
can have a cost advantage where the ratio of input
to output voltage is less than 5:1.

—
BS EN 60726(3): dry-type power transformers
( c)
Booster transformers: these are defined by BS EN
—
BS EN 60742/BS 3535-1(4): isolating transformers
60076-1(1), clause 3.1.3, as ‘a transformer of which
—
BS EN 61378(5): converter transformers
one winding is intended to be connected in series
with a circuit in order to alter its voltage and/or
—
BS EN 61558(6): safety of power transformers,
shift its phase. The other winding is an energising
power supply units and similar
winding.’ Their windings are electrically inde-
—
BS 171(7): power transformers
pendent; the additional power is transferred
purely inductively.

—
BS 3941(8): voltage transformers
Booster transformers are used in main distribution
—
BS 6436(9): ground mounted distribution trans-
and transmission systems to maintain a constant
formers
supply voltage on the electrical network. This is
achieved using motorised tap-changers which vary
—
BS 7452(10): separating transformers, autotrans-
either the primary or secondary voltage in
formers, and variable transformers and reactors
response to load demand.

—
BS 7628(11): combined transformers
The diagrammatic arrangements of these are shown in
—
BS 7735(12): loading of oil-immersed power
Figure 6.3.

transformers
—
BS 7821(13): three-phase oil-immersed distribution
transformers
—
BS 7844(14): three-phase dry-type distribution
A2
C1
B1
A1
a2
(a)
transformers
HV
—
IEC 60354(15): loading guide for oil-immersed
power transformers
b2
C2
B2
A2
c
—
IEC 60905(16): loading guide for dry-type power
2
b2
a2 yn
transformers.

C2
B2
HV
c
LV
LV
2
Prior to the introduction of BS EN 60076(1), the specifi-c1
b1
a1
cation for power transformers was BS 171(7), which has largely been superseded.

A3
C3
B3
A3 N
(b)
HV
6.4.2
Types of transformer
A2
C2
There are three main types of transformers that may be B2
encountered in buildings. These are:
C3
B3
LV
C2
B2
A2
( a)
Power transformers: these are defined by BS EN
60076-1(1), clause 3.1.1, as ‘a static piece of
400 or 275 kV
apparatus with two or more windings which, by
17
electromagnetic induction, transforms a system of
(c)
alternating voltage and current into another
system of voltage and current usually of different
values and at the same frequency for the purpose
16
15
of transmitting power.’ The windings of power
14
+5%
13
132 kV –15%
transformers are in parallel with the associated
12
11
15 pos.

systems. The transfer of power is solely by
10
9
M1 A1
A2
M2
induction.

8
5
Virtually all power transformers used in buildings
4
R1
R2
3
are of the delta-star configuration having delta-
2
connected primary windings and star-connected
secondary windings, the centre point of which is
N
I
earthed and connected as the neutral point for the
electrical system.

( b)
Autotransformers: these are defined by BS EN
E
60076-1(1), clause 3.1.2, as ‘transformers in which
Figure 6.3 Winding configurations; (a) delta-star transformer, at least two windings have a common part.’ The
(b) autotransformer, (c) booster transformer (1 phase shown)
6-4
Electricity in buildings
6.4.3
Insulation and cooling
alternative. Other synthetic liquids, such as Midel, with a fire point >300 °C may be encountered besides silicone For most applications in building services, either liquid-liquid.

filled or dry-type cast resin power transformers are the most commonly used. Such transformers are double
Cooling is absolutely necessary in any transformer as the wound, i.e. having one primary winding and one
losses from the core and windings are distributed as heat.

secondary winding.

Two types of cooling are offered:
—
AN: air through natural convection
The method of cooling is stated by the manufacturer in the form of four capital letters, the first two letters
—
AF: air forced via mechanical ventilators.

denoting the coolant and the manner of circulation for the winding, and the last two letters indicating the coolant All windings within liquid-filled units are cooled via the and manner of circulation for cooling the outside of the insulating medium to radiators, while the windings in transformer. For example:
dry-type cast resin units are directly cooled to air. The potential to increase the given rating of a particular
—
AN: dry-type transformer with natural air
transformer (possibly for high, short-duration loads) is circulation
15% uplift with liquid-filled units and 40% uplift with
—
ONAN: oil-immersed air-cooled transformer.

dry-type cast resin units. However, it is important for the specifier to agree the circumstances for such uplifts with Definitions of the code letters are given in Table 6.1.

the client/user during the design process, and to discuss how this is to be provided with the transformer supplier In the past, polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs) were used as (usually by forced ventilation).

an insulation medium in transformers and power factor capacitors. PCBs are a class of chlorinated hydrocarbons The heat generated by transformers can be considerable that have been used extensively since 1930 for a variety of and, where it is decided to locate transformers within industrial uses.

buildings, these units should be provided with appropriate ventilation to avoid overheating of the transformer and its The value of PCBs derived from their chemical inertness, surrounding space.

resistance to heat, non-flammability, low vapour pressure and high dielectric constant. However, PCBs have since been found to exhibit chronic toxicity and are suspected of 6.4.4
Rating
being carcinogenic such that their use has been
discontinued. PCBs have been supplied in commercial The size of a transformer is determined by its ‘rating’, formulations under a variety of trade names, including which is the product of the voltage and current that a Askarel, Pyrochlor, Ducanol
particular unit can handle. In small transformers this rating is given as V·A (‘volt-amps’) and in larger units as As a replacement for PCBs, silicone liquid was introduced kV·A (‘kilovolt-amps’). In the largest transformers the in the 1970s as a flame-retarding and non-polluting
rating is given as MV·A (‘megavolt-amps’).

Table 6.1 Four-letter codes for cooling systems designation Letter
Symbol
Description
( a) Oil-immersed transformers
First letter (identifies internal cooling
O
Mineral oil or insulating liquid with fire point ≤ 300 °C
medium in contact with windings)
K
Insulating liquid with fire point >300 °C
L
Insulating liquid with no measurable fire point
Second letter (identifies circulation
N
Natural thermosyphon cooling in windings
mechanism for internal cooling medium)
F
Forced oil circulation, but thermosyphon cooling in windings D
Forced oil circulation, with oil directed into the windings Third letter (identifies external cooling
A
Air
medium)
W
Water
Fourth letter (identifies circulation
N
Natural convection
mechanism for external cooling medium)
F
Forced circulation
Example: ONAN or OFAF
( b) Dry-type transformers
First letter (identifies internal cooling
A
Air
medium in contact with windings)
G
Gas
Second letter (identifies circulation
N
Natural cooling
mechanism for internal cooling medium)
F
Forced cooling
Third letter (identifies external cooling
A
Air
medium)
G
Gas
Fourth letter (identifies circulation
N
Natural convection
mechanism for external cooling medium)
F
Forced circulation
Example: AN or GNAN
Transformers
6-5
In principal, the transformer has two main determining winding is brought out, the indication is YN (yn) or ZN
factors to consider for a given application:
(zn) respectively.

—
the rating
To symbolise the phase difference between the primary
—
the voltage difference, commonly called the
and secondary windings, a clock number notation is used
‘voltage ratio’.

with 1 o’clock being 30 degrees leading, 2 o’clock being 60
degrees leading etc. The standard UK transformer
To assist in selection and sizing of power distribution arrangement is ‘Dyn11’, i.e a delta-connected HV primary, transformers, manufacturing and international standards a star-connected LV secondary brought out to a neutral have adopted a table of standardised transformer ratings.

connection and a phase displacement of 330 degrees
The preferred values of rated power (in kV·A), based on leading (30 degrees lagging).

ISO 3(17), are stated in BS EN 60076-1(1) as: 100, 125, 160, 200, 250, 315, 400, 500, 630, 800, 1000 etc.

With three-phase AC, the winding connections are
identified as follows:
The typical sizes of power transformers found in buildings
—
delta: D, d
have primary and secondary currents as defined in Table 6.2.

—
star: Y, y
—
interconnected star: Z, z
Table 6.2 Typical sizes of power transformers found in buildings
—
open: III, iii.

Rating / kVA
HV current / A
LV current / A
Impedance / %
315
17
455
4.75
In the case of more than one winding with the same rated 500
27
722
4.75
voltage, the capital letter is assigned to the winding with 630
34
909
4.75
the highest rated power; if the power ratings are the same, 800
43
1155
4.75
to the winding which comes first in the order of connec-1000
54
1443
4.75
tions listed above. If the neutral of a winding in star or 1250
67
1804
5.00
interconnected star is brought out, the letter symbols are 1600
86
2309
5.50
‘YN’ or ‘ZN’, or ‘yn’ or ‘zn’, respectively.

2000
108
2887
6.00
2500
135
3609
6.00
To identify the phase angle, the vector of the high-voltage winding is taken as a reference. The number, multiplied 3150
170
4547
6.00
3500
189
5051
6.00
by 30º denotes the angle by which the vector of the LV
winding lags that of the HV winding. With multi-winding Note: transformer ratio 11000 V/ 416 V; 50 Hz, three-phase, Dyn11
transformers the vector of the HV winding remains the reference; the symbol for this winding comes first, the other symbols follow in descending order according to the Care in the selection of all associated switchgear and windings rated voltages.

cables must be exercised as larger units can produce extremely high fault levels. These fault levels are a Power transformers are delta/star connected three-phase consequence of a short circuit and typically at 3500 kV·A units, normally operating at a vector shift of 30° having rating, the fault level may be in the region of 75 kA.

the star point connection bought out as the neutral
The formula for determining the fault level at the
connection. Typically this detail is simply written down as secondary terminals of a transformer is:
‘Dyn11’ and is the preferred UK standard vector group.

Fault level (kA) =
This and other examples of transformer notation are
shown in Figure 6.4.

Transformer rating (V·A) × 100
—————————––————
(6.3)
Sec. voltage (V) × impedance (%)
Apart from Dyn11 connections, the following are the most likely winding arrangements used in the UK power
A full examination of short circuit currents in 3-phase AC
distribution industry:
systems, including those in transformer circuits, is
—
Yyn0: for distribution transformers; the neutral
described in IEC 60909(18).

point can be loaded continuously up to 10% of the
rated current, or up to 25% of the rated current for a maximum of 1.5 hours (e.g. for connecting arc
6.4.5
Vector groups
suppression coils).

The vector group denotes the way in which the windings
—
Ynyn0: with compensating winding, used for large
are connected and the phase position of their respective system-tie transformers. The neutral point can be
voltage vectors. It consists of letters identifying the con-loaded continuously with the rated current.

figuration of the phase windings and a number indicating
—
Ynd5: intended for machine and main trans-
the phase angle between the voltages of the windings.

formers in large power stations and transformer
stations. The neutral point can be loaded with the
The convention for defining transformer arrangements is rated current. Arc suppression coils can be
defined in clause 6 in BS EN 60076-1(1). The star, delta or connected (delta winding dimensioned for the
zigzag connection of a set of phase windings of a three-machine voltage).

phase transformer are indicated by the letter ‘Y’, ‘D’ or ‘Z’
for the HV winding and ‘y’, ‘d’ and ‘z’ for the LV winding. If
—
Yzn5: for distribution transformers, used up to
the neutral point of a star-connected or zigzag-connected approx. 250 kV·A for local distribution systems.

6-6
Electricity in buildings
I
II
III
12
I
III
II
I
II
III
I
II
III
12
12
12
I
I
I
III
III
III
II
II
I
II
III
II
I
II
III
I
II
III
12
12
12
11
11
I
III
I
II
II
II
I
III
III
5
Dyn 11
YNyn0d5
YNad11
Figure 6.4 Transformer notation
The neutral point can be loaded with the rated
relatively consistent load will attain a constant tempera-current.

ture. However, in an installation where the loads are operated often for short periods and the transformer is
—
Dyn5: for distribution transformers above approx.

switched between high and low loads at frequent intervals, 315 kV·A, for local and industrial distribution
the transformer windings suffer considerable expansion systems. The neutral point can be loaded with the
and, if not sufficiently robust, can fail prematurely.

rated current.

—
Li0: for single-phase transformers, intended for
traction power supply or for three-phase banks
6.4.8
Location
with very high voltages and powers.

Technically, the location for transformers plays a large part in the type of unit supplied. Outdoor transformers at 6.4.6
Primary and secondary electrical
ground level tend to be oil-filled units which are the preferred option of the utility companies/network
supplies
providers. These are pad mounted units with either HV/LV
termination chambers or a closely coupled associated HV
In building services, the main consideration is for HV
disconnection device.

power distribution transformers, which effectively provide the correct current and voltage requirements for a
Other liquid-filled transformers may be used indoors but building or machine. Electricity network distribution careful consideration must be given to the fire/explosive from suppliers within the UK standardises all domestic potential for these types of transformers. Due to this applications to 230 V (single phase) or 400 V (three-phase) potential fire hazard, dry-type transformers are the and large commercial and industrial users to 11 000 V.

preferred solution for indoor use. The damp atmosphere in the UK further favours dry cast-resin units and these At extremely large industrial plants higher voltages are are now predominately used indoors but can be provided commonly provided. The 11 000 V standardised figure can if required with outdoor protection enclosures to IP44.

vary in a few instances between 6600 and 20 000 volts, depending on the distribution system voltage utilised by Where transformers are specified for use in countries the network providers.

other than the UK, particularly where intense direct solar radiation or high summertime temperatures occur, specific For clarity, voltage reference is always expressed as ‘no facilities such as sun screens may be required. In this load’. Voltage variation must take into account the
situation, the proposed location and anticipated ambient magnetising effect of the core in the transformer and this temperature should be advised as part of the information allowance is called the regulation. Therefore, for example, provided to the transformer manufacturer.

416 V no-load becomes 400 V on load.

6.4.9
Impedance
6.4.7
Transformer duty
The short circuit impedance is the sum of the reactance In specifying a transformer, it is important to consider the and resistance created in the windings of the transformer duty cycles to which the transformer will be subjected.

after voltage is applied. This impedance is further
Guidance on the loading of transformers can be found in expressed as ‘core losses’ (no-load losses) and ‘winding IEC 60354(15) and IEC 60905(16).

losses’ (load losses) and is given in watts or kilowatts.

When a transformer is subjected to load, the high currents The impedance of transformers is also expressed in
in the secondary windings cause heat to be produced in percentage values to enable fault level calculations to be the transformer windings. This, in turn, causes expansion carried out. Typical impedance values for various sizes of in the transformer. A transformer that is operated at a 11 kV/416 V transformers are as follows:
Transformers
6-7
—
500 kV·A: 4.75%
Continuous variation under load requires a special design with moving windings in the form of a rotary or moving-
—
800 kV·A: 4.75%
coil transformer.

—
1000 kV·A: 4.75%
—
1250 kV·A: 5.00%
6.4.12
Terminals and cable boxes
—
1600 kV·A: 5.50%.

Transformer connections are normally brought out to
terminals within cable boxes on the sides of the trans-6.4.10
Neutral and earthing
former. The location of the terminals varies between arrangements
manufacturers and the design of the transformer will determine whether the primary and secondary cable boxes Where star winding arrangements are specified, the centre are on the same or opposite sides.

point should be brought out to a neutral terminal, which should be earthed.

To enable the transformer manufacturer to provide the correct cable boxes, it is important that the designer In normal circumstances, the neutral connection will be confirms the following information:
solidly connected to the system earth but specific
—
size and type of cables
circumstances may dictate that the neutral be connected by alternative means. Where there is a requirement to
—
number of cables per phase
limit short circuit currents, the neutral connection should
—
direction of cables entering cable box.

be connected to earth through a current limiting reactor.

Where single core cables are to be used, insulated gland 6.4.11
Tappings
plates should be specified to avoid eddy currents.

Cable boxes should comply with the requirements of BS
Power distribution transformers operate in networks
7821(13).

where the high voltage power supplies can be above or below the nominal level. For this reason they are supplied with the facility to vary the nominal primary voltage by a 6.4.13
Accessories and tank fittings
system of switches as in the case of liquid-filled units or through a link board as supplied in dry-type units. This The designer should specify the accessories that are facility is called a ‘tap change’ and allows the nominal required on the transformer. These may include:
voltage to be adjusted typically by 2.5% and 5% above and below nominal voltage to deliver the correct low voltage
—
thermometer
requirement.

—
temperature contacts (usually 2-stage) for
initiating an alarm and tripping the
On power distribution transformers at 11 kV, this setting HV supply
of the links is undertaken in the de-energised state and is
—
lifting lugs
therefore known as ‘off-load tap change’. In larger
distribution transformers, mainly supplied to utility
—
rollers
companies, these tap changers can be motorised and
—
conservator to permit expansion on oil filled
operate without the necessity of de-energising the
transformers
transformer. This facility is called an ‘on-load tap change’
and allows distribution companies to switch between
—
Bucholtz relay for tripping the HV supply on
differing networks to maximise power usage.

detection of high oil pressure or gassing
—
breather with desiccator
The ability to vary the ratio is important particularly with main transformers. This facility is used for matching the
—
oil level indicator
service voltage in the event of load fluctuations, for load
—
filling arrangement
distribution or for adjusting active and reactive current in interconnected networks, and for voltage correction with
—
drain and sampling plug or valve.

electric furnaces, rectifier stations etc. In the simplest case this is done with the transformer dead, by altering the connection between winding sections with the aid of extra 6.4.14
Enclosures
winding terminals, known as ‘tappings’ (normally +4% or
+5%).

Liquid-filled transformers are manufactured with welded tanks and radiators that have an ingress protection (IP) Stepwise variation under load is done with a tap changer, rating, as defined by BS EN 60529(19), suitable for outdoor usually at the neutral-point end of the HV winding on location.

power transformers and at the series winding on booster transformers and autotransformers.

Dry-type and cast resin transformers are usually produced without enclosures (i.e. with an IP00 rating) and a suitable The tap changer, which connects the respective tappings enclosure should be specified where there is access to the while under load, basically consists of a load switch and a transformer. This is normally in the form of a louvered selector (or alternatively just a selector switch) with or steel enclosure with removable access doors. These should without preselection.

incorporate door contacts that are connected such that
6-8
Electricity in buildings
they trip the HV supply in the event that the access doors References
are removed while the transformer is live.

1
BS EN 60076: Power transformers: Part 1: 1997: General (London: British Standards Institution) (1997)
6.4.15
Testing
2
BS EN 60044-1: 1999 (IEC 60044-1: 1996): Instrument transformers. Current transformers (London: British Standards Completed transformers are subject to a number of tests in Institution) (1999)
accordance with the adopted standards for the design.

3
BS EN 60726: 2003: Dry-type power transformers (London: These tests prove design intent, load and voltage with-British Standards Institution) (2003)
stand capability, thermal ability and operational/functional requirements. Some tests are conducted as routine 4
BS EN 60742: 1996 and BS 3535-1: 1996: Isolating transformers and safety isolating transformers. Requirements (London: British and others are considered special. Routine tests are Standards Institution) (1996)
normally carried out at the manufacturer’s works and are referred to as factory routine tests. Other tests are 5
BS EN 61378: Convertor transformers; Part 1: 1999: Transformers classified as type tests and special tests and may be for industrial applications; Part 2 (IEC 61378-2: 2001): 2001: conducted elsewhere from the place of manufacture.

Transformers for HVDC applications (London: British Standards Institution) (1990, 2001)
6
BS EN 61558: Safety of power transformers, power supply units and similar devices (17 parts/sections) (London: British Standards 6.5
Noise levels and means of
Institution) (various dates)
noise abatement
7
BS 171: 1970: Specification for power transformers (London: British Standards Institution) (1970)
If transformers are located in or near residential or other 8
BS 3941: 1975: Specification for voltage transformers (London: noise-sensitive areas, the noise they produce must be British Standards Institution) (1975)
determined so as to assess the need for any counter-
9
BS 6436: 1984: Specification for ground mounted distribution measures.

transformers for cable box or unit substation connection (London: British Standards Institution) (1984)
The noise of transformers is defined as the A-weighted sound pressure level measured in dB(A) at a specified 10
BS 7452: 1991 (IEC 60989: 1991): Specification for separating transformers, autotransformers, variable transformers and reactors measuring surface with a sound level meter, and then (London: British Standards Institution) (1991)
converted to a sound power level using the following formula:
11
BS 7628: 1993: Specification for combined transformers (London: British Standards Institution) (1993)
L
= L
+ L
(6.5)
wa
pa
s
12
BS 7735: 1994 (IEC 60354: 1991): Guide to loading of oil-immersed power transformers
(London: British Standards
where L
is the A-weighted sound power level (dB), L
is
Institution) (1993)
wa
pa
the A-weighted sound pressure level (dB) and L is the s
13
BS 7821: Three phase oil-immersed distribution transformers, 50 Hz, sound pressure level at the measuring surface (dB).

from 50 to 2500 kVA with highest voltage for equipment not exceeding 36 kV (7 parts/sections) (London: British Standards For transformers with water cooling or fan-less air-Institution) (various dates)
cooling, at least six measurements must be taken at a 14
BS 7844: Three-phase dry-type distribution transformers 50 Hz, from distance of 0.3 m from the surface of the transformer.

100 to 2500 kVA with highest voltage for equipment not exceeding 36 kV (3 parts) (London: British Standards Institution) The causes and effects of the noise produced by
(various dates)
transformers and their cooling systems are so diverse that it is not possible to recommend generally applicable noise 15
IEC 60354: 1991: Loading guide for oil-immersed power transformers (Geneva: International Electrotechnical Commission) (1991) abatement measures. Each case must be carefully investigated as necessary.

16
IEC 60905: 1987: Loading guide for dry-type power transformers (Geneva: International Electrotechnical Commission) (1987) Possible measures include:
17
ISO 3: 1973: Preferred numbers — Series of preferred numbers
—
actions by the transformer manufacturer to reduce
(Geneva: International Standards Organisation) (1973) airborne and structure-borne noise
18
IEC 60909: Short-circuit currents in three-phase AC systems: Part 0: 2001: Calculation of currents; Part 1 2002: Factors for the
—
structural measures against airborne noise, e.g.

calculation of short-circuit currents according to IEC 60909-0; Part sound-absorbent walls or enclosures
2: 1999: Electrical equipment — Data for short-circuit current
—
anti-vibration treatment of the foundations to
calculations in accordance with IEC 909 (1988); Part 3: 2003: reduce transmission of structure-borne noise, e.g.

Currents during two separate simultaneous line-to-earth short circuits and partial short-circuit currents flowing through earth; Part 4: spring-mounted supporting structure.

2000: Examples for the calculation of short-circuit currents (Geneva: International Electrotechnical Commission) (1999–2003) 19
BS EN 60529: 1992: Specification for degrees of protection provided by enclosures (IP code) (London: British Standards Institution) (1992)
7-1
7
Low voltage switchgear and distribution
7.1
Principles of low voltage
—
Main: the circuit that connects the main switchboard to any sub-main switchboard.

distribution
—
Sub-main: the circuit that connects any of the sub-main switchboards to any one distribution board.

7.1.1


Introduction

—
Final circuit: a circuit that connects directly to current consuming equipment, or other points of
Many principles have to be considered when defining load connection such as a socket outlet for the
centres and types. Empirical and analytical values within connection of such electrical loads. Final circuits
the constraints defined by BS 7671(1) and other relevant are divided into two types: ring circuits and radial documentation must be used to establish the locations of circuits.

the low voltage switchgear and the type of switchgear that would best suit the type of building, space available, The number of final circuits required, and the number of environment, system flexibility, capital cost, type of loads points that the final circuit supplies must satisfy the and future use of the system.

requirements detailed in BS 7671(1). These criteria are as follows:
Locations of the switchgear must offer solutions to all the above points and still offer a viable solution to serving the
—
over-current protection (BS 7671, section 43)
loads that will exist throughout a building. The design engineer will look for switchgear positions that limit the
—
isolation and switching (BS 7671, section 46)
use of expensive and unnecessary long cable runs within
—
current-carrying capacities of conductors (BS
the system and offer convenience for future maintenance.

7671, section 52).

For low rise buildings with heavy point loads such as industrial premises it is usual to place the switchgear local to substations.

7.2
Low voltage equipment
Multi-storey buildings are usually served via switchrooms located at lower levels, i.e. basements, car parks etc. with 7.2.1
Switchgear components
service risers to each floor. It is usual to find individual tenant and landlord risers in commercial retail and
Switchgear used in low voltage (LV) distribution incor-lettable units. These often incorporate facilities to allow porates many components, consisting primarily of spring sub-metering. It is also common to find multi-storey action contacts, interlocks, arc controllers and cable buildings with substations located at low level and high connections, frames and enclosures and protective devices level. This system when used in conjunction with high level plantrooms offers a great deal of flexibility.

The switchgear is used to open and close the circuit. Main switchgear will usually offer protection to the circuit For all situations where switchgear, distribution boards, against over-voltage, under-voltage, overloads, fault control equipment etc are used to satisfy load centres as a currents and earth leakage. Protective devices can be general principle it is more economic to position the selected to offer all of these facilities or a combination of switchgear as near as possible to the loads. When the them, as appropriate.

switchgear and distribution equipment can be located close to the load it reduces sub main cable sizes, trunking Simple switches or switchgear can be defined as mechan-cable tray and conduit runs.

ical devices that are non-automatic, and used for opening and closing circuits operating under normal load con-7.1.2
Circuit description.

ditions. When used to open and close the circuit under normal conditions these switches must switch with a
It is necessary for every installation to be divided into minimum of arcing. Such devices are hand operated, air individually protected circuits to avoid danger and
break with a fast make and break action.

minimise inconvenience in the event of a fault.

The isolator is a device that isolates a circuit. As such, the In addition, circuit division will aid safe operation, isolator is a form of knife switch or withdrawable link inspection, testing and maintenance.

that, when operated or withdrawn, forms a break in the circuit from the source of supply to the load. Isolators do Various attributes of a circuit are described by the not provide fast make and break facilities and, because of designated area that it serves. Three categories separate this, give rise to severe arcing when used to break circuits these:
under load. They should therefore only be provided to
7-2
Electricity in buildings
isolate supplies that have been opened on-load by other available in switchroom assemblies. The forms cover the forms of switchgear.

separation of busbars, functional units and incoming and outgoing terminations.

A contactor is an electromagnetic or electro-pneumatic device used to open and close circuits under load
These are summarised as follows:
conditions. Contactors are used to control motors or other ( a)
Form 1: an assembly fashioned to provide
loads and are used for other applications, i.e. remote protection against contact with internal live parts, and/or automatic control. The contactor may be controlled although there is no internal separation. The
in a number of ways through energising an electro-
following conditions apply:
magnetic coil. The circuit controlling the coil may
incorporate stop, start, inch and auxiliary switches.

—
busbars are not separated from functional
units
Figure 7.1 shows the application of a contactor as a direct-
—
functional units are not separated from
on-line motor starter. Direct-on-line starting is generally other functional units
only used on motors rated up to a maximum load of
7.5 kW.

—
functional units are not separated from any
incoming or outgoing terminations
The coil is energised by pushing the start button, when a
—
busbars are not separated from any
400 V supply will be connected across the coil causing it to incoming or outgoing terminations.

induce a magnetic field. The coil pulls in the load contacts L1, L2, L3 and the holding contact C1. The start button is ( b)
Form 2: typically the overall enclosed assembly spring-loaded and the operator will press the button provides protection against contact between
momentarily to initiate the start. The holding contacts are internal live parts and internal separation of
in series with the stop button and will allow some current busbars from functional units.

to continue to flow to the coil and hence keep the
Form 2a: as form 2, terminals are not separated contactor energised. The contactor will be tripped by from the busbars or each other.

pressing either the stop button or the trip button, or if overload conditions are detected. Any of these will break This guide is subdivided into type 1 and 2 to
the supply to one side of the coil, the contactor will de-differentiate between the use of insulated
energise and, through spring or gravity action, the
coverings and the use of rigid barriers to achieve
contacts will open. The contactor will not re-close
the separation:
automatically as contacts C1 have also opened, this gives Form 2 Type 1: as form 2, the busbars are separated the contactor a ‘no-volts’ release characteristic.

with the use of insulated coverings. The busbars
are separated from the terminals, but not from
For larger loads, contactors may also be controlled via functional units or each other.

other forms of circuit wiring, such as star-delta, automatic transformer and inverter control.

Form 2 Type 2: as typical form 2 arrangement. The busbars are separated with the use of metallic or
non-metallic rigid barriers. The busbars are
7.2.2
Forms of separation
separated from the terminals, but not from
functional units or each other.

Various recognised standards of switchgear construction ( c)
Form 3: the typical arrangement is as follows: exist and these are detailed in BS EN 60439-1(2).

—
busbars are separated from the functional
units
Placing equipment in a basic enclosure will provide a degree of separation, as the door can be shut to prevent
—
functional units are separated from other
accidental contact between live parts. However in most functional units
applications there are benefits to be gained by providing
—
functional units are separated from
additional separation between components.

incoming and outgoing terminations
BS EN 60439-1(2) defines four forms of separation that
—
busbars are not separated from incoming
represent the construction arrangements universally
and outgoing terminations.

Figure 7.1 Contactor used as a
direct-on-line motor starter
L1 L2
L3
Start
button
Isolator
C1
switch
Stop/reset
button
1
3
5
(L1) (L2)
Motor
(L3)
Supply
Low voltage switchgear and distribution 7-3
Form 3a: as typical form 3 arrangement. The
unit, and rigid barriers provide compartmentation,
terminals are not separated from the busbars or
complete with integral glanding.

each other. This guide is then subdivided into type
1 and 2 to differentiate between the use of
The forms of construction guidance has been written
insulated coverings and the use of rigid barriers to around various methods and means of preventing a fault achieve the separation.

in a single circuit being transferred to adjacent circuits. In general terms the higher the form rating the higher the Form 3b, Type 1: as typical form 3 arrangement.

The busbars are separated with the use of
degree of protection.

insulated coverings. The busbars are separated
from the terminals, but not from each other.

It should be noted that a panel constructed to the requirements of a particular form does not necessarily mean that Form 3b, Type 2: as typical form 3 arrangement.

a live panel is safe to work on or operate without being The busbars are separated with the use of metallic
fully electrically isolated.

or non-metallic rigid barriers. The busbars are
separated from the terminals, but not from each
In general terms the higher the form of separation the other.

more costly is the switchgear assembly. It is therefore ( d)
Form 4: The typical arrangement is:
important that the specific application be carefully considered prior to specifying the switchgear. For large
—
busbars are separated from the functional
‘mission critical’ applications such as hospitals, large units
financial organisations and military applications, it may
—
functional units are separated from each
be prudent to specify a derivative of form 4 construction.

other
This will provide protection against single circuit failure in a cubicle spreading to other circuits. Alternatively, for a
—
terminations to functional units are
development where non-mission critical activities occur separated from each other
such as light retail or large domestic, it would be prudent
—
functional units have a separate neutral
to specify a lower form of switchgear separation. The main connection with a means of disconnection.

application for forms 1 and 2 would for motor control centres serving non-critical mechanical plant. The
Form 4a, Type 1: as typical form 4 arrangement.

standard form of separation for a standard miniature Busbars are insulated with coverings. Cables are
circuit breaker (MCB) distribution board or consumer unit terminated within the same unit as the associated
is considered to be form 1.

functional unit. Cables maybe glanded elsewhere.

Form 4a, Type 2: as typical form 4 arrangement.

Busbar separation is achieved with the use of rigid
7.2.2
Distribution boards
barriers or partitions. Cables are terminated within the same unit as the associated functional unit.

Distribution boards will usually be used at sub-
The cables maybe glanded elsewhere, i.e. a cable
distribution points to provide a means where final circuits chamber.

may be connected to the loads through fuses or circuit Form 4a, Type 3: as typical form 4 arrangement.

breakers. Distribution boards should be located as close to Busbars are insulated with coverings. Cables are
the load centres as possible to reduce the amount of final terminated within the same unit as the associated
circuit wiring and cable containment systems used, i.e.

functional unit. Terminations for each of the
trunking, conduit etc. Distribution boards will usually functional units have facility for integral glanding.

include high rupturing capacity (HRC) fuses in old
installations, or more commonly in modern installations, Form 4b, Type 4: as typical form 4 arrangement.

miniature circuit breakers (MCBs). They may be used for a Busbars are insulated with coverings. Terminals
variety of applications and may be single or three-phase are external to the functional unit, and insulated
configuration dedicated lighting boards, power boards, or coverings provide separation. Cables maybe
multi-service boards. Depending on the application the glanded elsewhere, i.e. a common cable chamber.

board may be purchased with a main isolator switch rated Form 4b, Type 5 (terminal boots): as typical form 4
at a desired current rating.

arrangement. Busbar separation is achieved with
the use of rigid barriers or partitions. Terminals
are external to the functional unit, and insulated
7.2.3
Circuit protective devices
coverings provide separation. Cables maybe
glanded elsewhere, i.e. a common cable chamber.

7.2.3.1
Fuses
Form 4b, Type 6: as typical form 4 arrangement.

Rigid barriers or partitions provide total separa-
Fuses are the simplest form of circuit protection. The fuse tion.

is made up of a number of components. A fuse element, incorporated within a carrier, is designed to melt when too Terminals are external to the functional unit, and
much current is passed, hence breaking or opening the rigid barriers provide compartmentation. Cables
circuit under overload or fault conditions.

maybe glanded elsewhere, i.e. a common cable
chamber.

Fuse carriers are located within distribution boards or fuse Form 4b, Type 7: as typical form 4 arrangement.

switches and are designed to enable the carrier to be Rigid barriers or partitions provide total sep-withdrawn from the circuit without having to touch live aration. Terminals are external to the functional
parts of the distribution board.

7-4
Electricity in buildings
flows. However, when an earth fault occurs, the current flowing in the neutral will be less than the current flowing 500
H
in the phase conductor, causing an imbalance in the two J
R
C
C
S
4
9
H
4 00
FU
2
R
0
1
C
0 A
E
S
2
F
S M
windings which induces a current in the third tripping 5
F
2
1
U
5
A
8 P
S
M
E
S
D5 P
coil winding. When the current has reached the
magnitude at which the RCD is set to trip (i.e. 30–100 mA) then the tripping coil will open the circuit.

An RCD should also incorporate a test button connected to Figure 7.2 Typical high rupturing capacity (HRC) fuses the internal circuitry which, when activated, will test the circuit to ensure correct operation. However, this tests only the mechanical elements of the device, not the
electrical. The electrical elements should also be subjected Rewireable fuses, whilst still retained in many old
to a trip test using suitable test equipment.

installations, are not generally used in new installations.

The most commonly used fuse is the high rupturing
It is possible to combine an RCD and an MCB to provide a capacity (HRC) fuse as shown in Figure 7.2. The quartz device known as a ‘residual current breaker with
filling will extinguish any arcs that are formed under fault overcurrent protection’ (RCBO). This device would
conditions by filling the gap created between the two ends generally be located within the distribution board.

of the fuse element with a high resistance powder.

Consideration should be given to the fact that some
manufacturer’s units occupy two outgoing ways on a
A benefit of fuses is that they withstand much higher fault distribution board whereas units from other manufac-levels than other electromechanical forms of protection.

turers only occupy a single outgoing way. These devices offer the benefits of a compact solution to providing Fuses are not interchangeable; the connection tags are circuit protection with the added benefits of earth leakage spaced differently depending on the rating of the fuse.

protection.

This prevents increased fuse sizes being installed within a reduced capacity frame.

HRC fuses offer some benefits over modern day miniature circuit breakers (MCBs) or moulded case circuit breakers Fuses are commonly used and are generally considered to (MCCBs), such as high fault withstand ability, silent be reliable in operation.

operation and simple interchangeability. However MCBs or MCCBs do offer other advantages such as simple identification of which device has operated, the ability to automate 7.2.4
Circuit breakers
the device and, on larger devices, the ability to alter the time–current characteristic to assist with discrimination.

Circuit breakers are commonly used today for protecting circuits on HV and LV circuits. The circuit breaker is a For these reasons, it is important to consider the
mechanical device capable of opening and closing circuits particular requirements of each project prior to selecting under normal and fault conditions. For low current, low the protective equipment.

voltage applications miniature circuit breakers (MCBs) may be used to protect final circuits. Characteristics of MCBs are given in BS 7671(1) and manufacturers’ information.

7.2.5
Alternative means of serving
load centres
MCBs are manufactured to recognised standards. These standards provide three different categories of perform-Load centres may be served in a number of ways. Most ance depending on the application. These are as follows: supplies are simply taken radially via HV transformers,
—
Type B: used where resistive loads are present such sub-distribution boards and distribution boards to the as tungsten lighting or electric heating is present.

final circuits. Alternatively, there are many applications where the load centre must be protected from losing its
—
Type C: used where a general mixture of light supply, e.g. hospitals, computer centres, production inductive and resistive loads are present, such a
processes etc. For these applications, security of supply to light commercial.

the load centre can be established by providing either
—
Type D: used where there is a strong presence of uninterruptible supplies or standby generator back-up.

inductive loads such as motors and switched mode
power supplies.

Standby or emergency generators can be sized to provide the entire building load or a part of the full load. Where Each breaker type should be selected following a detailed generators are required to take the full load of the building assessment of the load types.

automatically they are interlocked with the mains supply.

As such, they sense the loss of supply and initiate the Earth fault currents are detected and controlled by
prime-mover (usually a standby generator); once the
residual current circuit breakers, known as ‘residual prime mover is at the correct speed the generator will be current devices’ (RCDs). RCDs consist of three windings on switched on-line, so taking the full load of the building.

a ring core. Two of the windings are connected to the live (Whether it provides full or part load, the generator is and neutral respectively, and are wound onto the core interlocked with the main supply.)

equal and opposite. The third winding is connected to the tripping coil. Under normal conditions the magnetic flux Constraints such as capital cost, space etc. may limit the between the phase and neutral is zero, hence no current amount and size of generators that may be installed within
Low voltage switchgear and distribution 7-5
a building and therefore the emergency supply available 7.3
Equipment selection
may not be capable of taking the full load of a particular building. Under these circumstances the loads must be divided into ‘essential’ and ‘non-essential’ loads and the 7.3.1
Switchgear
essential loads only connected to the generator.

Switchgear used for LV distribution incorporates a number In a hospital the essential loads will be the equipment of common components. The purpose of the switchgear is which is critical for patient systems and staff safety. This to control the circuit under normal and fault conditions.

may include nurse call systems, communications systems, The switchgear specified and installed must be capable of medical gas supplies, socket outlets for life-support making and breaking circuit loads via switch contacts or equipment, lifts, theatre suites and fire alarm systems. The in some cases the tripping action of the switchgear.

non-essential circuits will supply cleaners’ socket outlets, Most non-automatic switchgear will have some form of wall lights and other general items that are not considered manually operated handle to open and close the switch.

essential to maintain the services required by the staff.

The handle will usually be spring loaded to ensure quick Under this system it is common to split the lighting make and break facility. Switchgear will also have contacts circuits such that 50% of the lighting is regarded as an that are capable of withstanding the load of the circuit and essential load and 50% as non-essential.

the fault current that may exist within the circuit.

Some form of arc quenching should be incorporated
7.2.6
Supply voltages
within the switchgear. This will extinguish the arc formed within the switchgear when opening a circuit under load Low voltage is defined as 50–1000 V AC or 0–1500 V DC.

conditions (and fault conditions if the unit has automatic The majority of distribution networks installed in
overload protection).

buildings operate at 400 V three-phase and/or 230 V single phase. In large and industrial buildings it is common for Environmental factors will greatly influence the choice of high voltage supplies (typically 11 000 V) to be provided to switchgear. Most switchgear, from large industrial to local substations where it is transformed down to 400 V
domestic uses, is usually robust and mechanically strong.

for use by the consumer. The 400 V supply is then
However, careful consideration will need to be given to the positioning of the switchgear. Unless the switchgear is distributed to various load centres from which 400 V three specifically designed for arduous conditions, it must be phase and 230 V single phase supplies are provided.

located in a moisture and dust free atmosphere. Under normal situations the switchgear will be placed in a Where three-phase distribution is selected, it is important convenient cupboard, switchroom or plantroom, located that the designer considers the issue of load balancing as close to the load centre as possible.

between the three phases.

In many cases it is necessary to provide supplies to Figure 7.3 shows a typical factory arrangement in which equipment in hazardous or corrosive environments. In the incoming HV supply is transformed down to 400 volts these circumstances it is more economic to employ
and distributed to three-phase and single phase circuits.

standard switchgear placed close to, but outside, the Office
Figure 7.3 Typical supply
distribution
Mechanical
arrangements for a factory
board (lighting
plant
and power)
Isolator
Production
Production
Isolator
line
line
Lift
1
2
Factory
Isolator
Isolator
Fire
Isolator
distribution
alarm
board (lighting
panel
and power)
Isolator
Isolator
100 A
100 A
200 A
200 A
100 A
100 A
63 A
fuse
fuse
fuse
fuse
fuse
fuse
fuse
400 volts
11 000 volts
7-6
Electricity in buildings
hazardous environment than to install specially
the type of switchgear for a particular application the manufactured switchgear within the hazard area itself.

designer must fully consider the above and, equally
important, what may be required in the future.

7.3.2
Ingress protection (IP)
Certain loads and environments will dictate the use of specific switchgear. The designer will always attempt to An important consideration in the selection of electrical place the distribution board, switchgear, contactors etc. as equipment is the extent to which the device is protected close to the load centre as possible. The following
from ingress by liquids or solids. The system of classifi-examples show some typical arrangements for low voltage cation is fully described in BS EN 60529(3).

switchgear for different applications.

The level of protection against the intrusion of solid and liquid particles into the electrical equipment is specified Example 7.1: Hospital
by the ingress protection (IP) rating. An IP rating has two digits; the first digit represents the degree of protection Figure 7.4 shows a typical hospital with theatres, acute against the ingress of solids and the second represents the wards etc. all served via essential and non-essential degree of protection against the ingress of liquids.

distribution boards.

The degrees of protection against ingress of solids and A 400 V supply is distributed through a busbar chamber liquids are shown in Table 7.1.

to the LV switchgear or via a centralised modular form panel (it is usual to incorporate the power factor
correction equipment at this point). From the substation 7.3.3
System selection
LV switchgear, a typical installation would feed out to the load centres via suitable cables run in voids, ducts, For high voltage applications the available options for the basements etc. to feed further switchgear, MCCBs or sub-selection of switchgear is limited. However for LV
distribution boards.

switchgear there are numerous manufacturers offering a wide range of options.

Emergency generators are usually located close to the building’s main LV switchgear panel. The emergency
Selection of equipment must be based on a number of
generator will provide a 400 V, 50 Hz electrical supply considerations, including:
whenever the normal supply is interrupted. As such the generator will be sized to provide a sufficient electrical
—
type and number of loads to be served
supply to all essential supplies throughout the building.

—
space available to install the switchgear
Establishing critical loads is vital to the satisfactory
—
capital cost of equipment
operation of the building. During the design of any
—
access to cable containment (i.e. trunking, trays,
buildings that will utilise emergency generators to provide conduits or cable runs)
essential supplies, it must be remembered that any
emergency lighting, work area supplies, kitchen refrig-
—
degree of isolation consistant with regular
eration etc. should be on the ‘essential’ supply.

maintenance and alterations, both when live and
dead.

Example 7.2: Retail store
In many instances the choice is dictated by constraints that may be inherent with the type of building, space In this case the incoming electrical mains supply is shown allocation, available capital etc. However when choosing entering the building via the back of the store, see Figure Table 7.1 Ingress protection (IP) ratings
First
Level of protection against ingress of solid objects Second
Level of protection against ingress of liquids
digit
digit
0
No protection
0
No protection
1
Protected against large solid objects of 50 mm diameter or 1
Protected against vertically falling drops of water
greater (e.g. hands)
2
Protected against small solid objects up to 12.5 mm diameter 2
Protection against dripping liquid falling vertically when or greater (e.g. fingers)
enclosure is tilted at an angle up to 15° from vertical 3
Protected against solid objects up to 2.5 mm diameter or 3
Protection against water sprayed at any angle up to 60° from greater (e.g. tools)
vertical
4
Protected against solid objects up to 1.0 mm diameter 4
Protection against splashing from all directions
diameter or greater (e.g. wire)
5
Protected against ingress of dust in an amount sufficient to 5
Protection against water jets from any direction
interfere with the satisfactory operation of the equipment or impair safety
6
Totally protected against ingress of dust.

6
Protection against strong water jets from all direction
—
7
Protected against temporary immersion
—
8
Protected against continuous immersion
Note: when a digit is not required it is replaced by ‘x’ or ‘xx’ if neither digit is required
Low voltage switchgear and distribution 7-7
Repeat for other 1st
Repeat for other 1st
and ground floor
X-ray
and ground floor
departments
machine
Service
X-ray
departments
(A&E)
departments
machines
Hopital street
Final circuit
(ring)
Lighting
lighting and
Lighting
distribution
power
board
Distribution
Hopital street lighting
Bed lift No 1
Street
board
and power
Bed lift No 2
lockable
Firemans lift No 1
isolator
Power
Other
Non essential
Essential
Other
distribution
departments
plant lighting
plant lighting
depts
Plant
panel
rooms
Sub-main
board
Energy centre
service departments
lighting and power
Main LV
Main LV
switchroom
panel
3 N/O
Non-essential
N/O essential
*
switchboard
*
2 N/C
*
2 N/C
switchboard
Non-essential
Transformer
Essential
Emergency
Supply
Interlocked LB3
transformer
bay
transformer
generator
complex
Electricity
supply
HV switchboard +
+
company
Figure 7.4 Typical distribution for a hospital 7.5. The supply would most likely terminate at the
incoming mains positions with a supply taken across to the electrical switchroom. The electrical supply would then terminate in a switchfuse of sufficient size to control the store load. From the main switchfuse other
Electricity supply
company's incoming
switchfuses would provide supplies to mechanical plant, LV supply
store signs, distribution boards etc.

Consumer's LV
Dado trunking
Electrical
switchpanel
intake/
metering
7.4
Protection and
point/cutout
Office
control/metering
LV switchroom
Lighting
and power
Back of house/
7.4.1
Protection principles
distribution
store room
board
Circuits need to be protected against faults such as overloading, short circuits, under-voltage and earth Cable
containment
leakage.

Prolonged overloads may result in heat generated within the circuit, which may lead to a fire within the switchgear or cables. This can quickly spread to adjacent circuits or equipment. Excessive currents can occur when short
circuit conditions apply, hence arcs or flashes may again Retail
result in unbalanced conditions, insulation breakdown space
and excessive current, all endangering people or livestock.

Under-voltage conditions will especially affect electric motors, which may slow down, stall or stop altogether.

Hence the circuit must be protected against a number of conditions. The designer of a system must also ensure that the protective devices offer sufficient discrimination (i.e. if Shop front
a circuit has a number of protective devices that are Cold cathode
Fireman's
signage
switch
connected in series, the device nearest the fault
should operate to clear the fault leaving all other healthy Figure 7.5 Typical distribution for a retail store
7-8
Electricity in buildings
circuits operational). Figure 7.6 shows a typical circuit charge will be levied for electrical consumption above a feeding through various protective devices.

level agreed with the consumer. Various metering configurations and arrangements are available and the various For the circuit shown in Figure 7.6, if a fault should occur electricity supply companies should be consulted.

at point 1, the 10 A final lighting circuit fuse should operate thereby clearing the fault and leaving the
Low voltage switchgear should offer adequate discrim-remaining circuit operating. A fault at point 2 should be ination, see section 7.4.1. The designer will need to cleared by the 30 A fuse which again leaves the majority of calculate the fault current, voltage drop, shock protection the system operational. A fault at point 3 should operate and load current for each section of the installation. On the 100 A fuse which would result in the loss of a
large installations the designer will usually carry out the substantial amount of the system but would, however, still installation from incoming MV supply, through MV
leave the 100 A and 63 A circuits operational. A fault at switchgear, transformer, LV switchgear protected via BS 88
point 4 should be cleared by the 300 A fuse and would fuses, MCCBs or air circuit breakers (ACBs), through to result in the loss of all circuits.

centrally located switchgear and finally to the distribution board and, in turn, the final circuits.

Figure 7.6 suggests that the fuse closest to the fault condition would clear the fault thereby avoiding the Where installations are provided with emergency standby operation of larger fuses down the line and thus
generators, double busbar systems etc., it may be necessary preventing other parts of the circuit from being affected.

to provide a bypass facility. This will provide the facility to bypass the emergency generator, thereby completely However, different protective devices (e.g. MCBs, HRC fuses, isolating the generator from any supply and thus allowing semi-enclosed fuses etc.) have different time–current work to take place on the generator. It is essential that the characteristics (i.e. the ability to clear faults of various bypass cubicle be interlocked with the generator control current magnitudes within various times) and this must panel so that the generator set cannot be switched to the be borne in mind when using different types of device in normal mains supply when not synchronised. The
combination.

interlocking of the two systems is normally carried out using mechanical interlocks. The key isolators will operate via mechanical interlocks that will only allow switchgear 7.4.2
Metering
to be opened for inspection with the correct keys in place within the panel.

Under most conditions the local supply company will
connect metering equipment to the incoming supply. For Part L2 of the Building Regulations(4) requires that supplies up to approximately 50 kV·A the supply
reasonable provision be made to enable at least 90% of the company’s meters will be connected direct; for supplies estimated annual energy consumption of each fuel to be above 50 kV·A the supply will be metered via current accounted for. This can be achieved by various means but transformers.

Building Regulations Approved Document L2(5) suggests the size of plant for which separate metering would be For consumers above 50 kV·A the local supply company considered reasonable, see Table 7.2.

will most probably provide a maximum demand meter.

Table 7.2 Sizes of plant for which separate metering The maximum demand meter will be set to monitor both is recommended(5)
peak local demand and kW·h units used. An additional Plant item
Rated
input
Final
power / kW
lighting
Electric humidifiers
10
circuit
Fault 1
Motor control centres providing
10
1
power to pumps and fans
10 A fuse
Final electrical distribution boards
50
Isolator
Fault 2
7.4.3
Physical arrangements for LV
2
switchgear
30 A fuse
LV switchgear used for large projects will inevitably Isolator
require a considerable amount of space. Whilst it is always more economic to place the switchgear local to the loads, Fault 3
3
consideration should be given to the value of usable floor areas. Switchroom sizes must be small enough therefore to be favourable to the designer and to the client.

100 A fuse
Isolator
Switchgear and cables can be provided in various
configurations, typically:
Fault 4
4
—
cables: top access or bottom access
—
switchgear: front access or rear access
300 A fuse
Main switchboard
Each building will have differing requirements depending Figure 7.6 Typical protection of a circuit
on the space available.

Low voltage switchgear and distribution 7-9
Note that bottom access switchgear will require cable will be noted that the trench provides flexibility for trenches or pits located beneath the switchgear which will bringing cables in and out of the LV switchgear.

necessitate early coordination with the architect and structural engineer. Where switchgear is mounted low Typically, builders’ work would also cover the provision of down in bottom entry switch panels, consideration should adequate drainage and waterproofing of the trenches.

be given during the design to the location of glanding Consideration should be given to the water table.

plates and the distance between glanding plates and the terminals of switchgear. This can be particularly critical Other points for consideration concerning the layout and where large (>120 mm2) or solid core, cables are installed contents of the switchroom include the following:
due to the difficulty in bending the cables in a potentially
—
Trench chequer plates should be cut to suit the
confined space.

equipment and cables. The chequer plates should
not extend under switchgear.

For switchgear located near to load centres, it will be necessary to provide sufficient ducts, tray work, ladder-
—
A non-dusting screed should be laid with the final
rack etc., to enable large cables to be installed to and from floor level to be minimum 100 mm higher than the
the switchgear.

outside ground level.

—
Panic bolts should be fitted to external doors,
Different switchgear arrangements offer access to the preferably two doors per switchroom. Access to the
busbars from a variety of positions. The maintenance switchroom must meet fire escape requirements
engineer requires safe access to operate any switchgear.

and permit access of both personnel and equip-
The installer requires safe all round access, hence
ment.

sufficient access must be left at all times for day-to-day use of the switchgear and access for maintenance, testing and Door placed
future expansion of the system.

opposite end
Covered
Covered
Withdrawal
to escape door
cable trench
cable trench
space
Figure 7.7 shows examples of space requirements and
Ducts
Ducts
builders work required when installing LV switchgear. It Cable trench
Dry transformer
Withdrawal
A
Ducts
cubicle
space
Door
A
A
Steel screen
Transformer
LV switch
(removable)
Duct or
Doors
board
trench
switchboard
B
HV switchboard
LV
Escape door
B
Rear access
B
Withdrawal
space
Transformer
Duct
Doors
Ducts
Escape door
Louvred door
MV switch
Fire screen floor
HV switch trip and
Fire barriers in
Space for
to ceiling
close battery charger
cable trench
future extension
(a)
(b)
Fence
500 kVA
Cable
MV circuit
Withdrawal Double doors
Cable
transformer
duct
breaker
space
to allow passage
ducts
of switchgear
MV switchroom
Isolators
3·5 m
cable covered
trench
4 m
Cable
Figure 7.7 Space requirements
duct
and builders’ work required when
LV switchroom
installing typical switchgear; (a)
4 m
3·5 m
substation with single HV switch,
LV switchboard
dry transformer and LV
Cable
Cable
switchboard, (b) substation with
ducts
ducts
HV switchboard, two transformers
and LV cubicle-type switchboard,
Rear access
Covered cable trench
(c) small substation with indoor
transformer and HV ring main
(c)
unit switchgear
7-10
Electricity in buildings
—
Emergency lighting should be provided.

in transit or incorrectly re-assembled. All on-site tests must be performed by qualified and experienced commis-
—
The switchroom should be designed to achieve a
sioning engineers with experience of the type of
minimum fire resistance of 1 hour.

equipment which has been installed.

—
The switchroom should be lockable to prevent
unauthorised access.

Appropriate test certificates should be retained in the operating and maintenance manuals produced for the
—
Rubber mats running the entire length of the
building.

switchroom should be provided.

—
Relevant safety information should be displayed.

7.5.2
Commissioning
—
Resuscitation procedure charts should be
displayed.

When the installation is complete, commissioning will
—
A framed, up-to-date schematic of the equipment
start and the switchgear will be energised. Commissioning should be displayed.

requires that the installation work has been correctly carried out and that it has been completed. A thorough check will need to be carried out to ensure that this is so.

Pre-commissioning checks should be the responsibility of 7.5
Testing and commissioning
the installer. However, if applicable, the design engineer is normally present to witness parts of the works under test.

7.5.1
Testing
Switchrooms must be complete, weatherproof and without other trades, particularly ‘wet trades’ working adjacent to Testing should be undertaken to satisfy several purposes: HV plant under test. The safety officer for the building or site must be made aware of the scheduled dates for testing
—
to verify the adequacy of the design
and commissioning in order that the necessary safety
—
to ensure that the installation is sound
procedures are in place and that other persons are made aware that testing and commissioning will be taking place.

—
to see that the installation complies with the
specification
Commissioning can be complicated but it is essential that
—
to confirm that the installation functions correctly it is done properly with adequate numbers of skilled and safely.

personnel present, both to carry out the commissioning and to witness the respective tests. Ideally, the main-It is essential that a thorough visual inspection of the tenance staff should be present at this stage to learn about equipment and installation be carried out prior to com-the systems and to provide additional supervision. It is mencing with the formal testing process. This process is essential that adequate time is allowed in the construction described in BS 7671(1) and is referred to as ‘initial programme to allow commissioning to be carried out
verification’.

properly and in an orderly fashion.

It is particularly important to remember that electronic components are susceptible to damage from the voltages applied during the test process and therefore it is essential References
when carrying out such insulation resistance tests to 1
BS 7671: 2001: Requirements for electrical installations. IEE
ensure that electronic components such as switched mode Wiring Regulations. Sixteenth edition (London: British Standards power supplies and lighting control gear is disconnected.

Institution) (2001)
2
BS EN 60439-1: 1999: Specification for low-voltage switchgear and Testing for compliance with the specification particularly control gear assemblies. Type-tested and partially type-tested relates to factory built assemblies or to items of plant assemblies (London: British Standards Institution) (1999) which are built at the manufacturer’s works and delivered to site fully assembled. Such tests may cover a broad 3
BS EN 60529: 1992: Specification for degrees of protection provided spectrum including safety, function and performance tests.

by enclosures (IP code) (London: British Standards Institution) (1992)
All tests undertaken at the manufacturer’s works should be carried out in accordance with the appropriate British 4
Building Regulations 2000 Statutory Instruments 2000 No.

Standards. In certain cases the designer may specify that 2532 (London: The Stationery Office) (2000)
the equipment, e.g. switchgear and distribution power 5
Conservation of fuel and power Building Regulations 2000
transformers, are ‘type tested’ at the manufacturer’s works.

Approved Document L1/L2 (London: The Stationery Office) However, standard routine tests will need to be carried out (2000)
on site to ensure that the switchgear has not been damaged
8-1
8
Building wiring systems
8.1


Introduction

8.3
Circuit types
This section describes the methods of distributing
electricity in buildings. The different types of cables and 8.3.1
Voltage bands, categories and
wiring systems are described in detail, together with circuit segregation
advice on determining which types of system are appropriate for the various types of installation.

All editions of the IEE Wiring Regulations(1) (hereafter referred to as ‘the Wiring Regulations’) have included The specific requirements for fire detection and other life regulations about which types of circuits can be incor-safety systems are covered only with respect to the choice porated into the same cable or containment system.

and installation of the cables and the relationship to the electrical wiring.

Previous editions of the Wiring Regulations defined three Frequent reference is made to BS 7671(1) and other British categories of circuit:
Standards but the text of these documents has not been ( a)
Category 1: circuits (other than fire alarm or duplicated here.

emergency lighting circuits) operating at low
voltage and supplied directly from a mains supply
system.

8.2
Symbols, abbreviations
( b)
Category 2: with the exception of fire alarm and and definitions
emergency lighting circuits, all extra low voltage
circuits; and telecommunications circuits which
are not supplied directly from a mains supply
8.2.1
Cable construction abbreviations
system.

Abbreviations used for common types of cable construc-
( c)
Category 3: fire alarm and emergency lighting tion are as follows.

circuits.

EPR
Ethylene propylene rubber
The regulations basically stated that category 2 circuits could only be installed with category 1 circuits if the HOFR
Heat and oil resistant and flame retardant
insulation was rated for the highest voltage present and LSF
Low smoke and fume ( Note: this is not a British that category 3 circuits could not be installed with Standard definition)
category 1 circuits under any circumstances. In practice this means that a telephone circuit would have to be LS0H
Low smoke, zero halogen ( Note: this is not a British Standard definition)
installed using the same type of wiring as a lighting or power circuit, rather than the much smaller types
MI
Mineral insulated
normally used.

MICC
Mineral insulated copper covered
These definitions are no longer included in BS 7671(1) but MIND
Mass impregnated non-draining
are still often referred to by both designers and
PVC
Polyvinyl chloride
installation contractors.

SWA
Steel or single wire armoured
The current edition of BS 7671 defines two voltage bands: XLPE
Cross-linked polyethylene
( a)
Band I covers:
—
installations where protection against
8.2.2
Definitions
electric shock is provided under certain
conditions by the value of voltage
Wherever possible the definitions used in this section are
—
installations where the voltage is limited
in accordance with BS 7671(1). These definitions are not for operational reasons (e.g. telecom-repeated herein. Other commonly used terms are defined munications, signalling, bell, control and
as follows:
alarm installations); extra-low voltage
—
high voltage: any voltage exceeding 1000 V AC
(ELV) will normally fall within voltage
band I.

—
containment system: any enclosed system specifically used for cables and wires; this includes conduit
( b)
Band II contains the voltages for supplies to
and trunking systems but not support systems
household, and most commercial and industrial
such as cable trays and ladders
installations. Low voltage (LV) will normally fall
8-2
Electricity in buildings
within voltage band II. Band II voltages do not
and overload and short circuit protection for the flexible exceed 1000 V AC RMS or 1500 V DC.

cable is provided by a fuse in the plug. The unusual rating of 13 amps was chosen to allow the connection of 3 kW
Regulation 528-01 details the current requirements for electric heaters.

segregation but the basic requirement is that band I circuits must have insulation rated for the highest voltage Previous editions of the Wiring Regulations included present in the band II circuits. Fire alarm and emergency details of typical ring circuits but this has now been lighting circuits have to be segregated from all other moved to Guidance Note 1(2). This states that the
cables, and from each other, as defined in the relevant maximum area covered by each ring main should not
British Standards and telecommunications circuits also exceed 100 m2 for household installations. Ring circuits have to be segregated in accordance with the appropriate are normally wired in 2.5 mm2 conductors but it may be British Standard.

necessary to increase this to 4 mm2 where the circuits are unusually long.

8.3.2
Sub-mains
Spurs may be connected to a ring main as shown in Figure 8.2. Unfused spurs may only supply one socket-outlet The term sub-main, sometimes written without the
(single or twin) or one permanently connected item of hyphen, is commonly used to describe the circuit
equipment. The maximum current that can be taken from connecting a main switchboard or main incomer to the a twin socket-outlet is 26 A and this is below the
distribution boards. The closest definition in BS 7671(1) is that for ‘distribution circuit’.

maximum rating of a 2.5 mm2 cable. Permanently
connected equipment is locally protected by a 13 A fuse or These circuits may be installed using single or multicore 16 A circuit breaker. This ensures that the connection cables or even busbars in a large installation.

cable is protected and cannot be overloaded. Guidance Note 1 states that the number of non-fused spurs is not to exceed the total number of socket-outlets and items of 8.3.3
Final circuits
stationary equipment connected directly in the circuit, although there is no technical justification for this BS 7671(1) defines a final circuit as a circuit connected limitation.

directly to current-using equipment, or to a socket-outlet or socket-outlets or other outlet points for the connection Note that there are nine separate conductors in the socket-of such equipment. Final circuits are sometimes referred outlet where the unfused spur is connected. This can be to as final sub-circuits.

difficult to accommodate in a single mounting box,
particularly if the ring circuit is wired in 4 mm2 cable.

Guidance Note 1(2) gives details for assessing the diversity to be used when calculating the number of final circuits Fused spurs are protected by the fuse in the connection required and also gives details of final circuits for unit and there is no limit on the number of socket-outlets household installations.

on each. The number of fused spurs is unlimited.

8.3.3.1
Ring final circuits
The Wiring Regulations do not specify how many socket-outlets should be provided, only that consideration should Ring circuits, commonly known as ‘ring mains’, are used be given to the length of flexible cord normally fitted to almost universally in the UK to supply socket-outlets but portable appliances and luminaires.

are uncommon in countries that do not use a version of the Wiring Regulations(1). A sketch of the principle is The current prevalence of IT equipment in commercial shown in Figure 8.1.

installations and both IT and audio–visual (AV) equipment in domestic installations requires a large number of The concept was introduced shortly after World War II, in socket-outlets to be installed, even though the total conjunction with the BS 1363(3) socket-outlet and ‘square connected load is relatively low. For example, a typical pin’ 13 A fused plug. Overload protection for the ring home study of, say, eight square meters in area may have circuit is provided by a 30 A fuse or 32 A circuit breaker as many as 16 or 17 socket-outlets in use.

Earth bar
Earth bar
Unfused spur
MCBs
MCBs
or fuses
or fuses
Single-core cables in
Neutral bar
conduit/trunking or
Neutral bar
multicore cable
Figure 8.1 Basic ring final circuit ( Note: cable colours will change from Figure 8.2 Basic ring final circuit with unfused spur ( Note: cable colours 2006, see section 8.4.1.4)
will change from 2006, see section 8.4.1.4)
Building wiring systems
8-3
French/Belgian
Earth bar
socket-outlet
Earth bar
shown
MCBs
MCBs
or fuses
or fuses
Junction box
Junction box
Neutral bar
Neutral bar
Figure 8.3 Basic ring final circuit; typical UK practice ( Note: cable Figure 8.4 Basic radial final circuit; typical European practice ( Note: colours will change from 2006, see section 8.4.1.4)
cable colours will change from 2006, see section 8.4.1.4) In a commercial or office installation the number of final 8.3.3.4
Lighting circuit wiring methods
sub-circuits is best determined by the layout of the desks or furniture. Where a three-phase final distribution board The methods used in wiring lighting circuits are often is installed the circuits should be balanced between the dependent upon the type of cabling used in the instal-three phases. Selecting the number of circuits using the lation, particularly where two-way switching is required.

area loading (i.e. the watts per square metre figure) will The most common system in modern domestic and some
normally result in a very low number of final circuits.

commercial installations uses a ceiling rose with ‘loop-in’
terminals, connected as shown in Figure 8.5 The basic The physical route of the cables to and from the socket-one-way switching circuit can be used with either single outlets may be vertically from above or below. The Wiring core or multicore cables, although two-way switching is Regulations dictate the routes that the cables must take in wired quite differently, as shown in Figure 8.6, to avoid different types of installation.

having to install loose connectors inside the switch box.

One point to note when using multicore cables is that the 8.3.3.2
Radial final circuits (UK practice)
colour of the insulation may not be in accordance with BS
7671, which (up to April 2004) required the phase
Radial final circuits are used on lighting circuits and also conductor of a single phase circuit to be red. This is for small power supplies in both domestic and commercial installations. These would typically be used to supply a single item of equipment such as an electric cooker or an Loop Neutral Line
underfloor distribution busbar. Multiple socket-outlets are usually connected as shown in Figure 8.3. The Wiring Regulations cover the cable sizes and allowable protective Earth bar
device ratings allowed for the various types of circuit and socket-outlet. As with ring circuits, the connections to the Single-core cables in
To next
socket-outlets may be run from above or below.

conduit/trunking or
MCBs
ceiling
multicore cable
or fuses
rose
8.3.3.3
Radial final circuits (European practice)
Neutral bar
Radial final circuits are used universally throughout continental Europe, generally protected at 16 A and
incorporating what are commonly known as 10/16 A
socket-outlets because some earlier plugs were rated at Luminaire
10 A rather than the 16 A rating of the socket-outlet.

One-way switch
Several different types of socket-outlet are in use with the most common being the CEE 7/4 ‘Shuko’ type, with the Figure 8.5 Basic lighting radial circuit ( Note: cable colours will change earth contacts on the side of the plug, used in Germany, from 2006, see section 8.4.1.4)
Australia, the Netherlands, Sweden, Norway and Finland.

France and Belgium use an incompatible socket-outlet with a male earthing pin, although there is a CEE 7/7 plug that works with both these socket-outlets. The Shuko plug can be inserted either way round, as can the Italian CEI 23-16 10 A and 16 A plugs, so line and neutral are
(a)
Two-way switch
Two-way switch
connected at random in these systems.

Multi-core cables
Although European radial circuits can be wired as in the UK, with the cabling running from one socket-outlet to the next, it is more common to spur each socket off the (b)
cable run in a junction box as shown in Figure 8.4 In Two-way switch
Two-way switch
domestic installations these junction boxes are often Figure 8.6 Two-way switching circuits; (a) single core cables in mounted just below ceiling level and frequently have just conduit/trunking, (b) multicore cables ( Note: cable colours will change a push-fit plastic cover.

from 2006, see section 8.4.1.4)
8-4
Electricity in buildings
particularly significant where ‘flat twin and earth’ type
—
phase of single phase circuit: black
cables are used in domestic installations.

—
phases of three-phase circuits: black, brown, black
In the two-core cable connecting the ceiling rose to the
—
neutral: blue
switch, or the first switch in the case of two-way
—
protective conductor (‘earth’); green/yellow
switching, both conductors are classified as live conductors. However when a standard cable is used one of the conductors will be black. This can be particularly
8.4.1.3
Anomalies with the existing situation
confusing for amateur electricians. The accepted practice (up to 2004)
is to cover the black conductor with red sleeving but this is frequently not done. Some manufacturers produce two-There are many difficulties and anomalies in the above core cables with two red conductors, but these are seldom systems.

seen.

In the UK, blue was used as both a phase and a neutral Similarly, the three-core cable between the two-way
conductor, depending solely on whether the cable was switches will be insulated in the red, yellow and blue used flexible or not.

for three-phase circuits. Technically these colours should only be used on a three-phase circuit but, at least, there is In continental Europe, the phase rotation is not
no live conductor with black insulation.

immediately apparent, although cables can be phased out with some difficulty because one black conductor is next Note: the colours traditionally used in the UK are to the brown conductor and the other is next to the blue.

changing to EU harmonised colours, see section 8.4.1.

Probably the most confusing and possibly dangerous
situation occurs when installing a continental European 8.4
Power cables
suspended luminaire in a UK installation because the fixed wiring has a black neutral conductor and the
luminaire has a black live conductor.

8.4.1
Identification colours
8.4.1.4
Harmonised cable colours (after 2006)
The Wiring Regulations(1) define the identification
colours for various type of conductors including those for A new system of harmonised cable colours has now been direct current circuits. This section covers only those agreed. In the UK these colours were introduced on 1st colours used in single phase and three-phase services. At April 2004 as an amendment to the Wiring Regulations(1).

the time of writing (May 2004) these colours are in the However, they will not become compulsory until 1st April process of being changed.

2006. Installations commencing between these dates may use either of these colour systems, but not a combination 8.4.1.1
UK situation (up to 2004)
of the two.

For both non-flexible cables and flexible cables and cords For non-flexible cables the colours are:
the colours are:
—
phase of AC single phase circuit: red*
—
neutral of
—
phase of single phase circuit: brown
AC single or three-phase circuit: black
—
phase R of three-phase AC circuit: red
—
neutral of AC single or three-phase circuit: blue
—
phase Y of three-phase AC circuit: yellow
—
phase 1 of three-phase AC circuit (L1): brown
—
phase B of three-phase AC circuit: blue
—
protective conductor (‘earth’): green/yellow
—
phase 2 of three-phase AC circuit (L2): black
—
functional earth: cream
—
phase 3 of three-phase AC circuit (L3): grey
For flexible cables and cords the colours are:
—
protective conductor (‘earth’): green/yellow
—
phase: brown (or black in 4- and 5-core cables)
—
functional earth (‘clean earth’): cream
—
neutral: blue
—
protective conductor (‘earth’): green/yellow
The amendment to the Wiring Regulations of 1 April 2004
also gives details of how the new colour cables should be identified when making alterations or additions to
8.4.1.2
Continental Europe situation
installations that use the old colours.

(up to 2004)
For both non-flexible cables and flexible cables and cords 8.4.2
Cable voltage rating
the colours are:
The voltage rating for cables is expressed as two values, for example 600/1000 V. The first figure is the maximum
* Note: that in the Republic of Ireland red, yellow and blue are allowed for the final subcircuits. This has been observed in several installations voltage allowable between any conductor and earth, and in the UK where Irish contractors have carried out the installation.

the second is the maximum voltage allowable between any
Building wiring systems
8-5
two conductors, generally between the phases in a three-flowing in the cable will be dissipated at a rate such that phase system.

the allowable maximum temperature is not exceeded.

The cables typically used in domestic installation have a However, should the cable be installed in a manner which voltage rating of 300/500 V and the larger power cables prevents this heat from dissipating quickly enough, e.g. if normally have a voltage rating of 600/1000 V.

the cable is installed within thermal insulation or if the ambient temperature is very high, then the cable will It can thus be seen that where installations use the become too hot and the insulation will start to degrade.

European standard voltage of 230/400 V there is no
This situation will also arise if the cable is installed where problem with either type of cable. However care must be heat from other building services can be transferred to the taken where industrial installations use higher voltages, cable, as may occur where cables are run adjacent to hot such as the 380/660 V systems proposed in Germany in the water pipework. It will also occur where many cables are 1980s, because the phase-to-earth voltage may exceed the installed close to one another.

rating of some cable types.

The necessary degree of protection against mechanical damage will vary considerably according to the nature of 8.4.3
Selection criteria
the building use and the likelihood of the installation being subject to physical impacts. Obviously the cables in 8.4.3.1
Electrical characteristics
a warehouse with mechanical handling equipment will
need greater protection than those in a domestic attic.

The two main factors to be taken into account when
determining the size (or, more correctly, the cross-
Adequate mechanical protection can be afforded by the sectional area (CSA)) of any cable are the maximum
correct choice of cable type or containment system and continuous current rating and the voltage drop in the these are covered in more detail in the appropriate
circuit. The maximum current rating is determined by the sections.

maximum temperature rating of the insulation and
depends on the way the cable is installed, e.g. whether it has air flowing freely around it or if it is enclosed in a 8.4.3.3
Environmental conditions
conduit or duct. Other factors include the maximum
circuit impedance for operation of short-circuit and earth Underground installation
fault protection devices and the ability of the cable to withstand the electromechanical stresses due to such Cables can be installed underground either by burying faults.

them directly or pulling them into ducts. Cables in
trenches are frequently laid on a bed of sand so there are The Wiring Regulations(1) and associated Guidance
no sharp stones that might damage the cable sheath and Notes(2,4–7) give details on how to calculate the required allow water to penetrate. Duct systems will generally have size of cable but most designers now use computer
manholes to allow access and these must not be spaced too programs that take into account the various inter-related far apart in order to avoid excessive strain on the cable factors.

when pulling it into the duct.

While both the maximum current rating and the voltage The correct choice of a cable for direct burial depends on drop must be considered for all circuits it will generally be the soil conditions, e.g. whether there are any corrosive found that one or other is the major factor in determining elements, and the outer sheath of the cable. Most sheathed the required cable size.

single core and multicore power cables are suitable for installation directly in the ground, although the
In general the cable CSA on high current circuits such as manufacturers should always be consulted when the soil the connection between a transformer and the main
conditions may be aggressive.

switchboard, or on a short sub-main circuit to a large motor control centre, will be determined by the maximum current rating, whereas long sub-mains and long final In the UK, it is normal to use armoured cables for under-circuits will be sized to keep the voltage drop within ground installations although in Europe non-armoured acceptable limits.

cables are the norm.

8.4.3.2
Mechanical characteristics
Underwater installation
BS 7671(1) includes a comprehensive list of all the external Underwater installation covers two distinctly separate influences to be taken into consideration when designing areas:
the electrical installation. The main ones relevant to cable
—
Where the cable supplies a water feature or
selection are temperature and protection against
submersible pump it is obviously intended to be
mechanical damage.

continuously immersed in water and the cable type
will be chosen accordingly, often by the equipment
The current rating of a cable is determined by the
supplier.

maximum temperature rating of the insulation. The
current ratings included in BS 7671 and manufacturers’
—
Where a cable in a trench or duct is likely to be
data are quoted under defined installation methods and immersed for long periods, the manufacturer
ambient temperatures. When installed under these
should be consulted to ensure that the correct
defined conditions the heat generated by the current cable type is used.

8-6
Electricity in buildings
8.4.3.4
Life expectancy
The British Standards for the various cable types cover which classes of conductor are allowable for the different There is no hard and fast definition of the ‘life’ of a cable.

cross sectional areas. The standards covering most of the In some cases, the periodic inspection and testing will cables used for fixed wiring can have either solid or indicate when the insulation has started to fail and this stranded conductors up to 10 mm2 CSA. However, in
will indicate that the cable needs to be replaced. In other practice it will be found that these cables generally have cases the cable may give adequate readings during tests solid conductors only for cables up to 1.5 mm2 or 2.5 mm2
but the insulation may have become brittle and could fall and stranded conductors for the larger sizes.

off the conductor when alterations or additions are made to the installation.

Flexible conductors are commonly found in small sizes in multicore cable connections to luminaires and fixed
Earlier types of cables, such as those with vulcanised equipment but are also used in large single core cables for rubber insulation that were installed in the 1950s have the final connections to vibrating equipment such as reached the end of their working life. However the life generator sets.

expectancy of modern PVC and XLPE cables is still largely unknown. Many such cables have been in service for over thirty years and show no signs of deterioration. However, 8.4.5
Insulation
a notable exception is the first low smoke and fume (LSF) cables that were produced in the early 1980s.

Insulation materials have evolved over the years and will Manufacturers were still experimenting with different probably continue to do so in the future. Many types of insulation compounds and these cables were not as good insulation materials are available particularly for specialist as their present day equivalents.

applications, but only the more common ones will be
covered here.

All the above assumes that the cables are installed
properly and not subject to any adverse conditions.

Probably the major cause of cable insulation failure is 8.4.5.1
Polyvinyl chloride (PVC)
localised heating caused by poor joints or loose
terminations, or where the cables have been installed in PVC insulation was used extensively from the 1960s up contact with incompatible materials.

until the early 1990s, when concerns about the toxicity of combustion products lead to it going out of common use.

An example of this latter problem is where polystyrene It is probably still the most commonly found insulation thermal insulation was installed in domestic lofts in material and was suitable for both fixed and flexible contact with PVC/PVC ‘flat twin and earth’ wiring. It was installations. It is a clean, easy to handle material with subsequently discovered that the polystyrene caused the good electrical characteristics and a reasonable resistance plasticiser to migrate from the PVC sheathing of the cables to a range of possible contaminants such as water, oils and and made them become brittle.

chemicals. It is inherently flame retardant and is suitable for a conductor maximum continuous operating temperature of 70 °C and a maximum short-circuit conductor
8.4.4
Cable conductors
temperature of 160 °C (140 °C for conductors larger than 300 mm2.

8.4.4.1
Materials
Most UK and European manufacturers still list cables The most common cable conductor material used in
with PVC insulation.

building installations is copper. In some types of cables the copper may be tinned to prevent the copper from
8.4.5.2 Thermosetting
materials
reacting with the insulation material. Aluminium is often (XLPE and EPR)
used for power cables, particularly by the electricity companies. These require different termination and
The type of thermosetting insulation most commonly
jointing techniques. They are not commonly used in
referred to is cross-linked polyethylene (XLPE) although all building installations and therefore are not considered in the British Standards covering this type of cable permit this Guide.

either XLPE or ethylene propylene rubber (EPR) as an alternative insulation material.

Cables for specialist applications such as trace heating or underfloor warming may use materials such as copper-XLPE is superior to PVC in that it is able to operate at nickel or nickel-chromium alloys.

higher temperatures with a sustained conductor tem-
perature of 90 °C as opposed to the 70 °C of PVC. The 8.4.4.2
Construction
maximum short-circuit conductor temperature is 250 °C.

It also has better insulating properties that achieve the BS 6360(8) defines four classes of cable conductor:
same voltage ratings with thinner insulation.

—
class 1 has solid conductors
8.4.5.3
Mineral insulation (MI)
—
class 2 has stranded conductors
—
classes 5 and 6 are flexible cables and cords, with
Mineral insulated cables have the mineral insulation class 6 being more flexible than class 5.

tightly packed between a solid bare copper conductor (or conductors) and a tubular copper sheath. Magnesium
The classes apply to both single core and multicore cables.

oxide has commonly been used as the insulating medium
Building wiring systems
8-7
but the current version of BS EN 60702-1(9) specifies only
—
resistance to fire with mechanical shock.

the insulation properties, not the material to be used.

It details all the relevant tests for assessing the cable in all The main advantages of this type of construction are that three categories but does not specify that the three tests it will not burn or support combustion or produce toxic or are to be carried out on the same sample of cable. This corrosive fumes in a fire. MI cables are able to operate at leads to much public argument between the manufacturers much higher temperatures than either PVC or XLPE cables.

of MI cables, which could pass all the tests using the same In principle, the cables themselves will still operate at cable sample, and other manufacturers whose cables could temperatures approaching the melting point of copper, pass the tests individually on separate cable samples.

over 1000 °C, making them ideal for cables that have to survive under fire conditions. In reality the maximum The first British Standard for fire-resistant cables, BS
operating temperature is limited by the end seals that have 7629(11), was published in 1993 and referred to the cables to be use to seal the cables against ingress of moisture.

as having ‘limited circuit integrity’ under fire conditions.

This was changed to ‘fire-resistant’ in the 1997 version.

Because the cable itself is unaffected by operation at The standard covers multicore cables with up to 4 mm2
extremely high conductor temperatures it is necessary to conductors as typically used in fire alarm and emergency used a different method of determining the maximum
lighting installations. Cables such as Pirelli FP200 and current rating. BS 7671(1) defines two operating conditions Tyco Pyro S are manufactured to BS 7629-1.

for MI cables. Where the outer sheath is exposed to touch, the maximum sheath temperature is limited to 70 °C and BS 7846(12) covers fire-resistant armoured power cables where the sheath is not exposed to touch the maximum with conductor sizes up to 400 mm2. At the time of
sheath temperature is allowed to rise to 105 °C.

writing (May 2004) there are few cables certificated by the Loss Prevention Certification Board (LPCB) as meeting Note that MI cables always have solid conductors and that this standard.

this requires different jointing and termination techniques. It also means that the larger sizes of cables are Both BS 7629 and BS 7846 require the cables to have
impossible to bend by hand.

LSF/LF0H characteristics.

8.4.5.4
LSF and LS0H insulation and sheaths
The subject of fire resistance was further complicated in 2000 by the adoption of a new European standard, BS EN
There are various abbreviations for cables that give off 50200(13). This defines fire resistance tests for small cables very low emissions of smoke and fumes when subject to but crucially does not include a water test. This was fire conditions, although none of them is officially defined addressed in 2003 by BS 8434: Part 1: BS EN 50200 with in a British Standard. LSF (‘low smoke and fume’) and addition of water spray(14).

LS0H (‘low smoke, zero halogen’) are probably the most common. The insulation materials used in these cables are The current edition of the fire alarm standard also
defined in the relevant standards but are not generally specifies additional water spray tests for cables meeting referred to when specifying the cables.

the relevant BS EN 50200 classifications. Interestingly, MI cables manufactured to BS EN 60702(15) are included as 8.4.5.5
‘Fire-resistant’ cables
acceptable without further comment.

Many of the systems in a large building are required to In many installations the type of cable will be subject to continue to operate in the event of a fire. Typically these approval by the Fire or Building Control Officer, and it is will include the fire detection and alarm system itself, not uncommon for them to adopt a cautious approach and emergency lighting, and the power supplies to firefighting insist on MI cables.

equipment and lifts.

The combinations of manufacturing standards and per-
8.4.6
Multicore cables
formance tests are complicated and care must be taken when specifying cable types. Many designers simply
The term ‘multicore’ is used to describe a cable where two specify cables with the highest available ratings, inevitably or more separately insulated conductors are contained within a single outer sheath.

MI, although in many cases this may result in unnecessary expense for the client.

Cables for electrical distribution in the UK normally have The following outlines the recent history of fire-resistant between two and four conductors, European practice
cables in the UK. The references to the relevant standards frequently uses five-core cables, see section 8.4.6.3. Cables are necessarily short and reference should be made to the for signalling and control systems may have many more complete standard where necessary.

conductors.

BS 6387(10) was issued in 1983 and set out the performance The range of multicore cables is vast, extending from standards and tests for cables under fire conditions but small two-core cables used on lighting installations up to was not a cable manufacturing standard.

power cables with conductors of several hundred square millimetres cross sectional area.

The standard covers three aspects of cable performance: Probably the main advantage of multicore cables is that
—
resistance to fire alone
they can be installed directly onto a wall or cable tray and
—
resistance to fire with water
frequently do not need any other form of protection.

8-8
Electricity in buildings
8.4.6.1
Naming conventions for multicore
H: harmonised standards
cables
A: authorised national standards
(2)
Rated voltage
Both single core and multicore cables are frequently referred to by a string of abbreviations describing the 03: 300/300 volts
construction of the cable, starting with the conductor 05: 300/500 volts
insulation and moving outwards. Using this system a
07: 450/750 volts
single core PVC cable with a PVC sheath would be referred (3)
Insulation material
to as ‘PVC/PVC’ and a multicore cable with XLPE insulation, steel wire armouring and a PVC sheath would be referred to B: ethylene propylene rubber (EPR)
as ‘XLPE/SWA/PVC’.

E: polyethylene, low density (LDPE)
E2: polyethylene, high density (HDPE)
E4: polytetrafluoroethylene (PTFE)
Codes used in the UK
E6: ethylene tetrafluoroethylene (ETFE)
E7: polypropylene (PP)
In the UK, the Cable Manufacturers’ Association devel-G: ethylene vinyl acetate (EVA)
oped a series of number codes for different cable types and J: glass fibre braid (GFB)
these are commonly used by electrical contractors.

N: polychloroprene (PCP)
Examples of some of the more commonly used codes are N4: chlorosulphonated polyethylene (CSP)
given in Table 8.1.

R: natural rubber
S: silicone
Codes used in the EU
T: textile braid
V: polyvinylchloride (PVC)
Cables that comply with the European harmonized
V2: heat resistant PVC
standard are marked with the symbol ‘<HAR>’.

V3: low temperature PVC
V4: cross-linked PVC
The designation system uses a series of up to ten
V5: oil resistant PVC
letter/number codes to indicate the construction of the X: cross-linked polyethylene (XLPE)
cable. These appear in a fixed order, see below. The code (4)
Structural elements
relating to the type of conductor is preceded by a hyphen and followed by a space.

C4: overall copper braid screen
C5: cores individual copper braid screen
The system can appear somewhat confusing in practice C7: lapped copper (wire, tape or strip) screen
because unused designation codes are simply omitted. For (5)
Sheath material
example, a 5-core, 2.5 mm2 300/500-volt oil resisting PVC
Codes generally as for (3), insulation material
sheathed, screened cable to BS 6004 is designated
H05VVC4V5-K 5G2.5, whereas a single core stranded
(6)
Special constructions and shapes
conduit wire would be designated as H07V-R.

D3: central strainer (textile or metallic)
D5: central filler (not load bearing)
The codes, in order of appearance, are as follows:
H: flat construction with divisible cores
(1)
Basic standards
H2: flat construction, non-divisible cores
Table 8.1 Common UK cable references
Reference
Description
6242Y
PVC/PVC ‘flat twin and earth’ domestic wiring cables to BS 6004(16) 6242B
XLPE/LSF ‘flat twin and earth’ domestic wiring cables to BS 7211(17) 6243Y
PVC/PVC ‘flat triple and earth’ domestic wiring cables to BS 6004(16) 6243B
XLPE/LSF ‘flat triple and earth’ domestic wiring cables to BS 7211(17) 6491X
PVC insulated single core cable to BS 6004(16); the normal single core PVC cable for installation in conduit 6491B
LSF insulated single core cable to BS 7211(17); as 6491X but with LSF insulation, for installation in conduit 6181Y
PVC/PVC single core unarmoured cable to BS 6004(16); cross sectional area up to 35 mm2
6181Y
PVC/PVC single core unarmoured cable with cross sectional area 50 mm2 and above; see note 1
6181XY XLPE/PVC single core unarmoured cable to BS 7889(18); see note 2
6181B
XLPE/LSF single core unarmoured cable to BS 7211(17), cross sectional area up to 35 mm2
6941X
XLPE/AWA/PVC single core armoured cables to BS 5467(19) 6941B
XLPE/AWA/LSF single core armoured cables to BS 6724(20) 694*X
XLPE/SWA/PVC multicore armoured cables to BS 5467(19) 694*B
XLPE/SWA/LSF multicore armoured cables to BS 6724(20)
* indicates the number of cores in a multicore cable and can be 2, 3 or 4
Notes:
(1) PVC/PVC unarmoured cables were originally covered by BS 6346 but unarmoured cables were removed in the 1997 edition.

(2) XLPE/PVC cables were originally covered by BS 5467 but unarmoured cables were removed in the 1997 edition.

Some cable suppliers still indicate that these cables are manufactured to BS 5467: 1989.

Building wiring systems
8-9
H5: two or more cores twisted together, non-
be the same size as the phase conductors although cables sheathed
with a reduced size neutral are available for use on systems where the three-phase load is well balanced across the (7)
Type of conductor
phases. Such cable are sometimes referred to as 31/2 core The classes of conductor are as defined in BS
because the neutral conductor CSA is about half the phase 6360(8):
conductor CSA. The armouring is usually referred to as SWA although this is variously taken as meaning ‘steel wire U: solid (class 1)
armour’ or ‘single wire armour’ by different manu-
R: stranded (class 2)
facturers.

K: flexible for fixed installations (class 5)
F: flexible for moveable installations (class 5)
In continental Europe power cables generally include a H: highly flexible for moveable installations (class 6) dedicated conductor for the CPC so a typical three-phase, (8)
Number of cores
neutral and earth cable will have five separate cores. In the larger cable sizes the
(9)
Protective conductor
CPC is normally half the size of the
phase conductor. The neutral may be full or half size X: without protective core
depending on the application.

G: with protective core
For many years cables having
(10)
Nominal cross section of conductors
PVC insulation and a PVC
sheath were used practically universally, with XLPE
Value stated in mm2.

insulation being used where higher current ratings were required. Nowadays PVC is used much less frequently and 8.4.6.2
Cables for domestic installations
most installations use cables with XLPE insulation and an LSF or LS0H sheath.

The most common multicore cables used in domestic
installations in the UK are the ‘flat twin and earth’ types Typical armoured power cables are shown in Figure 8.8.

that incorporate two or three insulated conductors with or without an uninsulated CPC (earth) conductor. Cables are available either with PVC insulation and sheath or in an LSF version with XLPE insulation and an LS0H sheath.

Conductors up to 2.5 mm2 CSA are solid; larger sizes are stranded, as shown in Figure 8.7.

These cables are manufactured to BS 6004(16) for PVC/PVC
construction and BS 7211(17) for LSF/LS0H construction, with conductor sizes from 1.0 mm2 to 16 mm2. The most commonly used sizes are 1.0 and 1.5 mm2 for lighting circuits and 2.5 and 4 mm2 for small power circuits.

Larger sizes are used for higher power circuits such as cookers and electric showers.

8.4.6.3
Power distribution cables
These include the mains and sub-mains inside a building, Figure 8.8 Multicore armoured
supplies to plant and the buried supply cables to the power cables ( Note: cable colours
building. These cables are available with several types of will change from 2006, see section
insulation and sheathing materials in various com-
(a)
(b)
8.4.1.4)
binations.

8.4.6.4
Flexible cables and cords
In the UK most cables will be armoured with a layer of steel wires that provide both mechanical protection and These cables are often used for the final connections to are also used as the CPC or ‘earth’. These installations will portable or fixed equipment in domestic, commercial and use two-core cables on single phase circuits and four-core industrial installations. Multicore cables are available with cables, with the steel wire armouring providing the CPC.

between two and five cores according to the manufac-
The neutral conductor in a four-core cable will normally turing standard.

In the UK there are two standards for flexible cables and cords:
—
BS 6500(18) covers cables for office and domestic
environments and lists several cable types suitable
for light or ordinary duty. These cables generally
have PVC or EPR insulation and PVC or CSP sheaths.

—
BS 7919(19) covers cables for industrial use and
Figure 8.7 Multicore cable;
domestic ‘flat twin and earth’
includes a wide range of insulation and sheath
( Note: cable colours will change
materials, including heat resisting, oil resisting,
(a)
(b)
from 2006, see section 8.4.1.4)
flame retardant (HOFR) and LS0H materials.

8-10
Electricity in buildings
8.4.8
Other cable types
8.4.8.1
Metal clad cables
This type of cable is basically a group of single core cables pre-assembled into a flexible steel conduit as shown in Figure 8.11. Metal clad (MC) cable has been used for many years in North America but has only recently been used in the UK. At present there is no applicable British Standard although several MC cables have been certified by BASEC.

Termination is very simple with the external sheath being cut to length and clamped into a proprietary gland. A small plastic bush is installed over the cut end of the metal cladding to prevent damage to the conductor insulation.

Figure 8.9 Flexible cords ( Note:
cable colours will change from
MC cable is available in three, four and five core versions (a)
(b)
2006, see section 8.4.1.4)
in sizes up to 35 mm2.

Some types of flexible cords are available in high temperature variants for connection to heaters or installation in Stranded copper
high ambient temperatures. Typical flexible cords are conductors
shown in Figure 8.9.

8.4.7
Single core cables
Copper
earth wire
The most common area where single core cables are used is in final sub-circuits supplying small power and lighting Insulation
circuits. The cables are installed in an enclosed system of conduits, possibly with trunking used where many cables run together. The cables used on final sub-circuits are normally unsheathed.

Cable tape
Single core cables are also frequently used for the connec-Figure 8.11 Five core metal clad
tions between transformers and the main switchgear. The (MC) cable ( Note: cable colours
very high currents involved require large cables, possibly Galvanised
will change from 2006, see section
with several in parallel, and single core cables are easier to steel sheath
8.4.1.4)
install than similarly sized multicore cables. Sheathed cables will be used in most cases.

8.5
Cable installation,
The insulation materials used for single core cables are termination and jointing
similar to those described above for multicore cables, however single core cables are available both with or without a covering sheath. Sheathed cables are normally used where the cables are not enclosed inside a contain-8.5.1
Bending radius
ment system, Figure 8.10.

Cables are very rugged and are not likely to be damaged Large single core cables are available with wire armouring during normal installation provided reasonable care is for use where additional mechanical protection is
taken. However, the bending radius is very important.

required. The armouring has to be a non-ferrous metal to Cables must not be bent below a certain radius or damage avoid heating by induced currents and aluminium is
will occur to the insulation and, possibly, to the bedding normally used.

or sheathing in multicore cables.

Manufacturers quote the minimum bending radius as a
multiple of the overall diameter of the cable, normally about eight times the diameter. With large multicore armoured cables it is difficult to bend the cables to the minimum bending radius without a former and, possibly, mechanical assistance. However, with smaller cables, up to about 15 or 20 mm overall diameter, it is quite easy to bend the cable to a smaller radius by hand and it may suffer damage as a result.

The necessary bending radius is frequently overlooked by designers, particularly where large armoured cables are Figure 8.10 Single core cables;
terminated into a main switchboard. The cable needs to be (a) sheathed, (b) unsheathed
( Note: cable colours will change
straight where it enters the gland so that the gland can (a)
(b)
from 2006, see section 8.4.1.4)
anchor all the armouring wires and make a good electrical
Building wiring systems
8-11
r = 8 x cable diameter
lugs may be hand operated but those for large lugs are normally hydraulic or battery operated. The crimping tool should incorporate some form of non-return system to ensure that it cannot be removed before the crimping action is complete.

r
8.5.2.1
Cable glands
r
Where multicore cables are used it is normally necessary to install a cable gland where the cable enters the
Correct
Wrong
equipment enclosure. The cable gland provides a firm (No strain
(Permanent strain
on gland)
on gland)
mechanical anchor for the cable sheath to prevent movement and possible damage to the conductor terminations and in the case of armoured cables it provides a conFigure 8.12 Correct and incorrect cable entry to switchboard nection to the armour wires so they can be used as the CPC.

connection with the earth tag. The cable should not start Glands for flexible cords are generally made of plastic or to bend where it enters the gland or the gland will be nylon. Glands for armoured power cables, see Figure 8.14, permanently under strain. It is even possible that the are normally brass although other materials are sometimes gland plate on the switchboard will be deformed. This is used where metallic compatibility may be a problem. To shown in Figure 8.12.

ensure a good electrical connection to the gland an earth tag or an integral earth stud is provided.

The larger sizes of mineral insulated (MI) cables are impossible to bend by hand and need to be bent using a The manufacturers indicate the IP rating of the assembled former or bending tool similar to those used for bending gland but this does imply that the gland has been correctly copper tubing or conduit. Most manufacturers recom-fitted to the cable. Additional protection can be obtained mend a minimum bending radius of six times the overall by fitting shrouds over the gland assembly and this is diameter, although the current British Standard requires recommended for outdoor installations.

cables to be tested only to a radius of about 12 times the overall diameter.

8.5.2
Terminations
The word ‘termination’ covers both the connection of the conductors to the terminals of the equipment and, in the case of multicore cables, the mechanical connection of the cable sheath and armouring.

The type of conductor termination will often be determined by what the manufacturers include as standard in their equipment. Most low current equipment and wiring (a)
(b)
accessories will incorporate simple pinch screw terminals and these are commonly used with conductors of up to Figure 8.14 Glands for armoured cable; (a) plain, (b) with integral earth 6 mm2 CSA.

stud
For larger conductors up to about 16 or 25 mm2, screw clamp terminals are common. Above these sizes compres-8.5.3
Joints
sion lugs are normally used. These are available in a wide variety of configurations to suit different applications, see The general consensus among designers is that any joint is Figure 8.13. Annex D of BS EN 60947-1(20) includes a a possible source of failure and that joints should be description of the many types of terminals available.

avoided unless absolutely necessary. This opinion is not shared by the electricity supply companies which have Compression lugs should always be installed using the many thousands of underground joints in their networks correct size dies and crimping tool. Tools for small size that rarely cause problems.

The Wiring Regulations(1) do not define the term ‘joint’
although they do include specific requirements for where joints can be located. For the purposes of this section, a joint can be defined as a connection between two or more cables, as distinct from the connection of a cable into an item of equipment.

Joints will normally only be necessary in one of two circumstances:
Figure 8.13 Typical compression
—
where the required length of cable is not available
(a)
(b)
lugs
in a single length from the manufacturer
8-12
Electricity in buildings
seals supplied by the cable manufacturer. These are
required for both single core and multicore cables.

As indicated earlier MI cables always have solid conductors. Cables up to about 10 mm2 can be terminated with the same compression lugs as used on stranded cables but this is not possible for the larger sizes of conductor and a Figure 8.15 Junction box for
mechanical lug must be used.

domestic wiring (cover removed)
( Note: cable colours will change
from 2006, see section 8.4.1.4)
8.6
High voltage installations
—
where it is necessary to connect tee-off cables onto a main supply cable, as typically found in domestic
supply systems.

8.6.1
General
There are many types of high voltage cables capable of 8.5.3.1
Joints within buildings
operating at voltages from a few kilovolts up to several hundred kilovolts. This section deals only with those Where either type of joint is required inside a building the likely to be encountered in a typical building installation.

conventional solution is to install a dedicated box with fixed terminals and connect the cables to the terminals The installation of the actual cable is very similar to the using the termination method appropriate to the size of installation of an LV cable. The usual precautions about cable.

bending radii and secure anchoring of single core cables are equally applicable. The main difference is in the For multicore cables in a domestic installation this will termination and jointing of HV cables.

involve a commercially available junction box as shown in Figure 8.15. For large cables such as may be used on a With HV cables there must be a gradual change of potential main riser system it may be necessary to install a purpose-across the insulation at the exposed end of the cable. This made connection box with insulated terminals. In both is known as ‘stress relief ’ and prevents sudden changes in cases the enclosure should be accessible so the connections potential that could lead to corona or other discharge can be inspected and checked for tightness, overheating or effects.

other problems.

8.5.3.2
Underground joints
8.6.2
Thermosetting plastic cables
These joints are sealed and inspection is not possible once These are available as single core or three-core with the joint is completed.

copper or aluminium conductors. Insulation is typically XLPE or EPR. The only significant differences from the LV
The conductors are connected using either bolted or
equivalents are the thicker insulation and, on some cables, crimped connectors. Different types of connectors are the addition of a metallic or semi-conducting screen available depending on whether the joint is a straight-around the conductor. Installation methods are the same through or tee-off. Connectors for the latter case are as for LV cables.

frequently split so there is no need to cut the main cable.

Stress relief is usually provided by a semi-conducting The finished joint needs to be encapsulated to provide sleeve that is slid over the exposed insulation. The sleeves mechanical protection and prevent the ingress of
and any filling compounds and other accessories are
moisture. The most common method is to encapsulate the available as complete kits from the manufacturer. The joint in a resin compound poured into a plastic mould as actual sleeve may be slip-on, heat shrink or cold shrink.

shown in Figure 8.16. Heat shrink tubing is an alternative Installation is very simple with almost no specialist form of encapsulation and is particularly suitable for training required. Indoor terminations may be a plain straight-through joints.

tube; outdoor terminations usually have circular ‘sheds’ to 8.5.4
Mineral insulated cables
MI cables require different jointing and termination techniques. The cables ends must be sealed to prevent the ingress of moisture and this is done using proprietary pot (a)
(b)
Figure 8.16 Underground joint
Figure 8.17 Typical 11 kV terminations; (a) indoor, (b) outdoor
Building wiring systems
8-13
provide a greater creepage path. Typical terminations are short circuit rating above 13.1 kA is 95 mm2 and this is shown in Figure 8.17.

generally accepted as the smallest size that can safely be used on an 11 kV 250 MV·A network.

Cables are available in both armoured and non-armoured versions. Where present the armouring is terminated in a metal gland exactly as for an LV cable.

8.7
Containment systems
8.6.3
Paper insulated cables (PILC)
8.7.1
Trunking
These types of cable were used extensively by the
electricity supply companies in their underground distri-8.7.1.1
General
bution networks. The insulation consists of layers of oiled paper wrapped around the conductor and the whole cable Trunking is available in many different configurations.

is contained in a continuous tubular lead sheath together The most common format is a rectangular tube with a
with various fillers and bedding. With some types of cable removable lid, as shown in Figure 8.19. This type of precautions had to be taken to prevent the oil flowing trunking can be installed horizontally or vertically, along the cable on inclined runs. The mass impregnated, mounted directly on walls or ceilings or suspended on non-draining (MIND) cable was developed to overcome this various types of hangers. When wall mounted it is
problem.

necessary to install restraints to prevent the cables falling out until the lid is installed. Other types of trunking The termination of this type of cable has traditionally include systems for burying in concrete floors and skirting been a highly skilled task. The outer lead sheath is and dado trunking incorporating sockets for power and plumbed onto a gland on the termination box in a similar communications circuits.

way to a lead water pipe. Stress relief is applied to the conductors by wrapping them in layers of special tape, This section concentrates on the rectangular type of sometimes impregnated with carbon black. The correct trunking that is typically installed from a final distri-application of these tapes is critical to obtain the correct bution board.

performance. After completion the termination box may be filled with an insulating compound.

8.7.1.2
Steel trunking
Manufacturers now produce termination kits using
modern heatshrink materials although the installation of Conventional steel trunking is manufactured from mild these on a PILC cable is still much more complicated than steel and is available in a range of sizes from 38 mm by on an XLPE cable.

38 mm up to 300 mm by 300 mm. The section can be
square or rectangular with various width-to-depth ratios.

The largest sizes are rarely encountered because few 8.6.4
Sizing of HV cables
installations require the number of conductors that these sizes can accommodate. The largest sizes likely to be In a typical building installation the LV cables will be sized encountered will be no larger than 100 mm by 225 mm, on either voltage drop or maximum current rating. This is probably divided internally into two or three separate hardly ever the case for HV cables.

compartments.

At a supply voltage of 11 kV the full load current on a BS 4678-1(21) defines the thickness of the metal to be used 1 MV·A transformer is about 52 A. The smallest size
and includes three classes of protection against corrosion.

11 kV cable has a 50 mm2 CSA and a current rating of over Classes 1 and 2 require the steel to have an electroplated 200 A. At first sight it would appear that this cable would zinc coating and Class 3 is hot-dip galvanised, generally be more than adequate to supply the transformer.

specified for external installations, although it should be However, the current that will flow in the cables in the remembered that very few trunking systems can be
event of a short circuit fault must be taken into account.

described as fully weatherproof and the BS makes no
The fault level in most large UK cities is quoted as reference to IP ratings.

250 MV·A, or 13.1 kA at 11 kV and this is the current that would flow in the cable in the event of a fault.

Manufacturers offer a complete range of fittings including bends, tees and reducers but installation still requires Normally the fault current will be cleared by the
much cutting and drilling on site.

protective device immediately upstream from the fault, but on HV networks it is common practice to consider the situation where this device fails to operate correctly so the fault current flows until the next upstream device
operates. In a time graded system with 300–400 ms
grading margin between adjacent devices this may mean that the fault current flows for nearly one second. The cable must be able to carry the current for this time without damage and it is customary to select the cable based on the one second short circuit rating.

A 50 mm2 cable has a one second short circuit rating of (a)
(b)
only about 7 kA. The smallest cable with a one second Figure 8.18 Trunking; (a) single compartment, (b) multi-compartment
8-14
Electricity in buildings
Stainless steel trunking is available for specialist installa-ments of the installation. Conduits are manufactured from tions but is very expensive, in terms of both initial both steel and plastic and may be either rigid, flexible or purchase and installation.

pliable, meaning that it can be bent by hand.

The current British and European Standard for both steel 8.7.1.3
Plastic trunking
and plastic conduits, BS EN 61386(22) (Parts 1, 21, 22, 23), lists a range of twelve sizes ranging from 6 mm to 75 mm Plastic trunking (or, more correctly, ‘cable trunking’), diameter for both rigid and pliable conduits. The old, but made of insulating material, is manufactured in a range of still current, British Standard for rigid conduit, BS 4568: sizes from 12.5 mm to 150 mm as defined in BS 4678-4(21).

Part 1(23), covered only 16, 20, 25 and 32 mm sizes. In the Manufacturers offer ‘mini’ trunking in a range of sizes UK, only 16 and 20 mm conduits are commonly used with from 16 mm by 16 mm up to 50 mm by 50 mm, and some
most installers preferring to use trunking where greater offer larger sizes up to 100 mm by 75 mm.

capacity is required.

BS 4678-4 includes classifications for various aspects of the trunking, including the material itself and its resist-8.7.2.2
Steel rigid conduit
ance to flame propagation. Unlike the standard for steel trunking it also includes categories for the ingress of solid Steel conduit is available in a heavy gauge which is objects and water, so the trunking can have a definite IP
screwed into the fittings and a light gauge which uses slip rating.

joints.

The smaller sizes of plastic trunking are primarily
Screwed conduit has been used in the UK for many years intended for surface installation of final subcircuits and and produces a very strong system with good resistance to many manufacturers produce adapters so that the
mechanical damage although the cost of installation is trunking can connect directly to accessory mounting
high. As the system is all tightly screwed together the boxes. This type of installation would hardly ever be electrical continuity is very good and the conduit system specified for a new installation but can be very practical can be used as the CPC (earth) conductor. The most
for a small office refurbishment or additions to an existing common finishes in the UK are black enamel for internal installation.

installation and galvanised for external use.

Light gauge conduit systems are much quicker to install 8.7.1.4
Multi-compartment trunking
because no threading is required. However care must be taken to anchor the conduits adequately where it is to be Both steel and plastic trunking are available in multi-buried in poured concrete as there is nothing to prevent compartment versions. Some manufacturers offer barriers the joints from separating. The slip joints do not
to divide single compartment trunking into two or more guarantee electrical continuity and this type of conduit separate compartments.

cannot be used as a CPC.

This type of trunking enables circuits that require
Some manufacturers produce a slip joint conduit system segregation from each other to be installed in a single where the accessories and couplings have a spring steel trunking system rather than having to install separate insert that is designed both to prevent joints coming apart trunking systems for the different circuits. This type of and to provide electrical continuity.

installation can work well with simple trunking systems but can result in difficulties where complex layout are involved.

8.7.2.3
Plastic rigid conduit
The main problem is that segregation must be maintained Plastic conduit is available in both circular and oval cross throughout the trunking system, so that at flat tee
sections, the latter frequently used for final connection to junctions the cables from one compartment need to pass accessory boxes in narrow partitions and plaster skims.

through the other compartment. Installation contractors may prefer to install separate systems of single compart-Joints are slip fit but may be cemented using a liquid ment trunking rather than a complicated system of multi-solvent where the conduit is to be buried in concrete.

compartment trunking.

8.7.2.4
Flexible conduit for final connections
8.7.2
Conduits
Flexible conduit is frequently used for the final
connections to moving or vibrating equipment such as 8.7.2.1
General
door closers and electric motors. Flexible conduits may be of metal or plastic or a combination of several materials.

In most installations using single core cables the final connections to items such as socket-outlets and switches Products vary greatly between manufacturers and those will be installed in conduit. In small installations the from one manufacturer may be incompatible with those conduits may run all the way from the distribution board; from another, or even with a different product range from in larger installations conduits will connect back into a the same manufacturer. Therefore it is important that the trunking system.

conduit and termination glands are sourced correctly.

Conduits may be surface mounted, suspended on hangers Flexible conduits are frequently referred to as ‘kopex’, or buried in walls and floors according to the require-after the name of a UK manufacturer.

Building wiring systems
8-15
8.7.2.5
Flexible conduit for fixed wiring
Where cable trays are mounted in external locations it is recommended that a cover is installed to protect the cables Flexible conduit is commonly used for fixed wiring in from direct sunlight.

Europe and the Middle East, where corrugated plastic conduit is embedded in walls and floors. In North
Many manufacturers use terms such as ‘medium duty’ and America flexible steel conduit is used within studding
‘heavy duty’ to describe their different products but these walls. Neither of these practices is common in the UK.

terms are not defined in the standard. Cable tray must be selected to carry the weight of the installed cables.

8.7.2.6
Rewirable conduit systems
8.8.2
Cable basket
In the past many designers specified that conduit systems had to be rewirable. The reasons for this are unclear but it This was originally aimed at data cabling installations but probably originates from the time when the life expectan-has become popular for both small power and sub-main cy of the cable insulation was only about ten or 20 years.

distribution systems. One of the main advantages over conventional tray is that cables can emerge in any
Nowadays there is no need to specify rewirable systems.

direction. Also, cables can be routed through the side of The electrical installations in most offices are often the basket rather than over the flange of the tray, which modified or completely changed well within the life
can cause deformation or damage to the cable sheath.

expectancy of the cables and the original conduits will rarely be in the correct locations.

Basket tray is typically available in widths from 50 to 600 mm with heights from 25 to 100 mm but these
dimensions are not defined by the standard and will vary 8.7.2.7
Open conduit systems
between manufacturers.

In open conduit systems the conduit is used solely as a Most manufacturers can supply conduit mounting
support system for multicore cables. Conduits terminate brackets so that conduit can be anchored firmly to the about 50–100 mm from equipment or junction boxes and tray. This provides an easy route for connection to
the cable enters the enclosure through a plastic gland.

equipment or for drops to switches and socket-outlets.

This type of wiring is extremely common in continental Dividers can be installed on the base of the tray to provide Europe but is not found in the UK.

segregation between different types of circuit.

Basket tray is not really suited to the installation of single core power cables because there is no easy way to install 8.8
Cable support systems
the clamps onto the basket wires.

The current British and European Standard (BS EN
61537(24)) covers traditional cable tray, basket tray and 8.8.3
Cable ladders
cable ladders.

Cable ladders are best suited to the installation of larger These types of systems are most appropriate where large power cables. Widths are available from about 100 mm up numbers of cables are distributed in the horizontal plane.

to 600 or 900 mm for very heavy duty ladders. On most They can be installed vertically but where large cables are ladders the rungs are all the same height but some
installed there may not be any advantage over cleating the manufacturers produce ladders where alternate rungs are cables directly to a channel support system.

of different heights. This can cause a problem when
calculating the loading because the weight is effectively carried by only half the rungs.

8.8.1
Cable tray
Designers and specifiers often require the installer to Cable tray is available in a range of widths from 50 to provide a proprietary cable cleat on every rung but it is 900 mm. The height of the sides is not defined by BS EN
debatable whether this is necessary for multicore cables, which can be secured with metal or nylon cable ties.

61537(24) and manufacturers choose the height to provide However single core cables should be adequately
the required strength. The sides may be a simple upstand, restrained to prevent movement during short-circuit faults have a horizontal lip, or be turned through 180°, known as and this will probably require the cables to be installed in a return flange. The bottom of the cable tray may be solid cleats.

or perforated.

Cable trays are manufactured from a variety of materials.

8.8.4
Drop rods and hangars
Galvanised mild steel is by far the most common but glass reinforced plastic is frequently used where corrosion may This is applicable both to the cable support systems be a problem.

described above and to trunking systems.

Multicore cables can be laid on the base of the tray and, in The simplest method is to install threaded studding
most installations, need only be strapped in place with directly into the soffit and mount the tray or trunking on a metal or plastic ties. Single core cables may need to be steel channel. A basic installation has no lateral support installed using cleats or clamps to prevent movement in and the system is able to move or swing from side to side.

the event of a short circuit.

However this does not seem to be a problem in practice.

8-16
Electricity in buildings
Where the system must be completely secured then
8.9.2
Power distribution
restraining brackets or ties can be used.

High current busbars are typically used for connections One major disadvantage of this type of installation is that between transformers or generators to the main switchgear it is not possible to install the cables from the side, they or for rising mains. In the latter case the busbar will have must be threaded through the length of the installation.

the facility to attach plug-in tap-offs for the connections to This does not occur where the tray or trunking is installed the floor distribution system. Tap-off points are provided on brackets from a wall or hung on rigid brackets from the at intervals of 300 mm to 600 mm.

soffit.

Busbars are manufactured typically in sections of between 2 and 3 m in length. Connections between busbar sections 8.8.5
Proprietary framing systems
vary greatly between manufacturers and in the simplest systems the busbar ends may be simply bolted together.

These support systems are generally referred to as
More complicated connection methods include single or
‘unistrut’ systems, after the name of a manufacturer. Such multiple bolts that clamp the ends of the busbars together.

systems are assembled on site from U-section channel and The clamping pressure is critical and manufacturers may a relatively small number of connection components; they require a torque wrench or supply double headed torque do not require any drilling or welding.

bolts that shear off when fully tightened.

Cable trays and trunking can be supported from the soffit The connections between the sections are the most
or cantilevered away from the wall. Access is available common source of failure in busbar systems. Any dirt or along the length of the run so cables can be installed from foreign matter on the contact surfaces will result in a high the side and do not need to be threaded from one end impedance connection that will eventually overheat and through all the drop-rods.

fail. Installers need to take great care to ensure that the contact surfaces are completely uncontaminated and this Where cables are installed vertically on walls it is usual for may not be easy with other building work going on.

the channel to be fixed to the wall and the cables cleated directly to it.

8.9.2.1
Busbar routes and connections to
equipment
This type of framing system is also used extensively for mounting switchgear and components.

Manufacturers’ catalogues frequently show examples of complicated busbar systems connected directly between items of equipment and even provide squared paper to 8.9
Busbar trunking systems
assist in the design of such systems. Busbar sections are then specially manufactured in non-standard lengths to suit the proposed installation.

8.9.1
General
This approach may be suitable where the equipment is Busbar trunking is basically a system of rigid conductors already installed and accurate dimensions are available but mounted on insulators inside a protective enclosure.

should be treated with caution for a new installation. The Busbars are manufactured in a range of current ratings, tolerances in normal building construction and the exact typically 32 A or 63 A for use in final distribution systems, location of equipment will probably be much greater than and up to several thousand amps for use in power distri-the adjustment available in the assembled busbar system bution.

and it is quite likely that the connections will not mate up, particularly where rigid connections are used. In such Conductors are generally copper in the smaller ratings but cases the final connections should be made with flexible may be copper, aluminium or copper clad aluminium for connections.

the high current ratings. Some busbar conductors are sleeved with insulating material. The enclosure may be Flexible connections should also be used for connections plastic or metal for the lower ratings but is normally metal to transformers. A busbar attached rigidly to a transformer for the higher ratings, often with ventilation openings.

will transmit the 100 or 120 Hz buzzing noise over a considerable distance.

The current rating usually differs according to the busbar orientation, that is, whether the ventilation openings are at the top and bottom or on the sides.

8.9.2.2
Tap-off units
Cast resin encapsulated busbars are available for use in Most modern busbar systems employ plug-in tap-off units corrosive atmospheres.

and with many designs these can be installed or removed without the need to de-energise the busbar. The way the Busbar systems are generally intended for use on three-tap-off unit connects to the busbars and the method of phase systems. Most manufacturers can offer a choice of securing the tap-off unit vary widely but all systems will neutral conductor sizes, ranging from half the phase have some form of bolts or clamps to ensure that the unit conductor rating for use on balanced systems up to twice cannot come loose.

the phase conductor rating where heavy harmonic
currents are anticipated. The CPC (earth) may be in the Tap-off units may incorporate fuses, switch-fuses or circuit form of a dedicated fifth conductor or the metal enclosure breakers according to the individual manufacturer’s range.

may be used.

Some manufacturers produce both single and three-phase
Building wiring systems
8-17
units, others only produce three-pole versions, particularly The electrical supply to the trunking is connected via an in the higher current ratings.

end feed unit, generally wired in multicore cable.

Trunking is manufactured in a variety of lengths up to The connection from the tap-off unit to the distribution about 3 m, but this varies between manufacturers.

system should be either a multicore cable or single core Individual lengths of trunking are connected together to cables in flexible conduit. All busbar systems will exhibit form a rigid system although some manufacturers can
some movement due to expansion and contraction so rigid supply flexible interconnections.

connections should not be used.

The term ‘electrak’ is often used as a generic name for underfloor trunking systems, after the name of a
8.9.2.3
Feed units and accessories
manufacturer.

End feed and centre feed units are available for installations where busbars are supplied via a cable. These 8.9.4
Ceiling systems
normally bolt directly onto the busbars.

Trunking systems for lighting control provide a very cost-Busbar systems must allow for expansion due to tempera-effective solution in a modern office installation. The most ture rise within the busbar itself and where the system basic systems are similar to those described for underfloor crosses a building expansion or movement joint. All
small power distribution where connections to the
manufacturers cater for these with expansion couplings or individual luminaires plug into switched conductors in straight sections incorporating suitable flexible compo-the trunking. The manufacturers can provide prefab-
nents. On average busbar expansion joints are required at ricated modular connections, so the high labour costs about 30 m intervals.

involved with a hard-wired system are avoided.

Larger busbar systems require a thrust block at the
These types of systems can be very sophisticated and can bottom of a vertical run and above any expansion joints.

incorporate all manner of control systems as an alternative With some busbar types the thrust block is the only place to directly switched luminaires.

where the busbar has any vertical support. The other mounting brackets are designed to allow the busbar to slide as it expands and contracts.

8.10
Prefabricated wiring
systems
8.9.3
Underfloor systems
Underfloor busbars can provide a very flexible system for 8.10.1
General
offices where the furniture layout is subject to frequent alteration. Busbars are installed under the raised floor and Prefabricated or modular wiring systems have become
provide a supply to boxes installed in the floor tiles.

increasingly popular over the past few years. In principle, Busbars from different manufacturers vary in rating but all the components can be manufactured in the factory 32 A and 63 A ratings are the most common.

and simply plugged together on site, thus resulting in a reduction in labour costs. There are additional advantages A typical 63 A system will incorporate a socket for
in that the system components can all be tested before connection of a tap-off unit at intervals of 300 mm. Most delivery to site.

manufacturers can provide a variety of tap-off units but the two most commonly found are a fused unit
The types of components and cabling vary greatly between incorporating a standard 13 A fuse and an unfused unit manufacturers and it is only possible to provide a general rated at 32 A. The unfused unit is normally used to
overview of the concept.

connect to a floor box with two 13 A sockets.

These types of system differ from the traditional conduit The Wiring Regulations(1) limit the cable length of an and trunking systems in that there is no containment and unfused unit to a maximum of 3 m, so busbars are
the pre-wired cabling is not enclosed in any way. The generally installed at about 6 m centres to give flexibility cables are often laid directly on the floor or on top of the when locating the floor boxes.

ceiling grid. Several manufacturers use metal clad (MC) flexible cables to provide a degree of protection against Trunking systems are available in both single phase and damage.

three-phase versions. Single phase tap-off units for the three-phase systems usually provide a means of selecting the required phase. Trunking is also available with
8.10.2
Small power systems
separate protective earth (CPC) and functional earth conductors and even with two electrically separate single The basic concept is similar to underfloor trunking, see phase systems.

above, except that the lengths of trunking are replaced by a network of connection boxes, sometimes referred to as Systems are available that comply with the Wiring
zone boxes. These boxes have a fixed plug for incoming Regulations section 607 requirements for high integrity power and multiple output sockets. The boxes are con-protective connection requirements, used where equipnected together by a prefabricated cable with a plug on ment has high earth leakage currents.

one end and a socket on the other. Supply cables to floor
8-18
Electricity in buildings
outlet boxes or socket-outlets on desks simply plug into 8.11.2.2
Emergency lighting systems
the connection box.

The current version of BS 5266-1(26) allows many different Various current ratings are available, with 20 A and 32 A cable types and is similar in this respect to the previous being common. One manufacturer’s product uses 6 or
version of the fire alarm standard BS 5839-1(25).

10 mm2 conductors for the connection and supply cables and 4 mm2 for tap-offs. Interconnection cables and tap-The standard is less prescriptive than the fire alarm offs are available pre-wired in a range of lengths from standard although the general requirements for the
around 3 to 10 m.

integrity of the installation are similar. The standard also recommends that cables be routed through areas of low As with underfloor busbars, modular wiring systems are fire risk. It does not regard the wiring to self-contained available with different combinations of protective and emergency luminaires to be part of the emergency lighting functional earth conductors.

circuits.

8.10.3
Lighting systems
8.11.2.3
Firefighting lifts
The principles are similar to those for underfloor systems.

Firefighting lifts in the UK are currently covered by Some manufacturers can supply complete systems that
British and European Standard BS EN 81-72(27) although incorporate lighting controls, supplies to HVAC plant such the older BS 5588-5(28) is more specific in describing the as fan coil units and connections back to a building electrical supply requirements.

management system (BMS).

According to BS 5588-5, a firefighting lift requires two separate supplies with an automatic changeover device located within the firefighting shaft, normally an auto-8.11
Emergency and life safety
matic changeover switch in the lift machine room. The systems
supplies need to be protected against the effects of the fire, either by installing them in the lift well, protecting them against the action of fire for a period not less than the 8.11.1
General
structural fire protection of the firefighting shaft, or installing cables with a CWZ classification according to BS
The term ‘life safety’ is not defined by the Wiring
6387(10). The cable supports should be capable of surviving Regulations(1) but is frequently used to describe equip-the effects of the fire.

ment such fire detection and alarm systems, firefighting pumps and lifts and the emergency lighting installation.

Although not specifically required by BS 5588-5, the two supply cables should take different routes to the machine Many of these subjects are covered by the relevant CIBSE
room.

Guides and British Standards. This section covers only the way these relate to the building wiring.

8.11.2.4
Sprinkler system pumps
8.11.2
Cable selection
The current British Standard, BS EN 12845(29), requires that cables be protected against fire and mechanical damage and ( a) run outside the building, or ( b) run 8.11.2.1
Fire detection and alarm systems
through parts of the building which are separated from any significant fire risk by walls, partitions or floors Suitable cable types are listed in BS 5839-1(25). In general having fire resistance of not less than 60 minutes, or ( c) are the choice is between fire-resistant LSF/LS0H cables or MI given additional protection, or ( d) are buried.

cables, although the standard does include additional test requirements for certain cable types.

This is less specific than the previous British Standard, BS
5306-2(30), which required that motor supply cables inside The standard requires that the methods of cable support buildings had an AWX or SWX classification according to do not reduce the circuit integrity below that afforded by BS 6387(10), and were protected from direct exposure to the cable itself. They must be capable of withstanding a fire or that they were mineral insulated.

similar temperature as the cable and for the same length of time. This effectively rules out the use of plastic cable clips, cable ties or trunking.

8.12
Cable routes within the
The standard also recommends that cables be installed without joints, and that any unavoidable joints should also building
be capable of withstanding a similar temperature as the cable and for the same length of time. It would be difficult to make a joint satisfying these criteria, particularly with 8.12.1
Mains and sub-mains
the LSF/LS0H types of cable.

Most modern multi-storey buildings will have one or
There are also requirements for providing mechanical more service cores with dedicated electrical riser
protection for the fire alarm cables but these are met by cupboards on each floor. The main incomers, whether
sensible installation practice such as additional protection high or low voltage, will probably be at ground floor or to guard against specific risks, e.g. forklift trucks.

basement level. The main switchgear should be located as
Building wiring systems
8-19
close as possible to the risers to avoid excessively long duplicated supply cables and redundant or standby
cables running horizontally in the basement to the bottom switchgear.

of the risers. If the risers are very far apart it may be better to have separate incomers and switchgear for each riser if It is imperative that the duplicated supply systems are this can be arranged.

separated physically as well as electrically. In many installations both the cables are installed in the same electrical riser. An incident such as a fire in the riser 8.12.1.1
High level installation
cupboard would result in both cables being damaged and the critical supply being lost. The duplicated cables The best routes for the sub-main cables is along a
should follow completely separate routes right up to the circulation route or corridor. In most basements the final changeover or transfer switchgear.

corridors will be high enough to allow the cables to be installed at high level on cable trays or ladders either suspended from the soffit or mounted on the walls. Cable routes between the main switchrooms and the risers
8.13
Installations in particular
should be as direct as possible but cables should not be routed through mechanical plantrooms unless this is
building types
unavoidable and should never be routed through boiler rooms as these can obviously become very warm. It is also The installation methods discussed so far apply to most advisable to avoid areas where cables may be more prone types of domestic, commercial and industrial buildings. In to damage, such as car parks and loading bays.

most countries the requirements for such installations are covered in the national wiring regulations and codes, such In many cases the support system for the cables can be as the Wiring Regulations(1).

shared with the mechanical services but this may only be practicable when both the mechanical and electrical
However other types of building, particularly those acces-installations are carried out by the same contractor. Care sible to the general public, may be subject to additional must be taken where cables are installed in close
approvals or regulations. Many of these regulations are proximity to hot water or steam services to ensure that determined at local rather than a national level and may overheating cannot occur, although in most cases the sub-be different in neighbouring towns, so it is not possible to mains will have been sized on voltage drop and a slight give details of the exact requirements.

reduction in current carrying capacity may be acceptable.

In England and Wales all theatres and other places
licensed for public entertainment, music, dancing etc. are 8.12.1.2
Trench systems
subject to the Local Government (Miscellaneous
provisions) Act(31). In Scotland, the Civic Government The alternative to installation at high level is to install the (Scotland) Act(32) applies. Local authorities dictate the cables in trenches cast into the floor construction. Cables exact requirements and typically these may include
may be laid directly on the floor of the trench but this may provision of residual current protection on socket-outlets result in damage if they are submerged in water for
and more frequent periodic inspection and testing.

extended periods of time. A more satisfactory arrangement Cinemas are covered by various acts such as the
is to install proprietary brackets on the side of the trench Cinematograph (Safety) Regulations(33).

or to use cable ladder or tray.

Where these or similar situations are encountered it is Cables installed in a covered trench will need to be essential to liaise with the relevant local authority such as derated because there is very little airflow to dissipate the the Building Control Officer or District Surveyor.

heat. Derating factors are given in the Wiring
Regulations(1) and cables may need to be derated by as much as 50% under extreme circumstances. Cable tunnels on large industrial projects are normally designed with 8.14
Hazardous areas
ventilation systems to dissipate the heat but this is impractical for building installations.

This is a specialised field and only the main principles can be given here. Hazardous areas are classified by BS EN
Where trenches are interconnected by ducts it is advisable 60079: Part 10(34) as one of three zones, based on the to install spare ducts to allow for future additions and probability that hazardous conditions are present.

alterations.

Explosive gases are classified into three groups according to their flammability.

Trenches should be fitted with covers that seal against the ingress or water and dirt as much as possible, although All equipment installed in a hazardous area must be
there will never be a perfect seal. Trench covers must be certified by an appropriate body and marked accordingly.

strong enough to carry the weight of any likely loads, The markings indicate where the equipment may be
particularly heavy plant that may need to be moved along installed, according to the zone and gas classification.

basement passageways.

Equipment such as luminaires that will become warm in normal use have an indication of the maximum surface temperature. In Europe the certifications is governed by 8.12.2
Reliability and redundancy
the ATEX Directive(35).

Modern financial and data processing installations require There are various methods for ensuring the suitability of a very secure power supply and these normally incorporate equipment for use in a hazardous area, referred to as the
8-20
Electricity in buildings
protection type, and defined in the various parts of BS EN
8.16.2
Electromagnetic compatibility
60079(34). These definitions, such as ‘increased safety’, are and harmonics
mainly of concern to the manufacturer. The designer or specifier is more concerned that the equipment is certified for the hazard, rather than how the certification was A more serious problem occurs when there are harmonics achieved.

in the system. The cable can act as an antenna and radiate these higher frequencies, which are then picked up by Installation in a hazardous area can be carried out in other cables.

single core cables in conduit or with multicore cables. In the UK and Europe the use of multicore cables has now One of the main sources has been the variable speed drives become more popular because of the generally simpler commonly used on mechanical plant. Manufacturers can installation methods. Basically the installation is the same provide advice on how to avoid excessive radiation,
as a conventional installation except that all equipment sometimes recommending screened rather than armoured and cable glands are certified products.

cables for the final connection to the motor. The connection and routing of the motor earth cable is sometimes critical.

8.15
Mains signalling
Electromagnetic compatibility is considered in detail in section 11.

Several systems have been produced for sending control or data signals over the mains wiring. These generally have specific requirements to enable them to work correctly, 8.17
Earthing
e.g. transmitters and receivers may need to be connected to the same phase of a three-phase system. Consequently it may not be possible to install these into an existing See also section 10 for detailed consideration of earthing.

installation. Where the use of such systems is envisaged it will be necessary to discuss the precise details with the All circuits in a fixed installation require a protective manufacturer at the early design stages.

earth conductor, correctly known as the circuit protective conductor or CPC. All exposed-conductive-parts of the installation (the hyphens are part of the IEE definition) that may become live under fault conditions must be
8.16
Electromagnetic
connected to the CPC. Typical examples of exposed-
compatibility
conductive-parts include metal switchboard enclosures, steel containment and support systems, luminaire bodies, motor frames etc. In the event of such parts becoming live the current will return to the source via the
8.16.1
Electromagnetic compatibility
CPC and be of
sufficient magnitude to operate the protective device.

at 50/60 Hz
All exposed conductive parts are connected to the CPC, and All electrical currents generate a magnetic field. In most consequently to each other, so under an earth fault
parts of an installation the phase and neutral conductors condition the voltages between simultaneously accessible are in close proximity and the individual magnetic fields parts will not be of such magnitude and duration to be will tend to cancel each other out. However in some areas dangerous. This type of protection is known as ‘earthed the cables may not be close to each other, or may be equipotential bonding and automatic disconnection of installed in an asymmetric pattern. This is often the case supply’ (EEBADS).

where a supply transformer is connected to the main
switchboard with single core cables and the high currents In theory, practically any metallic path can be used as the can result in strong magnetic fields. These magnetic fields CPC but some are better than others as detailed below.

may be strong enough to affect cathode ray tubes in
computer monitors or televisions and render the areas close to the switchroom unusable for normal office work.

8.17.1
Earth loop impedance
These stray fields can usually be avoided by ensuring that the cable installation is as close to symmetrical as possible, In the event of contact between a live conductor and an although in some cases it may be necessary to screen the exposed conductive part, the current will flow down the cables by enclosing them in steel trunking, see section live conductor and back to the source through the CPC.

8.7.1.

The magnitude of this current must be sufficiently large to operate the upstream protective device within a short A typical computer monitor will be affected by a field time. In the UK the Wiring Regulations(1) require that the strength of about 1 µT and unusable at about 10 µT. For protective device operates within five seconds where the comparison, the National Radiological Protection Board circuit supplies fixed equipment or 0.4 seconds where it (NRPB) recommends a limit of 1.6 mT as the maximum
supplies socket-outlets.

continuous exposure for humans.

The exposed-conductive-part will become live, at a
In most mains frequency (50/60 Hz) systems, the magnetic potential determined by the relative resistances of the fields will not cause interference to data or communica-supply conductor and the return CPC conductor. In the tion systems provided that such circuits are separated by a case of a portable appliance connected via a plug and minimum of 300 mm.

socket, these two resistances will probably be of similar
Building wiring systems
8-21
value and the appliance will reach a potential of around However a degree of care needs to be taken when
half the live conductor voltage.

determining the size of this additional CPC. Some electrical design software will indicate that only a very small CPC is The current that will flow is determined by the voltage required to reduce the earth fault loop impedance to an and the overall impedance of the circuit along the live acceptable value. Sometimes cables with cross sectional conductor and back up the CPC, including any impedance areas as small as 4 or 6 mm2 are indicated, particularly of the external connections and the source itself. This where the disconnection time without the additional CPC
impedance is known as the earth fault loop impedance.

is only just over five seconds.

The Wiring Regulations include tables of maximum earth Installing cables of this size in parallel with large power loop impedance for commonly used types and ratings of cables looks very strange, particularly when the bonding protective devices.

conductors on the support systems are much larger, and may generate queries from the installation contractor.

8.17.2
Steel trunking and conduits
8.17.5
Support systems
Steel conduit and trunking can be used as the sole CPC, see In the UK it is permissible to use an electrically
section 8.7.1) but extra care is required on the part of the continuous support system as the CPC. Most galvanised installer to ensure that there is a sound electrical steel cable tray and ladder systems will be firmly bolted connection between the component parts. This is simple together and there will be good continuity across the where galvanised conduits are screwed together but poses joints. Normally bonding conductors will be installed problems when connecting conduit to painted trunking.

between separate sections or across building expansion The paint must be removed from the trunking surface to joints.

get good metal to metal contact. However, this removes the protection and makes the metal more likely to rust, However this type of CPC is very unusual and it would be difficult to ensure that no alterations or modifications which may result in the loss of electrical continuity.

reduced the efficacy of the earth path. It is not
recommended that this solution be used in building
A problem also occurs where additions or alterations are installations.

made to the installation. It is not possible to cut or remove sections of the trunking while any of the circuits are live because this would disconnect the CPC from the
8.17.6
Equipotential bonding
downstream system.

The main danger to persons is if they are in simultaneous For these reasons, many designers and specifiers do not contact with conductive parts that are at different
permit conduit and trunking systems to be used as the potentials.

CPC
and insist that dedicated conductors are installed.

The Wiring Regulations(1) define ‘extraneous-conductive-parts’ which are conductive parts not forming part of the 8.17.3
Installations using single core
electrical installation. These include non-electrical services such as pipes and ducting. Such services may cables
introduce earth potential alongside the electrical
installation and the equipment served by it, making it Where plastic trunking and conduit systems are used, or quite likely that a person could be in simultaneous contact where steel containment systems are not allowed to be with an exposed-conductive-part made live by an earth used as the CPC, it is usual to install a single core CPC cable fault and a nearby extraneous-conductive-part.

with the circuit phase and neutral conductors. On final sub-circuits this CPC cable is often the same cross sectional To avoid this situation it is normal to install bonding area as the phase and neutral, although the calculations conductors between these different extraneous-conductive-will usually permit one size smaller.

parts and between the extraneous-conductive-parts and the exposed-conductive-parts.

In some cases it is possible to use a single CPC cable for more than one circuit. For example, a multi-gang switch This equipotential bonding is to be found in all sizes and box controlling several lighting circuits would only types of installation from small domestic up to large require a single
commercial and industrial installation.

CPC, not one for each circuit. This is not
the case with small power ring circuits as the CPC must be Equipotential bonding is considered in detail in section run in a ring with the phase and neutral conductors.

10.3.10.

8.17.4
Multicore armoured cables
8.18
Testing and inspection
Four-core armoured cables are used extensively in the UK
on three-phase and neutral systems, with the armouring In the UK the Wiring Regulations(1) give full details of the used for the CPC. With long cable runs it is often found inspection and testing requirements for new installations that the earth fault loop impedance is too high to ensure and for the periodic inspection of existing installations.

that the protective device will operate within the five second period. The solution is simply to install an
Testing and inspection is considered in detail in section 12
additional single core cable in parallel.

of this Guide.

8-22
Electricity in buildings
8.18.1
Visual inspection
In two-storey dwellings with a timber first floor it is commonplace to run all the small power ring main wiring The Wiring Regulations(1) require good workmanship for under the first floor, dropping down to the socket-outlets all installations, but this is a very subjective quantity. A on the ground floor. Lighting circuits for the ground floor visual inspection will provide a good indication as to the are also run under the floor while lighting circuits for the general standard of workmanship and may indicate where upstairs rooms are run in the attic or loft space.

the installer has taken shortcuts or produced an
unacceptable finished product, even if these do not
The vertical cable runs to socket-outlets and switches are specifically contravene any of the Regulations.

normally given additional protection by a PVC channel but may be buried in the plaster. The channel does not
normally allow the cable to be replaced, or more cables to 8.18.2
Certification
be added.

All new installations in the UK must be subjected to the In exposed parts of the installation, such as in a garage, inspection and test procedures detailed in the Wiring cables may be directly mounted onto the surface or may be Regulations(1). After completion of this work a certificate installed in plastic conduit or mini-trunking. The latter must be issued to the person who ordered the installation provides some additional protection and gives the
work and this certificate must include full test results as impression of a more professional job.

well as any deviations or departures.

8.19.2
Industrial installations
Examples of suitable certificates are included in the Wiring Regulations. The full certificate includes separate The type of installation should be selected according to sections where the relevant parties can certify the design, the degree of mobility of equipment or flexibility required.

installation and testing separately, as these will invariably be done by different persons on a large installation. There Final circuits supplying machine tools or equipment
is also a more simple certificate to be used where a single subject to frequent relocation are best served by using person has responsibility for all three areas, as may be the plug-in busbar trunking run at high level. Where
case with a domestic installation.

equipment is static it is common in the UK to use single core cables in steel conduit and trunking. The same
8.18.3
Periodic inspection and testing
principals can be applied to the lighting installation.

European practice will commonly use multicore non-
armoured cables.

The Wiring Regulations(1) require installations to be subject to a periodic inspection and testing regime, but the Sub-mains to local distribution boards can be run in requirements have changed over the years. Previous
armoured multicore cables installed at high level on cable editions stated that the installation should be tested at a trays or ladders.

maximum interval of five years, or a shorter interval if recommended by the person doing the testing.

8.19.3
Office and commercial
The current requirements are less specific and allow the testing to be integrated with a planned preventative installations
maintenance routine, provided that suitable records are kept. In some cases this would allow a part of the
The modern office installation seems to have a typical installation to be tested and the results compared with lifespan of only a few years before being extensively those obtained previously. If no deterioration had
redesigned and flexibility and ease of alteration are now occurred then it may be deemed unnecessary to test the the key points.

remainder. In reality this is probably an acknowledgement Traditionally these installations have been carried out of the much greater life expectancy of modern cables and using single core cables in steel conduit and trunking for insulation materials.

both the lighting and small power installation. This type of installation is very difficult to modify to suit a change in layout and in many cases the original containment 8.19
Guidance for designers
systems may simply be left in place when a refurbishment is carried out.

and specifiers
Where an office has a raised floor the small power circuits Building wiring systems in commercial installations have can be supplied using 32 A or 63 A plug-in busbar
changed considerably over the past few years although trunking. This provides the flexibility to locate or move domestic and industrial installations have remained much the socket-outlets to convenient locations for desks and the same.

office furniture. Where there is no raised floor it is possible to install proprietary poles incorporating the socket-outlets and any communication and data services.

8.19.1
Domestic installations
These can be supplied from similar busbar trunking run above the suspended ceiling. This type of installation is In the UK the majority of installations are still carried out often deemed to be unacceptable on aesthetic grounds but using flat twin and earth type wiring, although this may may be the only solution for large open office spaces where now be LSF or LS0H rather than PVC/PVC.

there is no possibility of access from below.

Building wiring systems
8-23
Lighting circuits can also be supplied via plug-in busbar 15
BS EN 60702: Mineral insulated cables and their terminations with trunking systems that can incorporate all the switching a rated voltage not exceeding 750 V: Part 1: 2002: Cables; Part 2: and control functions. Final connections to the luminaires 2002: Terminations (London: British Standards Institution) may simply be flexible cords run above the suspended (2002)
ceiling, provided that there is no danger of mechanical 16
BS 6004: 2000: Electric cables. PVC insulated, non-armoured cables damage to the cables. An alternative is to use a completely for voltages up to and including 450/750 V, for electric power, lighting modular system with plug-in cables and connectors. This and internal wiring (London: British Standards Institution) has the advantage that the individual items can probably (2000)
be re-used to suit further changes in luminaire layout.

17
BS 7211: 1998: Electric cables. Thermosetting insulated, non-armoured cables for voltages up to and including 450/750 V, for Whichever solution is adopted it should provide the
electric power, lighting and internal wiring, and having low emission required degree of flexibility and this effectively rules out of smoke and corrosive gases when affected by fire (London: British the steel containment systems that have served for so long.

Standards Institution) (1998)
18
BS 7889: 1997: Electric cables. Thermosetting insulated, unarmoured cables for a voltage of 600/1000 V (London: British References
Standards Institution) (1997)
19
BS 5467: 1997: Electric cables. Thermosetting insulated, armoured 1
BS 7671: 2001: Requirements for electrical installations. IEE
cables for voltages of 600/1000 V and 1900/3300 V (London: Wiring Regulations. Sixteenth edition (London: British Standards British Standards Institution) (1997)
Institution) (2001)
20
BS 6724: 1997: Electric cables. Thermosetting insulated, armoured 2
Selection and Erection of Equipment Guidance Note 1 to IEE
cables for voltages of 600/1000 V and 1900/3300 V, having low Wiring Regulations (London: Institution of Electrical emission of smoke and corrosive gases when affected by fire (London: Engineers) (1999) ISBN: 0852969546
British Standards Institution) (1997)
3
BS 1363: 13 A plugs, socket-outlets and adaptors; Part 1: 1995: 21
BS 6500: 2000: Electric cables. Flexible cords rated up to 300/500 V, Specification for rewirable and non-rewirable 13 A fused plugs: Part for use with appliances and equipment intended for domestic, office 2: 1995: Specification for 13 A switched and unswitched socket-and similar environments
(London: British Standards
outlets; Part 3: 1995: Specification for adaptors; Part 4: 1995: Institution) (2000)
Specification for 13 A fused connection units switched and unswitched (London: British Standards Institution) (1995) 22
BS 7919: 2001: Electric cables. Flexible cables rated up to 450/750V, 4
Isolation and Switching Guidance Note 2 to IEE Wiring for use with appliances and equipment intended for industrial and Regulations (London: Institution of Electrical Engineers) similar environments (London: British Standards Institution) (1999) ISBN: 0852969554 1999
(2001)
5
Protection Against Fire Guidance Note 4 to IEE Wiring 23
BS EN 60947: Specification for low-voltage switchgear and Regulations (London: Institution of Electrical Engineers) controlgear: Part 1: 1999: General rules (London: British (1999) ISBN: 0852969570
Standards Institution) (2001)
6
Protection Against Electric Shock Guidance Note 5 to IEE Wiring 24
BS 4678: Cable trunking: Part 1: 1971: Steel surface trunking; Part Regulations (London: Institution of Electrical Engineers) 4: 1982: Specification for cable trunking made of insulating material (1999) ISBN: 0852969589 1999
(London: British Standards Institution) (1971, 1982) 7
Protection Against Overcurrent Guidance Note 6 to IEE Wiring 25
BS EN 61386: Conduit systems for cable management: Part 1: Regulations (London: Institution of Electrical Engineers) 2004: General requirements; Part 21: 2004: Particular requirements.

(1999) ISBN: 0852969597
Rigid conduit systems; Part 22: 2004: Particular requirements.

Pliable conduit systems; Part 23: 2004: Particular requirements.

8
BS 6360: 1991: Specification for conductors in insulated cables and Flexible conduit systems (London: British Standards Institution) cords (London: British Standards Institution) (1991) (2004)
9
BS EN 60702: Mineral insulated cables and their terminations with 26
BS 4568: Specification for steel conduit and fittings with metric a rated voltage not exceeding 750 V: Part 1:2002: Cables (London: threads of ISO form for electrical installations: Part 1: 1970: Steel British Standards Institution) (2002)
conduit, bends and couplers
(London: British Standards
10
BS 6387: 1994: Specification for performance requirements for cables Institution) (1970)
required to maintain circuit integrity under fire conditions (London: 27
BS EN 61537: 2002: Cable tray systems and cable ladder systems for British Standards Institution) (1994)
cable management (London: British Standards Institution) 11
BS 7629: Specification for 300/500 V fire resistant electric cables (2002)
having low emission of smoke and corrosive gases when affected by fire: Part 1: 1997: Multicore cables; Part 2: 1997: Multipair cables 28
BS 5839: Fire detection and alarm systems for buildings: Part 1: (London: British Standards Institution) (1997)
2002: Code of practice for system design, installation, commissioning and maintenance (London: British Standards Institution) (2002) 12
BS 7846: 2000: Electric cables. 600/1000 V armoured fire-resistant cables having thermosetting insulation and low emission of smoke and 29
BS 5266: Emergency lighting: Part 1: 1999: Code of practice for corrosive gases when affected by fire (London: British Standards the emergency lighting of premises other than cinemas and certain Institution) (2000)
other specified premises used for entertainment (London: British Standards Institution) (1999)
13
BS EN 50200: 2000: Method of test for resistance to fire of unprotected small cables for use in emergency circuits (London: 30
BS EN 81: Safety rules for the construction and installation of lifts.

British Standards Institution) (2000)
Particular applications for passenger and goods passenger lifts: Part 72: 2003: Firefighters lifts
(London: British Standards
14
BS 8434: Methods of test for assessment of the fire integrity of electric Institution) (1999)
cables. Test for unprotected small cables for use in emergency circuits: Part 1: 2003: BS EN 50200 with addition of water spray; Part 2: 31
BS 5588: Fire precautions in the design, construction and use of 2003: BS EN 50200 with a 930 °C flame and with water spray buildings: Part 5: 1991: Code of practice for firefighting stairs and (London: British Standards Institution) (2003)
lifts (London: British Standards Institution) (1991)
8-24
Electricity in buildings
32
BS EN 12845: 2003: Fixed firefighting systems. Automatic sprinkler BS 6004: 2000: Electric cables. PVC insulated, non-armoured cables for voltages systems. Design, installation and maintenance (London: British up to and including 450/750 V, for electric power, lighting and internal wiring Standards Institution) (2003)
( Note: covers PVC insulated cables, unsheathed or PVC sheathed. Includes conduit wires and flat twin and earth.)

33
BS 5306: Fire extinguishing installations and equipment on premises: Part 2: 1990: Specification for sprinkler systems (London: British BS 7211: 1998: Electric cables. Thermosetting insulated, non-armoured cables Standards Institution) (1990) (superseded)
for voltages up to and including 450/750 V, for electric power, lighting and internal wiring, and having low emission of smoke and corrosive gases when 34
Local Government (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1976
affected by fire ( Note: covers similar cables to BS 6004 but with LSF/LS0H
(London: Her Majesty’s Stationery Office) (1976)
insulation and sheath.)

35
Civic Government (Scotland) Act 1982 Chapter 45 (London: Her Majesty’s Stationery Office) (1982)
BS 7629: Specification for 300/500 V fire resistant electric cables having low emission of smoke and corrosive gases when affected by fire: Part 1: 1997: 36
The Cinematograph (Safety) Regulations 1955 Statutory Multicore cables; Part 2: 1997: Multipair cables ( Note: covers fire resistant Instruments 1955 No. 1129 (London: Her Majesty’s Stationery cables with LSF/LS0H insulation and sheath.)

Office) (1955)
BS 6500: 2000: Electric cables. Flexible cords rated up to 300/500 V, for use 37
BS EN 60079: Electrical apparatus for explosive gas atmospheres; with appliances and equipment intended for domestic, office and similar Part 10: 2003: Classification of hazardous areas (London: British environments
Standards Institution) (2003)
38
Directive 94/9/EC of the European Parliament and the Council BS 7919: 2001: Electric cables. Flexible cables rated up to 450/750V, for use of 23 March 1994 on the approximation of the laws of the with appliances and equipment intended for industrial and similar environments Member States concerning equipment and protective systems intended for use in potentially explosive atmospheres Official J.

BS EN 60702: Mineral insulated cables and their terminations with a rated of the European Communities L060 14–15 (3/03/1994) voltage not exceeding 750 V: Part 1: 2002: Cables; Part 2: 2002: Terminations Joints
Bibliography
BS EN 61238: Compression and mechanical connectors for power cables for rated voltages up to 36 kV (U = 42 kV): Part 1: 2003: Test methods and m
requirements ( Note: covers compression and mechanical connectors for British Standards
cables larger than 10 mm2.)

The notes given below are intended to indicate the
Trunking, conduits, trays, ladders
content of the standard where this is not completely clear from the title. Several of the standards listed consist of BS 4568: Steel conduits
more than one part.

BS 4678: Cable trunking: Part 1: 1971: Steel surface trunking; Part 2: 1973: Steel underfloor (duct) trunking; Part 4: 1982: Cable trunking. Specification Cables
for cable trunking made of insulating material
BS 6346: 1997: Electric cables. PVC insulated, armoured cables for voltages of BS EN 50085: Cable trunking and cable ducting systems for electrical 600/1000 V and 1900/3300 V ( Note: covers pvc insulated, pvc sheathed installations: Part 1: 1999: General requirements; Part 2: 2001: Section 3: power cables; editions up to 1997 also covered non-armoured cables.) Particular requirements for slotted cable trunking systems intended for installation in cabinets ( Note: covers metallic and non-metallic trunking.) BS 5467: 1997: Electric cables. Thermosetting insulated, armoured cables for voltages of 600/1000 V and 1900/3300 V ( Note: covers BS EN 50086: Specification for conduit systems for cable management: Part 1: XLPE or EPR
1994: General requirements; Part 2: Particular requirements: Section 1: 1996: insulated, PVC sheathed power cables; editions up to 1997 also covered Rigid conduit systems; Section 2: 1996: Pliable conduit systems; Section 3: non-armoured cables.)

1996: Flexible conduit systems; Section 4: 1994: Conduit systems buried underground ( Note: covers metallic and non-metallic conduits; rigid, BS 6724: 1997: Electric cables. Thermosetting insulated, armoured cables for flexible and pliable.)

voltages of 600/1000 V and 1900/3300 V, having low emission of smoke and corrosive gases when affected by fire ( Note: covers power cables with BS EN 61537: 2002 (IEC 61537: 2001): Cable tray systems and cable ladder LSF/LS0H insulation and sheath, but not fire resistant.) systems for cable management ( Note: covers cable tray and ladder systems, including basket tray.)

BS 7846: 2000: Electric cables. 600/1000 V armoured fire-resistant cables having thermosetting insulation and low emission of smoke and corrosive gases BS EN 60439: Specification for low-voltage switchgear and controlgear when affected by fire ( Note: covers fire resistant power cables with LSF/LS0H
assemblies: Part 2: 2000 (IEC 60439-2: 2000): Particular requirements for insulation and sheath.)

busbar trunking systems (busways) ( Note: covers busbar trunking systems.)

9-1
9
Uninterruptible power supplies
9.1


Introduction

Table 9.1 Mean time between failures and mean down time for 34
commercial consumers during 1983
The need for clean reliable power is increasing and is Measure
Value
being met today by the provision of uninterruptible power Worst
Average
Best
supply (UPS) systems of varying technologies and
Mean time between failures (h)
43
155
685
capacities. Historically, UPS was provided only for such applications as airport lighting, communications systems Mean down time (s)
8.145
1.72
0.1
or mainframe computers. Initially they were provided for short term duty, using flywheels to store energy to cover the time span between mains failure and restoration of commercial consumers during 1983 showing the mean
supply from standby generators. Today the needs can be time between failure (MTBF) and the mean down time
communications equipment and system processors up to (MDT) of the mains power supply for all deviations of large data centres with mixed processor and communica-voltage and frequency longer than 10 ms in duration. (See tions equipment etc., operating continuously with little, if section 9.3.2 for consideration of system MTBF.)

any, opportunity for maintenance shut-downs. Medical monitoring systems and industrial process plants are other Note that the MDT does not only indicate loss of power but typical loads. The loads served have also changed dramat-also deviations to the specification for ‘computer grade’
ically with equipment using phase controlled rectifiers power (typically ±1% in voltage and ±1% in frequency).

and switched mode power supplies, which themselves are more susceptible to power disturbances whilst reflecting Where a UPS supplier or manufacturer quotes an MTBF
load harmonic current which can cause supply problems.

figure for a module or system it must always be linked to the quality of the mains supply.

The function of any UPS is two-fold:
—
to stabilise unstable supplies
Having recognised the need for UPS there are a number of systems available from small, single phase modules
—
to protect against complete loss of supply.

produced to meet the needs of dedicated micro-computers, up to large multi-module ‘redundant’ systems serving In terms of the stabilising function, the necessary output-distribution networks throughout large multi-function to-load tolerances of (typically) ±1% in voltage and ±1%
developments.

in frequency should be maintained, without the use of the battery (i.e. under normal UPS running conditions, with There are currently two basic designs of UPS, static input supply variations of ±10% in voltage and ±5% in transistor and rotary, although historically thyristor frequency.

technology was used for larger, static systems. These systems are described later but it should be noted that the Today’s sensitive loads, whether data processing or
technology used influences both the location of equipment communication systems, can generally accept a break or within a development and the way it is applied to the disruption in power supply for a time not exceeding
loads. System characteristics can themselves be considered 10 ms. In the range of 10 ms to a few seconds there are in three categories:
many deviations on the power supply (outside of the input tolerances for such equipment), which include:
—
dedicated ‘in room’ (i.e. within the office environ-
ment) units, up to 5 kV·A single phase
—
frequency variations
—
three-phase units up to 160 kV·A (which are
—
voltage dips and spikes
designed for ‘in room’ installation but can only
—
micro-breaks in one or more phase
accommodate integral batteries up to about
30 kV·A)
—
‘brown-outs’
—
larger systems ranging between 160 kV·A to many
—
power surges
MV·A, which would require plant room accommo-
—
black-outs.

dation.

Therefore a UPS has to perform a vital role in power conditioning, protecting the load from the vagaries of the raw mains and other consumers from the harmonics
9.2
Basic types of UPS systems
generated by the critical load. Mains quality has an impact upon the overall system reliability and it is therefore Historically, regardless of whether or not the inverter important to have basic data upon which to make
power switching devices were thyristors or transistors, the comparisons. Table 9.1 represents a long term study of 34
output stage is a transformer (‘static UPS’) or rotating
9-2
Electricity in buildings
generator (‘rotary UPS’). Recent power switching tech-until the battery cut-off voltage is reached and the UPS
nology has allowed the omission of these transformers.

switches off.

The arrangement of the basic components falls into four Parallel on-line systems (see Figure 9.3) normally supply configurations:
the load with raw mains via a static switch (for rapid disconnection of the mains) and, often, a series reactor.

—
off-line
The power switching stage runs (off-load) in parallel with
—
triport
the mains, ready to take over the load in the event of mains failure. The normal running efficiency is therefore
—
parallel on-line
high but the degree of isolation of the load harmonics
—
series on-line, or double power conversion.

from the mains supply is limited, as is the protection against mains disturbances reaching the load. Savings in Each configuration fundamentally changes the quality of cost can be achieved due to the fact that the power
power supply to the load, and the effect that the UPS/load switching elements in the inverter (rotating machine in has on the mains supply. It is important that the specifier the case of a rotary UPS) need not be fully rated.

can recognise the equipment type on offer by comparing operating performance.

Series on-line systems (see Figure 9.4) have a fully rated power path from the mains to the load, and process 100%
In off-line systems (see Figure 9.1) the load is normally of the power in normal operation. Modern designs, both supplied from the mains via a static transfer switch. The static and rotary, offer full galvanic isolation (mains from rectifier acts as a battery charger when the mains is load) with high efficiencies.

present. Mains failure causes the transfer switch to disconnect the load from the mains and connect it to the All of the above systems can be fitted with a maintenance inverter. There can be a break in the supply in the order of bypass (although usually unnecessary for small off-line 3 to 4 ms.

systems), and no-break auto-bypass facilities. Maintenance can therefore be carried out without a break in the supply A triport system (see Figure 9.2) incorporates a combined to the load.

inverter/charger capable of both recharging the battery when the mains is available and supplying the load with AC power when the static switch has disconnected the 9.2.1
Dedicated range up to 5 kV·A
mains.

These units are generally for single phase operation and Both the off-line and triport designs provide limited are manufactured in cabinets sufficiently small that they power conditioning but high efficiency. They both take can be installed beneath desk tops. They are generally advantage of the fact that the power components need not employed to support either single micro-computers or a be fully rated and are usually smaller and less costly.

file server for a small group of terminals in a localised area. Above this capacity, UPS systems are applied to Additional filtering adds to the cost and reduces both the provide more general support via power distribution units efficiency and reliability of such systems. Due to the (PDUs).

triport design’s reliance upon the mains supply, it can be susceptible to problems when the incoming voltage and There are many manufacturers producing units with
frequency tolerance band is wide, particularly when being various capacities in the range 100 V·A to 5 kV·A. This supplied by a standby diesel generator. The effect is for the group of UPS modules can be further divided into ‘on-line’, UPS to switch to battery operation and stay in that mode
‘off-line’ and ‘triport’ categories.

On-line UPS systems are designed to condition the supply Mains
Load
to the critical load continuously by the use of the normal Transfer
switch
power route, i.e. the inverter is working even when the Rectifier
Inverter
Mains
Transfer
Load
switch
Battery
Rectifier
Inverter
Figure 9.1 Off-line UPS system
Battery
Mains
Static
Load
Figure 9.3 Parallel on-line UPS system
switch
Inverter/
Mains
Load
Rectifier
Inverter
charger
Battery
Battery
Figure 9.2 Triport UPS system
Figure 9.4 Series on-line UPS system
Uninterruptible power supplies
9-3
mains is healthy. The system uses a fully rated rectifier to functions. Units up to 5 kV·A capacity operating on single convert the incoming AC mains into DC; this DC supply is phase are normally configured for direct connection to then inverted via high speed switching devices into a final circuit distribution, although for security purposes it synthesised AC supply. The batteries, housed within the is likely that dedicated upstream circuits would be used.

UPS enclosure, are connected to and charged from the DC
Many units employ integral 13-A socket outlets with
stage of the equipment. The majority of systems currently sufficient intelligence to shutdown loads gracefully as the available use high speed transistor technology in the end of battery autonomy approaches.

inverter to produce a pulse width modulated (PWM) output which can react to maximum current demands and
‘Off-line’ systems are constructed with similar compo-maintain an approximately sinusoidal output voltage
nents to ‘on-line’ units, the fundamental difference being waveform.

that, during the period that the mains is within acceptable tolerances, the load is served directly using various Historically, thyristor technology was employed in the filtering and surge suppression techniques. The rectifier, inverter stage to produce a stepped waveform which had a battery and inverter limb are only employed when the high harmonic content and had to be smoothed, using
input conditions are unacceptable or the mains fails.

filters, to give an acceptable supply waveform. Due to the Different methods of connection of the battery-fed supply loads to which these units are being applied, and the are employed varying from high speed circuit breakers to greater availability of power transistors, the majority of static switches with transfer times as short as one
units in this range now use transistor technology.

millisecond.

The units are interposed between the raw mains and the The other option available in this range, but limited to critical load. A ‘healthy’ mains condition is when the single phase operation, is the ferro-resonant transformer.

input voltage and frequency are within acceptable input In these systems the transformer has a dual primary input, tolerances, typically ±10% and ±5% respectively. Where one being from the mains the other from a conventional the input supply wanders outside the given tolerances, the rectifier, battery and inverter leg which operates only output supply is derived from the battery. If input supplies when a mains interruption is detected. The few microsec-are frequently variable, or long term generator support is onds taken by the inverter to come on-line is covered by expected due to an unreliable supply, then consideration the stored energy in the transformer. From the user’s should be given to an increased battery autonomy period viewpoint, the issues that separate the two types of system to maintain capacity in readiness for total supply failure.

come down to one of risk: the off-line system is known for its ‘blips’ on transfer and, unless the inverter is constantly Total output harmonic voltage distortion (THVD) levels of monitored, the likelihood of failure when called to act ‘in 5% are typical for these units (when supplying a linear anger’ is a constant worry. Transient let-through is not a load) but when non-linear loads with high crest factors are major issue at these kV·A ratings, if line conditioning and expected de-rating may be necessary if the THVD is to be suppression is fitted for ‘clean power’.

kept low.

Component failure or short term overloads are always 9.2.2
Free standing units up to 160 kV·A
likely in any system and to protect the critical load from disconnection, automatic bypasses are employed in many The capacity level of 160 kV·A selected for this group is systems. This bypass leg is served from the raw mains and is connected to the critical load output terminals by means approximate, as are all thresholds used within this section of a static switch. Under component failure or overload of this Guide.

conditions, and provided that the ‘raw’ mains supply is within tolerances of (typically) ±10% and ±1% for voltage Single phase units are available up to approximately and frequency respectively, the load will be connected to 50 kV·A, but beyond this level the systems tend to have the bypass. It is usual that, once overload conditions have three-phase inputs which are preferable when considering passed, the critical load will revert to the normal power supply distribution arrangements. The 160 kV·A figure is route.

significant when considering losses as it is probably the highest level that would be acceptable for heat rejection The overload conditions can include a downstream short into a computer suite or office area. A further considera-circuit and this type of UPS, along with all such static tion in this respect is the noise emission from units within systems incorporating an inverter and output transformer, an occupied working environment, which could exceed
has a relatively high output impedance (high sub-transient acceptable criteria when operating at a high load factor.

reactance). Therefore they have to resort to the mains supply to clear a fault. Both the actual transfer operation By far the greater number of units, if not all, in this and availability of the mains introduces a risk element in category now use transistor technology in the inverter.

the supply integrity.

The systems follow the conventional dual conversion
arrangement of rectifier, DC limb and inverter with a static In their basic form, systems generally comprise integral bypass limb connected to a common output via a static batteries, chargers, inverters, and general circuit and switch. A typical arrangement is shown in Figure 9.5.

component protection with basic status indication
provided on the enclosure. The units are constructed to The method of operation follows that of smaller ‘in room’
operate between temperature limits of 0 °C and 40 °C, and units with similar voltage and frequency tolerance levels.

are provided with acoustic attenuation such that noise During periods when the equipment and the input supply emission under normal operation is below 60 dB(A) at is healthy the critical load is isolated from any mains 1 metre. This equipment can be augmented by ‘plug-in’
disturbances by the DC stage. During equipment faults or diagnostic indicators offering status and normal metering overload conditions the load is transferred to the bypass
9-4
Electricity in buildings
energy storage, the diesel engine only starting up when an Auto bypass
extended mains failure is experienced, see section 9.2.7.

static switch
Where standby generation is not installed then the battery Mains
Load
autonomy time has to be selected to cover the orderly shutdown of the load, as the period of mains failure is Rectifier
Inverter
Transformer
Filter
Isolator
unlikely to be predictable. Also, the UPS is unlikely to support the cooling equipment necessary to overcome heat gains both from the UPS and equipment and an early shut-VRLA
down would be necessary to prevent excessively high
battery
temperatures.

Figure 9.5 Typical transistor static UPS with auto-bypass 9.2.4
Static systems with thyristor
limb via the static switch and supported only by the unconditioned mains.

inverter
Refinements are available including full maintenance It is unlikely that users of this document will need to bypass arrangements to allow safe and easy servicing of consider the performance of thyristor inverters but, for equipment whilst feeding the critical load from raw mains.

completeness, they are described briefly here.

Remote alarm, diagnostics and metering facilities are optional features allowing interfaces with building man-In common with other forms of static system, these
agement systems (BMS), tailored remote monitors, or even systems comprise a controlled rectifier, a battery supply the load, via (typically) RS232 ports. In general, however, from the DC link and an inverter using a thyristor
due to the ever increasing range of BMS equipment (each switching device to produce a stepped square wave output having its own programming and communication proto-which includes a high level of unwanted harmonics. To col) it is usual to have a volt-free contact interface to the improve the output waveform it is necessary to install BMS. The majority of UPS cubicles incorporate a standard filter circuits comprising inductors and capacitors which mimic diagram and metering, giving input and output
effectively increase the impedance to the load and can data. In some cases, at the lower kV·A ratings, final circuit increase total harmonic voltage distortion (THVD) on the protection in the form of miniature circuit breakers are output.

also integrated to obviate the need for additional PDUs. All units incorporate main output circuit breaker protection In the normal operating mode (where the mains input to with facilities for isolation. The majority of units in this the UPS system is healthy) the DC link is held at a voltage range incorporate integral batteries within the module up sufficient to maintain the float charge to the batteries, to approximately 30 kV·A but, above this, additional which are generally permanently connected. When the
stands, cladded racks or cabinets are required for either mains voltage is outside the normal operating tolerances local or remote location.

or the supply is lost, the inverter power is drawn from the batteries until such time as their terminal voltage reaches In this range of equipment the use of thyristor technology a preset cut-off level. At this time it is usual for an alarm in the inverter section is almost non-existent although to be raised prior to disconnection of the load but supplies such systems are still in operation.

should have been restored, by supporting generators, allowing the system to revert to normal operations. Upon restoration of the input supply the rectifier will simul-9.2.3
Systems of 160 kV·A and above
taneously recharge the batteries and power the inverter.

From 160 kV·A upwards the technology used varies
The forced commutation of the thyristors involves power greatly. The selection and analysis of units becomes more capacitors, one of the least reliable of the electronic difficult and time consuming and will be governed by a components and which reduce the potential MTBF of the number of aspects discussed elsewhere in this Guide. All system. In addition the reflected harmonics onto the DC
units from this capacity upwards use forced ventilation bus (across the battery) are high and thought to be detri-methods within the cabinets but heat emission on this mental to the service life of valve regulated lead-acid level would be unacceptable in computer rooms or office batteries, if not fully damped by filters.

environments. The majority of the equipment is therefore more suitable for plant room environments. This becomes Thyristor inverter systems must be rated for the peak, not more pertinent when considering large capacity parallel RMS, current demand of the load and are available in single systems and is obviously imperative where diesel systems module form up to a maximum of 800 kV·A and, by
are proposed.

parallel operation, can offer output capacities of many MV·A.

The technologies used in this range generally include thyristor inverters, transistorised inverters and rotary 9.2.5
Static systems with transistor
equipment. The rotary category can be further divided into those using batteries as a method of stored energy and inverters
units using diesel engines to maintain the output during periods of mains failure. Diesel supported units fall into Transistorised systems comprise the same basic com-two types, the first relying upon kinetic energy to bridge ponents, the transistor technology being used to switch the gap between mains disturbance and a rapid diesel the DC to produce an AC waveform on the output of the engine start and the second using batteries for short term UPS.

Uninterruptible power supplies
9-5
Historically, there has been a limit on the switching Short-circuit
capabilities of transistors caused by the semiconductor 0·000
0·010 s
materials and for this reason the largest modules have generally remained below 400 kV·A capacity. This
Voltage L1-2
relatively high load handling capability has been achieved primarily by using parallel transistor paths and complex control techniques for larger size modules. This system Fuse 250 A
uses the high frequency switching ability within the Trip time = 8·85 ms
transistor to build up a chain of pulses, the width of which Voltage
can be modulated to produce maximum power to coincide L2-3
with maximum current demand of the load. These width-modulated pulses are fed into the primary side of a
14,380 A
transformer specially designed to produce a sinusoidal Current L1
waveform on the secondary side to which the load is
connected. The fast response of the system enables non-Current L3
linear loads to be fed more easily as the pulse width can be 12,470 A
adjusted to support peaks in a distorted current waveform Figure 9.7 Voltage and current waveforms for 625 kV·A series on-line without undue voltage collapse. The regulation of the UPS
inverter is by a high frequency reference waveform with output voltage monitoring fed back directly to the inverter can be operated in parallel to unlimited combined output to provide rapid response to the load characteristics.

capacities. The output waveform is sinusoidal and rotary systems can produce very high short-term fault currents An inverter of this type has a limited overload capacity for clearance of downstream protective devices. Series on-therefore the system must be arranged to transfer to mains line rotary systems do not use the bypass and mains
upon a downstream fault, as long as the mains is present supply to clear downstream faults. Sub-transient reac-and within tolerance. The rating of the inverter must take tances as low as 5–6% result in 15 times the nominal into account the peak current demand of the load, not the current being generated to clear such faults, without the RMS value, which is why most manufacturers limit the mains being available. All faults must be cleared within ratings to a maximum crest factor of 2.5–3. A typical 10 ms to ensure other consumers retain power supply.

transistor inverter, output transformer and filter arrange-Figure 9.7 shows the voltage and current waveforms of a ment is shown in Figure 9.6. To achieve a system design, 625 kV·A series on-line rotary module clearing a 250 A using such UPS types, which can cope with a higher crest fuse in less than 10 ms. Rotary systems of this low
factor it is necessary to derate the UPS module. Output impedance type can handle load crest factors up to 15
filters, with transistor switching operating in the 1 kHz to without de-rating, and need only be sized for the RMS
20 kHz band, tend to resonate at high frequencies and value of the load current.

offer limited assistance when dealing with harmonics.

A derivative in common use is a rotary converter which is The complexity of the transistor inverter, often using up a synchronous machine in which the motor and generator to 48 switching devices, offsets to some extent the
windings are combined in an armature and rotor. The
advantage of not having forced commutation capacitors as rotor is DC-excited and incorporates a special harmonic used in a thyristor inverter. General operation of the damper winding, similar to the squirrel cage on an
system and response to voltage and frequency deviations asynchronous motor. The AC flux rotates carrying the on the input are similar to that discussed for thyristor rotor with it and by separate DC excitation of the rotor the systems, but much faster in response to a load step.

output voltage of the generator windings is maintained at a constant level. Energy transmission to the rotor is brushless and any harmonics in the motor or generator
9.2.6
Battery supported rotary systems
windings are largely suppressed by the damper winding.

This particular converter is fed by a conventional arrange-Battery supported rotary UPS systems are available in ment of rectifier, DC limb and inverter system. The
various forms with individual module ratings of
inverter in this type of system is commutated by the
<150 kV·A up to approximately 1700 kV·A. These units terminal voltage of the synchronous machine. Therefore it has no forced commutation capacitors, consisting only of Rating to peak current
six power thyristors, which has proven to be highly
Limited overload
Limited short circuit amps
reliable. Figure 9.8 shows the normal configuration, with Limited crest factor
the load isolated from the inverter by the brushless machine and with the complete absence of capacitor
filters. The system is augmented with internal redundancy by the introduction of a thyristor switch leg which
operates around the rectifier/inverter limb.

Figure 9.9 shows a block diagram of this redundant
Tuned
system in which, whilst the mains is within tolerance, all the power for the load flows through the static switch path into the motor winding of the combined machine. This P < 400 kVA
provides good efficiency and the manufacturers claim an For P > 100 kVA internal parallelling for reliability MTBF for this system of over 630 000 hours without
Figure 9.6 Transistor inverter, output transformer and filter recourse to the automatic and no-break mains bypass (not arrangement
shown in the diagram). With the mains bypass and
9-6
Electricity in buildings
The alternator acts as a motor in the normal mode and is DC bus
Maximum power rating
solidly coupled to the outer windings of the induction 2000 kVA without paralleling
coupling rotating at 1500 rev/min. By excitation of this outer winding the inner part reaches a speed of
M/G
1500 rev/min in relation to the outer, or 3000 rev/min absolute. The inner winding is separated from the diesel Inverter
by the free-wheel clutch. On mains failure or unacceptable deviation, the mains input contactor is opened and the diesel commanded to start. At the same time the DC
winding of the induction coupling is excited and acts as an Rotating
energy source and the outer winding of the coupling
rectifier
drives the AC machine, which acts as a generator rather than a motor. The diesel is required to start and achieve rated speed in 2–3 seconds upon which the clutch is
Brushless
closed. Excitation of the induction coupling is varied to exciter
regulate the output voltage and frequency. On mains
resumption the system is regulated to parallel with the Figure 9.8 UPS with rotary converter
mains whereupon the clutch disconnects the diesel and the inner part of the induction coupling accelerates to its Static switch
3000 rev/min operation. The diesel is run for a short time Choke
(typically 5 minutes) off load, in order to cool and in case Mains 2
of further disturbances.

Natural
In areas of poor mains quality the diesel can be required to Rectifier
inverter
start several times per day. Black smoke emissions, from
~
=
the rapid start, have to be taken into account.

Mains 1
=
~
9.2.7.2
Battery-backed systems
Battery
The battery-backed system uses a different configuration of similar components. The rectifier/inverter limb is used Figure 9.9 Internally redundant series on-line rotary UPS
to provide the DC source, whereby a battery can be charged and connected to provide short-term power, typically average quality mains supply the MTBF rises to seven times five minutes, under mains failure conditions, thus driving that of a transistor static UPS.

the motor/generator from the output of the inverter. With this mode of operation using the batteries for short term A further system is available which introduces the
support the diesel can be commanded to start off-load and thyristor switch leg on the output side of the machine (in with a ramped (and hence low smoke) acceleration
parallel on-line mode), offering greater efficiency but this characteristic and controlled to synchronise with the is not generally recommended for computer, data process-motor/generator shaft thus allowing minimal stress
ing or communication loads that are susceptible to mains connection to the shaft via a clutch arrangement. With the disturbances, or where the load harmonics are to be
machine operating in a stable manner on the diesel engine prevented from reaching the incoming mains supply.

other loads can be added to the motor winding terminals Parallel on-line systems are susceptible to mains frequency (the machine now operating as an alternator) thereby deviations.

offering the dual facilities of essential power (with a short break) and uninterrupted (UPS) power from the same
9.2.7
Diesel supported rotary systems
system, but isolated from each other. Power is only drawn from the mains once the reliability of voltage and
Ratings for systems of this type generally range from frequency has been restored. The environmental advan-100 kV·A to approximately 2000 kV·A per module with
tages of the battery backed diesel system are clear since the the option of paralleled systems up to approximately diesel engine is only started after a confirmed mains 10 MV·A.There are two types of diesel rotary systems: outage, rather than short duration deviations. The capital costs and space requirements of the battery installation are
—
kinetic energy storage (2–4 seconds)
offset by the minimal engine service requirements, but the
—
battery energy storage (normally 5 minutes).

battery replacement costs equate to the refurbishment of the diesel engine in the other system.

9.2.7.1
Kinetic energy systems
Other kinetic energy systems are available using a single One of the most common kinetic energy systems currently motor/generator shaft speed but using the system inertia available comprises a diesel engine with free-wheel clutch, to ‘bump start’ the diesel engine through a clutch held-off an induction coupling and a synchronous generator
by the mains. In order that this starting procedure can be coupled to a split coil choke. In normal mode the electrical achieved whilst maintaining output supply tolerance a energy is supplied without conversion from the mains, the large amount of kinetic energy needs to be available. The emergency energy source being connected in parallel and transfer creates stress in the system and both safety and supplying reactive power to improve input power factor.

containment need to be considered.

Uninterruptible power supplies
9-7
It should be noted that systems operating in parallel to the distortion (THD) of 110% with crest factor >5. Failure to mains do not provide electrical (galvanic) isolation.

take these factors into account would result in an
Harmonics can therefore be passed in both directions.

unreliable UPS solution and very high rectification costs.

It is recognised that equipment has to be selected on cost, size and ease of installation but these should not be the 9.3
System selection
main criteria for UPS systems. Where non-linear loads are expected, the main criteria should be the way that the UPS
equipment will react and the quality of conditioned power 9.3.1
General
it will supply to different loads. Many manufacturers’
performance specifications will only relate to operation on UPS systems are, with only a few exceptions, applied to a linear load and a simple reference to crest factor will not critical loads operating on a 24-hour basis, 365 days per resolve difficulties.

year, and which depend on both the quality and continuity of the power supply. At the same time as the need for UPS
Other criteria that will have a bearing, particularly upon systems has expanded, the nature of the load equipment larger system selection, is the site location, its affect on has changed, with switched mode power supplies drawing adjacent occupiers, the frequency and length of local non-linear current. High concentrations of data process-supply interruptions or departures from acceptable voltage ing loads in small areas can reflect high levels of harmonic and frequency limits, and the availability of emergency or currents onto supply systems with consequential effects on secondary power supplies. The electrical distribution all elements feeding the load.

arrangements will also become an issue in selection with respect to the harmonic current produced by the input It is therefore important that, prior to the selection of UPS
arrangement of the UPS system, and the effects these equipment, the load is established in its fundamental form harmonics would have on other load groups within the and investigations carried out to establish the extent of distribution system. If the elimination of input harmonics non-linear content, the ‘step’ loads that are likely to be are a critical matter, and the load is sufficiently large, then encountered, and the degree of phase imbalance that can a series on-line rotary system should be considered.

be expected. Figure 9.10 shows an in-rush current for a Without filters, this type of equipment achieves a THD of modern high power processor. Due to the high invest-
<2%, regardless of load current THD. The specifier should ments made on larger systems, future expansion should be be aware of input current THD quoted in manufacturers’
considered in order that either extra capacity is bought specifications since they generally apply to linear loads —
initially or provision made for easy expansion. These a situation rarely found in practice.

investigations should include supply monitoring of
existing installations where UPS is being introduced or, on new projects, the monitoring of similar installations to 9.3.2
System configuration, reliability,
those proposed. In both cases load profiles should be availability and MTBF
established.

Figure 9.11 shows a measured load current waveform in a 9.3.2.1
Configuration
large data centre of a major bank. The harmonic content, by order and total, is shown. The peak current is 1350 A.

There are three basic UPS module configurations to:
Increasingly, large UPS systems are being installed not to
—
provide for the initial load
support central computers but large numbers of personal computers, terminals and file servers.

—
dictate capacity expansion steps
—
provide an MTBF to suit the user requirements.

For example, an installation comprising 400 PC terminals and support equipment requires a UPS rating in excess of These configurations are, in ascending order of reliability: 400 kV·A and, importantly, at a current total harmonic ( a)
parallel power modules
( b)
single module
800
( c)
parallel redundant modules.

700
600
500
1
100%
3
36·4%
400
5
32·8%
7
13·2%
Current / A
300
9
2·6%
11
4·3%
200
13
4·1%
15
1·1%
17
2·3%
100
19
1·3%
Harmonic distortion: 45·6%
21
0·9%
00 0·1 0·2 0·3 0·4 0·5 0·6 0·7 0·8 0·9 1·0 1·1
Crest factor: 2·21
23
1·1%
Time / s
Figure 9.11 Measured load current waveform in a large data centre of a Figure 9.10 In-rush current for a high power processor bank
9-8
Electricity in buildings
expansion steps must be in 100% steps of the
Module
Module
P1/1
P2/1
initial system load.

1
2
Mains
Load
—
( n +1) is less reliable than (1+1). Apart from MTBF = 42,000 hours
having more modules (and therefore more risk of
(a)
one failing) when the redundant module is
switched off by failure or for maintenance then the
Module
Module
Module
P1/1
P2/1
P3/1
remaining sets run in parallel power. The first
1
2
3
Mains
Load
fault or overload will trip the system to bypass
MTBF = 28,000 hours
onto the raw mains (if present and in tolerance at
(b)
that moment). Obviously one advantage is that
Figure 9.12 Reliability block diagrams for (a) two-module parallel and each of the modules runs at a higher percentage
(b) three-module parallel configurations; assumes MTBF of paralleling load and therefore, probably, at a higher efficiency.

control = 500 000 h and MTBF for each module = 100 000 h System capacity expansion steps are 50% (2+1) or
33% (3+1) etc.

9.3.2.2
Reliability
Parallel power
All UPS manufacturers express the reliability of their The load capacity is met by adding together modules of modules in terms of MTFB and it can be shown that these smaller capacity, e.g. a 500 kV·A load is supplied by 2 ×
figures are based upon a mixture of gathered data,
250 kV·A modules. Obviously the reliability is the low practical experience and reference to component relia-since a fault in either module will cause the system to trip bility standard data. In addition, it is a fact that a module to bypass (the remaining module(s) being overloaded) and MTFB is strongly influenced by the quality of the mains the critical load being exposed to raw mains, if the mains supply, the battery, the availability of service and whether supply is present or within tolerance when the fault or not the manufacturer has included the auto-bypass and occurs. If the mains is not within the specified limits, the availability of the mains in the calculation. The system load will be lost.

designer must therefore question the basis of MTFB and make comparisons between differing data. Certainly the The future expansion steps are 50% of the initial load but two most important features are the quality of the
multi-module (>2) configurations become increasingly design/manufacture of the UPS
modules and the
less reliable and are rare in practice. Figure 9.12 shows the availability of spare parts, 24-hour service support, reliability block diagrams for two- and three-module without extended travelling times.

parallel power configurations, which clearly shows the reduction in theoretical reliability.

Having established the initial load (kV·A, power factor, THD of load current and crest factor) the specifier has to Single module
determine with the client/end-user the anticipated growth (steps and time scale). Armed with these facts, the
Single module systems offer an
question of system integrity must be reviewed. A system MTBF of the selected UPS
module technology, but will vary greatly between systems.

design which regularly exposes the load to raw mains Indeed, single module, internally redundant, rotary
supply cannot be considered an adequate solution for an systems have MTBF figures stated as higher than redundant application requiring continuity of conditioned power.

static UPS systems when compared on the same basis.

The nature of the user’s business will largely dictate what System capacity expansion is in steps of 100% of the initial level of security of supply will be required. For example, a load.

small computer centre carrying out batch processing tasks will have to expend only a few person-hours to recover from a system crash. However, the data centre for a large Parallel redundant
bank will have extensive on-line and remote terminals, including automated cash machines, and be processing Parallel redundant system configuration can be (1+1) or ( n +1), so that for a 400 kV·A initial system load the data on-line, 24 hours per day. It could take 6–10 hours possible solutions would be 2 × 400 kV·A or 3 × 200 kV·A simply to restart the system after a power supply outage, or 4 × 130 kV·A etc., having one full module running in with full recovery taking considerably longer, resulting in excess of the system load. In the event of one module a major financial and administrative disaster to the failing or being switched out of the system for main-organisation.

tenance, the remaining module(s) can deliver the system load. Each of the two options, (1+1) or ( n +1), has 9.3.2.3
Availability
advantages and disadvantages:
—
(1+1) is theoretically the most reliable config-
The term ‘availability’ has been used as a specification uration since if one of the modules is switched off
criterion for the power supply to the critical load. This is the other module handles the load without being
not a valid criterion since the user will be interested in in parallel power connection. It is the most
long term reliability, not a statistical value, as follows: compact multi-module arrangement. Each of the
modules run at only 50% capacity so the 50% load
Availability = MTBF / (MTBF + MDT)
(9.1)
efficiency figure is important. Also the module’s
ability to handle a load step of 50% (i.e. between
where MTBF is the mean time between failures and MDT is 50% and full load) has to be proven. System
the mean downtime, including travel time.

Uninterruptible power supplies
9-9
However, note that:
100
3·0
—
for
24
MTBF
= 10 years and MDT = 1 hour:
2·5
availability = 0.9999885
10
2·0
—
for
2·22
MTBF = 1 month and MDT = 30 seconds:
1·6
1·0
availability = 0.9999885
1
1·5
0·61
0·23
—
for MTBF = 1 day and MDT = 1 second; availability
1·0
Relative MTBF
Relative cost
0·11
= 0.9999884.

0·1
1·0
0·7
0·8
0·5
0·8
0·6
This shows that the availability is similar for the three 0·01
0
situations, even though a 1 second loss of supply per day 2 x S110
S220
R220
2 x S220 R220R 2 x R220R
would be totally unacceptable in the case of a computer System configuration
installation for which the start-up time was six hours.

Figure 9.13 Mean time between failures (MTBF) for the most common configurations
In this case:
—
for MTBF = 10 years and MDT = (6 + 1) hours:
The question of MTBF for a multi-module system (whether availability = 0.99992
parallel power or redundant) is further complicated if the
—
for MTBF = 1 month and MDT = 6 hours + 30 secs:
design/manufacturer chosen has equipment which has a availability = 0.9917
single paralleling point and paralleling control system.

—
for MTBF = 1 day and MDT = 6 hours + 1 second;
To enable a fair comparison between system MTBFs, it is availability = 0.8.

necessary to include the auto-bypass in the calculations since static systems rely on the bypass to clear faults.

9.3.2.4
Mean time between failures (MTBF)
Figure 9.13 shows the relative MTBF of the major options, taking the ‘unity’ MTBF as a parallel redundant (1+1) It is incorrect to confuse MTBF with a predicted time to transistorised static series on-line system.

failure for a single module or, indeed, a system. The theory behind MTBF calculations shows that at the end of The configurations shown are;
the calculated MTBF period only 0.37 of the measured
—
2 × S110: parallel power pair of 110 kV·A static
sample group is still in existence.

modules
What MTBF can be used for is comparing systems. (Often
—
S220: static module rated at 220 kV·A
MTBF is the only data available other than intuitive
—
R220: rotary module without internal redundancy
decision making.) With the same basis for the MTBF
calculation and similar numerical techniques then MTBF
—
2 × S220: redundant pair of 220 kV·A static
figures can be relied upon to give a fair comparison of modules
system integrity, but not a prediction of uninterrupted
—
R220R: rotary module with internal redundancy
service time.

—
2 × R220R: redundant pair of 220 kV·A rotary
The MTBF figure is the mean time between events which modules.

result in the load being exposed to raw mains and does not include maintenance shutdowns or operator error.

Obviously the specifier has to address the equation of capital cost, energy consumption, plant space and required Different manufacturers will claim varying MTBF figures resilience over the life of the installation. It must be for their products, with most of the differences arising repeated that MTBF is not a prediction of equipment life from assumptions made about mains quality, whether or but can be used to make valid comparisons of resilience not the bypass circuit and raw mains supply to the load is and reliability of the critical power supply.

included, and the travel time assumed in the mean time to respond (MTTR).

9.3.3
Dedicated range up to 5 kV·A
Typical MTBF values for on-line modules, not including the bypass circuit, are given in Table 9.2.

The selection of this range of UPS equipment should be simplified by the limited equipment that is usually
connected and, for capacities up to 5 kV·A, the equipment Table 9.2 Typical mean times between failure (MTBF) for on-line will generally be a standard purchase item selected on a modules
‘preferred manufacturer’ basis. Load analysis will be easier Module type
Mean time between
but consideration should be given to rapidly changing failures (MTBF) / h
equipment demands. Processors in modern personal
Thyristor inverter, static (reference only)
35 000 to 45 000
computers have a current total harmonic distortion (THD) of ~70% and crest factors in the order of 8, but the current Transistor inverter:
is so small in relation to the smaller UPSs that de-rating
— static
75 000 to 100 000
occurs by accident rather than by design.

— rotary
100 000 to 170 000
Rotary with internal redundancy
610 000 to 700 000
Initial investigations should revolve around the suscep-Diesel rotary:
tibility of the load equipment to voltage and frequency
— kinetic energy
210 000 to 350 000
disturbances, noise spikes and ‘micro’ interruptions. If
— battery backed
800 000 to 1 000 000
none of these are of major concern then an off-line UPS
9-10
Electricity in buildings
will provide continuous power for the specified period 9.3.4
Free standing units up to 160 kV·A
during major supply interruptions. Should any of these criteria cause problems to the load then on-line or the These units are generally located within a data processing ferro-resonant solution should be investigated.

or communications area and provide support to either a single power distribution unit (PDU) or a number of them.

Having established what equipment will be served by the As such, load analysis is more difficult to achieve and may UPS, it is important that the ratio of peak-to-RMS current involve discussion with a number of hardware suppliers.

(i.e. crest factor) of the load is supplied to the manufac-As a minimum, consideration should be given to the
turer. As stated above, at this size the equipment would provision of 25% spare capacity for future use over and normally be a standard purchase item but if engineering above initial load performance levels assessed. This should analysis is critical various factors need to be considered, not include any de-rating of capacity for non-linear loads.

including the following:
—
maximum output power with linear load at a
For new installations the fundamental load requirements power factor of 0.8
and prospective crest factor should be analysed. It is recommended that, if the load is available prior to
—
maximum output power, non-linear load at a given
procurement of the UPS, the feed be monitored such that a crest factor
load harmonic spectrum can be reproduced with enquiry
—
equipment losses including battery charging
documentation. This will ensure that correct de-rating factors can be applied by the manufacturers.

—
maximum input current (per phase if necessary)
—
part load efficiencies at 25%, 50% and 75% load
Output filters, although necessary in a basic form on static systems to improve the output voltage waveform, should
—
type of rectifier used, e.g. 6-pulse, 12-pulse etc.

not be specified to handle particular harmonic frequen-
—
dB(A) at 1 metre with 100% non-linear load
cies. If tuned filters are specified, based upon an existing measured load, and the load changes in its characteristics
—
compliance with the EC Directive on electro-
(e.g. an updated main processor is installed) then the UPS
magnetic compatibility(1)
may not be able to maintain the specified output. Active
—
MTBF of equipment or system configuration
filters can assist this but they are generally biased to a particular frequency.

—
input current control on power restoration
—
input voltage limits
Comparison of the relative performance of each manufacturer’s equipment should be based on the list of perform-
—
input frequency limits
ance criteria produced for the dedicated range up to
—
output voltage regulation at steady state, 50% load
5 kV·A. In addition to these items responses should also step and 100% load step
be gained on the following:
—
transient recovery time
—
peak current/phase and the time before reversion
to bypass
—
THVD of output with non-linear load for all
harmonic orders and max single order
—
ability of the equipment to be paralleled for future expansion
—
harmonics reflected by the UPS into the mains
—
compliance with Electricity Association Engineer-
—
output frequency stability
ing Recommendation G5/4(2) and the methods by
—
frequency synchronism range
which it is achieved.

—
acceptable temperature and humidity conditions.

Compliance with G5/4 becomes more difficult with large equipment. To obtain absolute assurance from manufac-Having analysed the responses to the questions listed turers, supply system impedance values may need to be above, other considerations will revolve around size, provided which will prove difficult, particularly on new weight, aesthetic appearance, acoustic control (if installed projects. Absolute levels of harmonic current are given for in an office environment) and cost acceptability.

various stages of compliance using normal supply voltage references for points of common coupling (PCC). It is not Ease of installation and the output load connection
uncommon (to prevent or limit the re-injection of
facilities will be a consideration and it is important that harmonic currents into the mains or generator or other having made the investment in UPS that if a component upstream distribution) that phase shifted 12-pulse
failure were to occur in the normal power limb that a rectifiers are necessary, rather than simple input filtering bypass arrangement is available to connect the load to raw techniques. The merits of each are arguable and need to be mains without a break.

individually assessed. Input filters have three disadvantages which need to be taken into account:
The battery should be sized to suit the supply
infrastructure serving the input connection to the UPS to
—
decreased reliability of system (MTBF)
allow ordered shutdown of the load if necessary. Typically
—
increased running costs (lower efficiency)
10 minute batteries are provided but 30 minute battery packs are available and may be advisable if the UPS does
—
noise and heat output.

not have the additional support of emergency generation or if large deviations in supply voltage and frequency In addition, it is unusual that filters are fitted to the commonly occur.

bypass. Load harmonics (often higher that the rectifier’s harmonic distortion of the input current) are transferred to the mains supply side when on bypass. THD for the
Uninterruptible power supplies
9-11
common forms of rectifier input current, at full load, are Historically, space requirements for rotary systems (either approximately as follows:
battery supported or diesel supported) were greater than those required for static systems, but technology has now
—
6-pulse: THCD ≈ 33%
advanced to reverse this situation. However, it should be
—
12-pulse: THCD ≈ 11%
acknowledged that diesel supported systems require
additional service route requirements in the form of large
—
24-pulse: THCD ≈ 6%
input ducts to provide cooling and aspiration air for the engines. Exhaust routes are also required for the removal Cabling techniques for systems up to 160 kV·A will
the combustion gases from the engine(s). This is relatively inevitably use large conductors and the various manufac-easy to achieve (with the necessary noise attenuation) at turers’ equipment should be investigated to ensure that ground floor level and above but, if the units are installed maintenance can be achieved by full use of integral bypass below ground floor level, it can result in considerable loss arrangements. If this is found not to be so, then consider-of space on other floors.

ation should be given to the installation of an interlocked fixed bypass switchboard.

Oil storage space for diesel rotary UPS can be compared with the battery space for static and battery supported Peak output current data are necessary to establish the rotary systems and it should be realised that, provided maximum downstream protective device in the system
sufficient oil storage can be achieved for the UPS, that the and ensure fault clearance without reverting to the bypass normal standby generator will not need to support the UPS
limb. This may not be a problem whilst a mains supply is load which will achieve a capacity saving.

available to the bypass but if the mains had failed the results could be disastrous at the higher end of this range, All systems, static or rotary, have predetermined levels of and if cost is not a prime consideration. Rotary systems input voltage and frequency variation that they can accept can reduce this potential problem by providing higher whilst supplying the load. Where these limits are exceeded systems generally revert to their emergency mode of
short circuit currents, without recourse to the mains.

operation utilising the batteries or the diesel source to feed the load. The site location, proximity of adjacent occupiers When considering computer suite or office environments and the frequency of supply deviations could therefore acoustic emission is a primary consideration and special play a vital role in the selection of equipment.

treatment may be necessary to achieve acceptable levels.

Establishing the supply limits that would initiate the However after considering this and the other performance emergency operation, is vital, particularly for all triport data indicated, selection will inevitably revolve around and parallel on-line ‘high efficiency’ systems which do not size, weight, ease of installation and, if appropriate, the have a wide input frequency tolerance.

appearance and noise level.

Having decided which are the acceptable systems and
Manufacturers should be consulted on any methods of
modular configurations the manufacturers should respond automatic fire extinguishing proposed to ensure that no to similar questionnaire items listed for smaller systems.

damage can occur to vital components.

These questions should be based around an initial enquiry load together with a prediction of crest factor, power factor The UPS may be located deep into office space and, to and a typical harmonic spectrum. Static systems generally ensure satisfactory support for the critical load, it may be incorporate filters to ‘trap’ predominant harmonics on the necessary to consider additional remote monitoring/alarm.

output. However it is commonplace to apply additional This will incur extra costs for most systems but will pro-output filters to achieve THVD levels of less than 5% with a vide for a faster response by the operators. Alternatively, specified load. This can make it slower to react to load building management systems now have sufficient
changes, and will usually be tuned to particular operating
‘intelligence’ to provide monitoring of output signals spectra which could change, either on a daily basis or over generated by the
longer periods. The reliability, efficiency and audible UPS on a simple points basis.

noise output are all adversely affected.

To minimise battery size and capacity and to ensure that shutdown in an orderly fashion is possible, consideration Parallel modules need to have a common single output should be given to remote generator status indication. All busbar and it is therefore necessary to give consideration to an output panel comprising paralleling and bypass parties should be advised of mains failure, generators ‘on-facilities. This will generally incorporate a bypass breaker load’ or ‘failed to start’. This should prevent any panic capable of handling the full load system current. It is action that could occur in the event of a low battery therefore essential that, having selected the system and voltage warning whilst still expecting emergency gener-configuration, future expansion is considered at initial ator support.

purchase stage such that sufficient circuit breakers and current carrying capacity are included on the output busbar and system bypass limb. This will ensure
9.3.5
Systems above 160 kV·A
continuous operation or only minimal shutdown time if additional units are introduced when the system is on-As indicated in section 9.2.3, the technologies available on line. However in larger systems it is unlikely that the large systems are varied. Similarly the system configura-distribution system and transformers have sufficient tions can be arranged to give almost ultimate security for capacity to simultaneously support both critical loads and the critical load. However these systems will often
load bank loads during test procedures.

represent a large percentage of a building load and the possibility of reflected harmonics on the building distri-Most, but not all, static multi-module parallel or parallel bution system will have a much greater bearing.

redundant systems use logic control to supervise the
9-12
Electricity in buildings
operation of the paralleling and common static bypass.

9.5
Normal supply
These controls are programmed such that if the redundant module is removed (for maintenance etc.) then upon a considerations
subsequent module failure the system will revert to bypass irrespective of whether the load is within acceptable limits The effects of phase controlled rectifiers within the input for the remaining modules. This is not generally the case of most UPS systems can greatly affect the electrical distri-for any system with distributed paralleling control and bution to buildings.

rotary modules in particular.

Small dedicated UPS systems will not generally have
With higher power systems feeding more distributed loads sufficient demand to create many problems although they throughout a building complex it is essential that users are will still reflect harmonics onto their feeder circuits. In aware of system status. This should include:
areas where there is a concentration of data processing equipment that is deemed not to need UPS support, these
—
input supply status (all modules)
harmonics may well cause corruption detrimental to the
—
modules available
systems. Location of small units may need special
attention to ensure that problems are not caused through
—
bypass status
electromagnetic interference, although modules should be
—
emergency power operation (i.e. battery
manufactured in accordance with the EC Directive on
discharging)
electromagnetic compatibility(1).

—
generators failed to start.

Larger systems will need to be considered more carefully, the first step being to relate capacities to Electricity To monitor load growth and characteristics, the output Association Engineering Recommendation G5/4(2) for the switchboard could incorporate facilities for the connection point of common coupling with the supply company
of voltage probes and clamp-type current transformers.

mains which is applicable to the building.

This should be possible without interrupting the supply and may be achieved simply by a protected socket outlet The majority of UPS systems, with the exception of the (voltage) and a section of isolated insulated busbars diesel rotary kinetic energy system, use either 6-pulse or behind a lockable cover.

12-pulse rectifiers. These themselves reflect harmonics back into the feeder system with 5th and 7th harmonics Final selection should be based upon the technical
being predominant with 6-pulse equipment and 11th and responses provided by the manufacturers, space and
13th being predominant with 12-pulse. To reduce these ventilation aspects and the effects of the UPS on the power levels on 6-pulse rectifiers to a standard in compliance distribution of the building with consideration to
with Engineering Recommendation G5/4 it is usual to
standby/emergency power plants.

employ capacitive filters which will also have the effect of improving power factor. However, at low load, these can produce an unwanted leading power factor and it is
9.4
Bypass arrangements
common to hold the filters out of circuit until particular load levels are achieved. The additional heat losses should For maximum flexibility in multi-module systems each be added to the module losses.

UPS module should be served from individual protective devices on the input switchgear and similarly the
When viewing the harmonic currents developed by
automatic bypass unit should be provided with an
comparable size UPS systems with both 6-pulse and 12-independent protected feed. The automatic bypass limb pulse rectifiers it can be seen that filters are more will be required to feed the critical load under failure of necessary with 6-pulse operation rather than 12-pulse.

the UPS modules and will be the source of energy, albeit These filters can also become a ‘sink’ for other harmonic unconditioned, under major maintenance or reorgan-disturbances on the upstream distribution system and isation. It is essential therefore that consideration be given maintenance will have to be increased to monitor the to the ultimate load of the system in order that the bypass condition of the filters and the upstream supply.

circuit breaker is sufficiently rated and does not require future replacement with possible major disruption.

When UPS systems are to be installed on common low
voltage distribution systems in smaller developments the The modules and auto bypass operate with a high degree electrical distribution should be investigated at length to of control interlinks. To allow facilities for full system determine other sources of disturbances or equipment testing without detriment to the critical load, considera-groups that will be affected by the harmonics of the UPS
tion should be given at an early stage to a full maintenance itself.

bypass. This should take the form of an identical circuit breaker to that provided for the auto bypass separately fed On larger systems, where the UPS can be separated from from the input switchgear and linked directly to the other building load groups and possibly fed from a
output switchgear. To prevent inadvertent operation the dedicated transformer, expected harmonic current levels maintenance bypass should be interlocked with the auto-should be given to the transformer manufacturer so that bypass to prevent closure of the former until the latter is the necessary de-rating factors or transformer core
closed.

modifications can be made.

Uninterruptible power supplies
9-13
9.6
System considerations
established at the outset what ultimate capacity will be required; if not, the designer should advise the client of The supply to any centralised
any limiting factors that would hinder future develop-UPS system should be
derived from a primary distribution centre within the ments.

building and connected using a dedicated cabling system.

Systems having an overall nominal capacity of up to
The
approximately 400 kV·A are most likely to be fed from a UPS system will have a finite period of autonomy
under its stored energy operation. For long term resilience switchboard having other mixed loads which, if linear in the system should be backed-up by an emergency power electrical characteristic, will serve to dilute the effects of source such as an automatic mains-failure diesel generator harmonic currents. If the other feeds are serving high system. Again the feed(s) to the
technology loads or any loads with distorted character-UPS system from any
emergency power source should clearly be defined and istics then consideration should be given to the de-rating dedicated.

of all upstream components. This de-rating exercise would also be necessary if the UPS load formed a major percent-With the exception of continuous process equipment,
age of any feeder distribution system.

UPS
systems will generally be required to support computers and other data and communications systems that will not Systems of 500 kV·A and above are likely to be served only generate harmonics themselves but will also be
from a dedicated transformer substation and switchboard susceptible to supply system harmonics. It is therefore and it is essential that the transformer manufacturer is important that the supply system be designed to limit the aware of the input characteristics of the UPS equipment for effect of harmonic distortion upon its components such as de-rating purposes.

switchgear, transformers and generators. It is also
important to prevent the spread of harmonics from the Similarly, emergency generators, whether dedicated to the UPS.

UPS or serving mixed loads, will need to be given special consideration. Additional capacity may be necessary or In the UK, the majority of building distribution systems low reactance alternators employed to minimise the effects operate at 415/240 V and buildings have until recently of harmonic distortion on the generator output stability.

been sufficiently small or of sufficiently low demand that the whole of the electrical demand can be sourced on site The emergency generator should be analysed to determine from a small number of HV/LV transformers. As such,
its load handling capability for step loads as it is likely critical load sections may often be sourced from a common that the UPS will form a large percentage of the generator LV busbar system, which could feed HVAC systems, lifts or capacity. Load acceptance levels of 50–60% of alternator general lighting and power systems. Isolation of harmonic capacity should be a target and if possible the specification distortion from these systems and the UPS must be a
for the UPS should incorporate a requirement to ‘walk-in’
primary consideration.

on power resumption, either by module control or by load ramping on the module inputs.

Where a number of small UPS systems are proposed to
protect a network of personal computers then it may be The whole of the distribution system, both to and from necessary to consider a PDU for the area, if necessary, the UPS, should be provided with a neutral conductor at incorporating an isolating transformer to limit the spread least equal to each phase conductor. In some cases it has of distortion through the supply system. Single units up to been found necessary to oversize the neutral conductor about 3 kV·A will probably not create any more distortion due to the affects of 3rd order harmonics, typical when than the load they serve and, as such, can probably be single phase loads are connected to the three-phase UPS
supplied from the general distribution system local to the output network.

area.

Switchgear should, if possible, be arranged to serve the Systems from 3 kV·A single phase up to 20 kV·A three-immediate needs of the system and to allow for any
phase will generally be sourced from sub-main
anticipated expansion or additional modules. The
distribution systems. In these cases it is important to majority of systems derive their battery charging feeds ensure that manufacturers incorporate filter traps on the from the DC limb but some have battery chargers fed
input side to prevent the spread of dominant harmonic separately from the mains. System bypass switches,
frequencies into the general distribution networks.

whether automatic or manual, should incorporate capacity Equipment of this size will generally be in single module for anticipated expansion and in multi-module systems form and may not have inherent bypass arrangements, but this feed could be substantial.

it is recommended that some form of bypass switch be provided to feed the load when maintenance is carried out.

This could create the need for overrated busbars,
This should take the form of an interlocked or lockable incoming switches and feeder systems when considering switch that can only be closed once a responsible person system discrimination. Figure 9.14 shows a typical switch-has ascertained that the input and output of the UPS are in gear configuration for a large, high integrity, system with synchronism. It should be remembered that a UPS is
expansion capability.

installed because the load is critical; if the supply fails it is better for the load to see a raw mains connection than not Lastly the regional electricity companies (RECs) are have a supply at all.

becoming increasingly aware of the effects of UPS and other inverter type loads and are more stringently apply-Larger systems of either single or multi-module configu-ing Electricity Association Engineering Recommendation rations will generally be served from the main incoming G5/4(2). This document is primarily intended to protect switchboard supply or, if the system is sufficiently large, consumers from electrical noise and disturbance caused by from a dedicated substation. If possible, it should be other consumers. The limits are based on the point of
9-14
Electricity in buildings
Maintenance bypass
temperatures in the range of 0–40 °C. Because of contin-1000 kVA
uous operation of the equipment with inherent constant losses, control of the upper temperature limit is the 1500 kVA
Auto bypass 1000 kVA
fundamental concern. Lower limit control usually
becomes a concern only during construction phases or in G
the case of major maintenance when temporary measures Initial load
can be taken. Design ambient temperature, under full load G
500 kVA
operation, should therefore be in the range of 15–25 °C.

500 kVA
1500 kVA
Specific requirements for room space temperature,
Future load
humidity and dust control should be discussed directly 1000 kVA
1250 kVA
with all manufacturers considered.

T1
Small dedicated micro-UPS units and, indeed, larger units of up to 100 kV·A associated with small computer or other 500 kVA
T2
critical loads will often have their environmental
1250 kVA
conditions controlled by the fact that they can be installed in the same room as the load that they are protecting.

Future expansion
Critical considerations in respect of environmental control module
is the means by which temperature control is effected under emergency power conditions. Consideration may
Figure 9.14 Redundant high integrity system UPS system need to be given to split central plants providing reduced duty if emergency generator capacity is limited.

common coupling (PCC) to the network and give various stage limits according to capacities. Compliance should be A further consideration is what would happen to the room requested as a UPS specification clause and acceptable temperature if the generator system does not start. The limits agreed with the appropriate electricity supply stored energy system will still feed the UPS equipment and company.

its load for the period of autonomy. The system losses will be discharged into the area thus raising the temperature if cooling is not available.

9.7
Site generated supplies
In larger single and multi-module systems of any type, the The relationship of emergency generators and UPS should primary calculation will be one of heat rejection. UPS
be considered in detail. The effects of harmonic currents systems provide continuous conditioned power to a
in the alternator windings, particularly when the UPS
critical load and are very rarely taken out of service. The capacity is close to that of the alternator, can be
problems are therefore security and resilience. If possible, problematic. To overcome this it is common to de-rate the system should incorporate standby air conditioning standby generators supporting UPS. A rule of thumb is a plant and this should preferably be able to be maintained factor of 1.5, e.g. a 500 kV·A UPS fed by a dedicated from outside the UPS room, thus alleviating the need for 750 kV·A alternator. Low impedance or de-rated standard general maintenance staff to enter a secure area. For alternators and the method of excitation need to be
resilience, it should be possible to carry out full main-considered. Particular attention should be paid to the tenance on air conditioning equipment, to change filters possible effects of harmonics on the automatic voltage or maintain ventilation equipment without detriment to regulator.

the full load operation in the UPS room.

UPS equipment of all triport (and most parallel on-line Except for small systems, it is unlikely that these
types) are susceptible to voltage and frequency dis-
conditions can be maintained throughout the year purely turbances on the input. If this is excessive the systems by means of natural ventilation. It is generally recognised generally revert to battery mode or initiate starting that, by the time thermal cut-outs in the UPS systems procedures for generators. A diesel driven UPS will not operate at their higher limit (i.e. ambient 40 °C but power normally be supported by standby generators but battery components >100 °C), some damage may have already supported triport or parallel on-line systems will and, if occurred to certain components which could reduce their frequent deviations in the feed are experienced, the system life. It is also preferable to reduce the dirt intake into UPS
will constantly fall back to battery operation thereby rooms by the use of suitable filters with forced ventilation.

reducing eventual battery autonomy in the event of a To assist with dirt and dust control the room should prolonged supply failure.

operate at positive pressure and it is often easier to provide re-circulatory air conditioning to rooms for larger systems The ‘power walk in’ function is therefore of paramount using minimum fresh air make-up and exhaust.

importance to ensure that a large step load is not
presented to the generators when they resume the input Fire control needs to be discussed both with the
feed to UPS equipment thus causing excessive supply
authorities and, because of the high investment and
deviation.

operational risk, with the client’s insurers. It is often necessary to consider gaseous fire suppression systems with their attendant ‘double knock’ detection systems. UPS
systems manufacturers should be advised of extinguishing 9.8
Environmental conditions
proposals to ensure no damage to components or breaches of warranty. Further considerations are necessary on Primary considerations relating to the environmental environmental controls such as automatic shutdown of control revolve around the maintenance of room space plant, fire damper release and removal of gas.

Uninterruptible power supplies
9-15
All large systems create noise through air movement but BS 6290(3) relates to batteries suitable for UPS duty and highly distorted harmonic loads on static systems can covers such points as the fundamental difference between create additional noise which will make adjacent areas
‘design life’ and ‘service life’. The UPS supplier should be uninhabitable unless acoustic treatment is applied.

asked to confirm the design life and the anticipated Manufacturers should be asked to provide operating noise service life of the cells. Batteries are usually considered to spectra but this should be related to distorted loads. Diesel be at the end of their service life when 80% capacity supported systems have unique problems of exhaust,
remains. Batteries can be selected for 100% capacity at end jacket emission and cooling air noise, all of which are well of life by over-sizing the initial capacity by 25%, called an known to the industry and will require special treatment,
‘ageing factor’. This ageing factor does extend the actual both to the air routes and the space. Smaller ‘in-room’
life of the cells. In general two main factors affect battery systems are generally treated at source and installed in life in UPS systems:
attenuated enclosures.

—
AC ripple
The majority of UPS systems, of whatever size, incorporate
—
ambient temperature.

forced cooling through the modules by means of a fan or fans. The cool air is sourced generally from the room An extreme example, although historic, would be a
environment by means of louvred entries in the
thyristor inverter static UPS module (high reflected enclosures. When designing it is important to ensure that harmonics onto the DC bus) with insufficient DC smooth-these entries are not impeded and in larger multi-module ing, and batteries enclosed in cubicles with little cooling systems where module heights can be as much as 2100 mm (i.e. ambient temperatures of 30–35 °C), the resultant it is important that distribution of cool air is sufficient to service life could be as low as 2 years for a ‘10-year’ battery.

ensure that modules are not starved or installed in ‘hot spots’. Intake louvres are usually at low level with Vented batteries (i.e. flooded cells of pasted plate, pasted discharge at high level. If possible, consideration should rod or Planté designs, see below) are not so susceptible to be given to a suspended floor as a supply plenum, with temperature variation, because water loss can be corrected.

interchangeable perforated tiles allowing adjustments to The ideal operating temperature for lead-acid batteries is air patterns if necessary.

20 °C and it is therefore likely that some environmental treatment to battery rooms will be required. Vented
Integral fans are provided within modules because air batteries require an extract to fresh air and recirculation is passage through the units is essential for cooling purposes.

not acceptable. The battery life is halved for every ten Standby capacity has previously been suggested for room degrees above 20 °C. So that a 5-year design life cell ventilation but UPS manufacturers should be questioned operated at 35 °C (not uncommon in confined and poorly about the redundancy of their internal fan systems and the ventilated plant rooms) will last approximately 22 months effect of single or multi-fan loss.

in service, assuming no AC ripple across the battery.

Most manufacturers of valve regulated lead-acid (VRLA) 9.9
Battery/stored energy
cells now concur on the expected service life compared to the design life in UPS installations, with correct tempera-selection
ture and ripple control. Each manufacturer should be asked to provide details, but expect to be told that a 10-The majority of
year design life product will provide a service life of about UPS systems use lead-acid cells but
nickel–cadmium cells are used in special cases. Types of 8 years to 80% capacity. Preventive maintenance is essen-batteries are considered in detail below, see sections 9.9.1
tial, as is ensuring that the UPS supplier is fully involved in and 9.9.2.

the specification, supply and installation of the battery system.

Static systems and the most modern rotary systems
For UPS systems operating in computer suites or office generally connect the batteries directly across the DC limb environments valve regulated units are essential. Various of the system, the charging current being derived from the types are available including gas recombination and gel system input rectifier. In this way the batteries are electrolyte offering various life expectancies. Typical cells permanently available should the input supply fail.

have a design life of 5 years or 10 years and, subject to cost limitations, the latter are preferable.

Rotary module designs of the previous generation
incorporate a battery contactor and separate charger but Vented cells have a life expectancy of 12–20 years, the needed a flywheel to provide enough time for the off-line upper figure applying to Planté cells. Unfortunately, battery to be switched into circuit. Modern designs have because of their physical size and maintenance clearances, improved reliability by removing the battery contactor, Planté cells can occupy a floor area of up to 4 times that of and have reduced weight, cost and space requirements by valve regulated cells when considering racks of similar not requiring a separate charger and flywheel.

height. Similarly their weight and cost can be twice that of valve regulated cells. Pasted rod (or plate) vented cells are Considering lead-acid cells as the most commonly used available and offer a good compromise between size,
battery type there is one fundamental choice to be made: weight, cost and service life. The choice is therefore vented (wet) or valve regulated (sealed) pattern. Vented between the low cost of VRLA cells and the longer service cells have a longer life, they are generally more expensive life, higher reliability, weight, and greater space/ventila-and require more space, which must be ventilated to
tion requirements of wet cells.

prevent the build up of potentially explosive gases. Sealed cells are smaller, less expensive and require no special Selection of the autonomy period will be based upon the ventilation but have a substantially shorter life.

emergency supply arrangements for the building but will
9-16
Electricity in buildings
typically be in the 10–20 minutes time span. Batteries Plante plate
Tubular plate
Flat plate
should be rated to the full load of each module at the prospective load power factor. Care should be taken in parallel redundant arrangements to ensure that batteries are rated for each module such that the full load and autonomy period can be achieved with ( n) units, rather than ( n +1) units.

Battery racks should be provided with DC circuit breakers for isolation purposes and consideration give to shunt trip facilities for emergency shut down procedures.

For kinetic energy diesel rotary systems the long term Lamellae
Tube
Tube
stored energy will take the form of oil storage tank space Cross
Cross
and the capacity will be subject to both the tank location section
section
Spine
Active material
and the quality of the mains supply at the site. The storage Figure 9.15 Lead-acid batteries: types of positive plate capacity at full load consumption will probably equal the storage period selected for emergency generation but if frequent starting is expected due to large variations in cell to have a generous volume of electrolyte, which supply voltage/frequency then some additional capacity requires a low electrolyte specific gravity (1.220 kg/litre).

may be necessary.

Tubular cells
9.9.1
Battery types
The tubular positive plate is a fabric gauntlet of tubes containing active material and conducting lead–antimony This section relates to batteries in general and not spines. The antimony content varies between 0.5% and 8%
specifically to those used in UPS systems.

and its purpose is to harden the lead. In comparison to the Planté cell the surface area is much higher in the tubular To understand the principles of electrochemical cells and plate and this is reflected in a higher energy density, batteries it is useful to identify the reactions taking place particularly at the lower rates of discharge. This higher in terms of chemical symbols. The terminology used in energy density requires an electrolyte specific gravity of this section is given in Table 9.3.

the order 1.240 kg/litre.

9.9.1.1
Lead-acid cells
Pasted or flat plate cells
Lead-acid batteries are initially categorised according to The pasted or flat positive plate comprises a lead alloy the type of positive plate used in the cell, see Figure 9.15.

frame with an internal lattice which is filled with active They are further categorised according to the type of lead material. The term ‘flat plate’ describes its appearance, alloy used in the positive plate, and whether the cell has a and the word ‘pasted’ describes how it is manufactured.

vent, or is fitted with a valve.

Some flat plate cells are described as lead–antimony cells.

This is because of the alloy used in the plate frame and Planté cells
lattice. The antimony content of the frame and lattice varies between 0.5% and 6.0%, though for long life and The Planté positive plate is a thick sheet of lamellated low maintenance periods the antimony level is kept as low pure lead onto which a very fine layer of active material as possible.

has been deposited. The purpose of the lamellated surface is to generate a large surface area within the plates, which Other flat plate cells are lead–calcium cells and in such directly relates to the capacity of the plate. The plates have cases the frame and lattice alloy is hardened with up to 1%
an overall thickness of 6–8 mm.

of calcium.

These cells have a long life but the energy density
Pasted or flat plates achieve a similar surface area to that (W·h/litre) of the cell is low, except at very high rates of of tubular plates and therefore similar energy densities, discharge. The construction of the Planté cell allows the again, particularly at the low discharge rates. This again Table 9.3 Batteries: terminology and symbols
Item
Battery type
Lead acid
Nickel cadmium
Positive plate
Lead dioxide (PbO )
Nickel hydroxide (Ni (OH) )
2
2
Negative plate
Lead (Pb)
Cadmium (Cd)
Cadmium hydroxide (Cd (OH) )
2
Electrolyte
Sulphuric acid (H SO )
Potassium hydroxide (KOH)
2
4
Gases/liquids produced
Hydrogen (H )
Hydrogen (H )
2
2
Oxygen (O )
Oxygen (O )
2
2
Water (H O)
Water (H O)
2
2
Uninterruptible power supplies
9-17
requires an electrolyte specific gravity of the order energy density for the cell. This type of cell
1.240 kg/litre.

typically operates with electrolyte gravities of
1.300 kg/litre.

Vented cells
9.9.1.2
Nickel–cadmium cells
This is the traditional cell containing electrolyte in which the liquid level has to be kept between specified maximum Nickel–cadmium batteries are also initially cate-and minimum levels. Each cell is fitted with a removable gorised according to the types of plates used in the cell. In vent plug to allow gases to escape and to enable the addition, there are small capacity sealed cells.

electrolyte to be topped-up when necessary.

The types of lead-acid cells described above are generally Pocket plate cells
vented cells.

The pocket plate cell consists of a plaque of perforated Valve regulated cells
pockets filled with active materials. The plaque is pressed from thin perforated strip steel which has been annealed In valve regulated lead-acid (VRLA) cells, the electrolyte is in a reducing atmosphere and, always in the case of the immobilised between the plates, and gases are allowed to positive plate and sometimes in the negative plate, has escape by means of a valve rather than vent plug. VRLA been nickel-plated.

cells fall into two categories: those with electrolyte in the form of a gel, and those in which the electrolyte is The electrolyte used is a nominal 20% solution of
immobilised by absorption into a glass fibre separator: potassium hydroxide which has a specific gravity of
—
Gelled electrolyte cells: cells of this type have been 1.20 kg/litre but, as water is lost by electrolysis, cells are manufactured using tubular plates and pasted
designed to allow the specific gravity of the electrolyte to plates, in which the alloys used are either very low rise to approximately 1.26 kg/litre when the electrolyte has antimony alloy or lead–calcium alloy. Their
fallen to its minimum level and water has to be added.

behaviour is very similar to the vented equivalent
When pocket plate cells are designed for use in arctic except that the electrolyte used in the discharge
conditions the starting electrolyte is more dense, often reaction is limited to that contained directly
with a specific gravity of 1.25 kg/litre which rises to between the plates. It is not possible to compensate approximately 1.30 kg/litre before water is added. The for this loss of electrolyte by increasing its gravity, electrolyte concentration chosen is a compromise between as this would ultimately increase float charge
cell life, conductance and freezing point. Lithium
voltages to unacceptably high levels. As a con-
hydroxide is usually added to the electrolyte, typically in sequence the specific gravity of the electrolyte used the range 8–20 g/litre LiOH in order to increase the life of in gelled cells will be the same as for a vented cell positive plate. As electrolyte does not take part in the but the energy density of the cell will be reduced.

electrochemical reactions of the cell its discharge profile is During operation, water will be lost from the cell
very similar to that of the Planté cell shown in Figure as a consequence of gassing and this will allow
9.15.

oxygen recombination to take place. This reduces
gassing and conserves water, but also reduces the
voltage of the negative plate. This increases the
Sintered plate cells
float current and the internal heat generated by
about 2.5 times.

The sintered plate cell comprises a highly porous nickel substrate impregnated with the active materials.

—
Absorbed electrolyte: cells of this type have only been manufactured by using pasted or flat plates.

The electrolyte used in sintered plate cells is essentially The frame and lattice alloys in these plates is
the same as for pocket plate cells but, in the sealed type, either lead–calcium alloy or pure lead. The prin-the specific gravity of the electrolyte is usually in range cipal feature of the absorbed electrolyte cell that is different to other cells is the separator between the 1.25–1.30 kg/litre. The charge acceptance of the positive plates. These separators are usually made in micro-electrode, particularly at high temperatures, is improved glass fibre which absorbs the electrolyte. The
by the addition of lithium(4). However, the electrical degree of electrolyte saturation in the separator
performance obtained gives a superior value of energy determines the electrochemical and electrical
density at all rates of discharge.

behaviour of the cell.

When the separator is totally saturated with
Pasted plate cells and hybrid cells
electrolyte, the behaviour is identical to that of the gelled cell.

Various types of pasted plates have been made. These are a mixture of active materials in combination with plastic When the saturation level of electrolyte in the
separator is set to achieve maximum oxygen
binders which are applied to a conductive metal mesh, recombination (95%) within the cell, then the
dried and pressed to dimension. The negative electrode is negative plate will have a lower float voltage.

the most successful and is finding application in combina-Under these circumstances, it is therefore possible
tion with other positive plate types usually of the sintered to increase the electrolyte specific gravity without type to form a hybrid cell. The electrolyte used is similar detriment to the float voltage, giving an increased
to that used in pocket plate cells.

9-18
Electricity in buildings
Vented cells
—
At the end of discharge both plates are converted
to lead sulphate, and if left in the dilute acid for The vented cell is the traditional flooded nickel–cadmium any length of time, will not recharge efficiently.

type, fitted with a vent plug which allows gas to escape and can be removed during topping-up. The vent cap is On completion of the charge reaction, the cells will emit designed to minimise the ingress of air during topping-up, gas as the current flowing through the cell electrolyses the and thereby minimise carbonation of the electrolyte
water. The reaction for this process is as follows:
arising from the reaction with carbon dioxide. It often contains a porous disc to inhibit the progression of a flame Gassing
2 H O → 2 H + O
front if the explosive gasses generated during charging 2
2
2
Electrolysis
should ignite.

Water is consumed in the cell and it is for this reason that Vented cells are manufactured using pocket plates,
batteries need to be periodically topped-up with water.

sintered plates, plastic bonded plates and combinations of these with pasted plates.

There is, however, a variant of the lead-acid cell in which the vent plug is replaced by a valve, thereby preventing Sealed cells
the battery from being topped-up with water. Some
batteries of this type use the oxygen recombination
Small capacity sealed cells have only been manufactured principle to suppress the evolution of gas and therefore using sintered plates and negative bonded electrodes, but tend to generate a little more internal heat, in the absence optimisation of the electrolyte volume and degree of sep-of gassing, and have different float voltage characteristics.

arator saturation remain critical to the safe performance of these cells.

9.9.2.2
Nickel–cadmium batteries
Oxygen recombination is therefore optimised to maxi-
The overall electrochemical reaction taking place in a mum efficiency allowing the cell to be effectively sealed.

nickel–cadmium battery is usually given by the equation: Whilst some designs intended for satellite operation are hermetically sealed, the majority have a pressure release Discharge
2 NiOOH + Cd + H O →
← 2 Ni(OH) + Cd(OH)
valve or safety device which exhausts gas under fault 2
2
2
Charge
conditions.

which is the sum of the reactions taking place at the two Because the oxygen recombination cycle is virtually 100%
electrodes. These are usually shown as follows.

efficient, all the trickle charge current passing through the Positive electrode:
cell will generate heat which, however small, must be removed by ventilation.

Discharge
NiOOH + H O + e– →
+ OH
2
← Ni(OH)2
Charge
9.9.2
Electrochemical reactions
for which the standard electrode potential is usually given as E o = 0.49 V.

Negative electrode:
9.9.2.1
Lead-acid batteries
Discharge
The electrochemical reactions occurring in a lead-acid cell Cd + 2 OH– →
← Cd(OH) + 2 e–
2
are summarised by the following equation:
Charge
for which the standard electrode potential is usually given as E o = –0.809 V.

Discharge
PbO + Pb + 2 H SO →
+ 2 H O
2
2
4← 2 PbSO4
2
Charge
Thus the theoretical open circuit voltage of the
nickel–cadmium system is 1.299 V but this is an overThe nominal voltage of the cell is 2 V. During the
simplification since Ni(OH) exists in two forms, known 2
discharge reaction the positive plate (PbO ) and the as α and β.

2
negative plate (Pb) react with the electrolyte (H SO ) to 2
4
The true composition of the electrodes in the charged and produce electricity, lead sulphate (PbSO ) and water 4
discharged states is a matter of conjecture. The nominal (H O).

2
open circuit voltage of the nickel–cadmium cell is usually taken as 1.20 V per cell.

Because the electrolyte takes part in the reaction, the strength of the sulphuric acid decreases during discharge The electrolyte does not take part in the electrochemical and increases during charge. The variation in electrolyte reaction as an active material, and therefore the charac-strength produces the following characteristics:
teristics of a Ni–Cd cell are different to those of a lead-acid
—
The internal resistance of the cell changes with the cell:
state of charge.

—
The internal resistance changes very little during
—
As the working voltage of the cell is related in part the discharge.

to the concentration of the electrolyte this will
—
The cell is not sensitive to being left for long
affect the voltage profile of the discharge curve.

periods in the discharged condition.

Uninterruptible power supplies
9-19
On completion of the charge reaction, the cells will gas 9.9.4
Battery applications
with the electrolysis of water in the electrolyte. The reaction for gassing and the need for topping-up are Battery applications are given in Table 9.4. The reference similar to those for lead-acid cells. However, a sealed code is used for identification purposes in subsequent nickel–cadmium cell has been available in small capacities tables.

(button cells and cylindrical cells) for over 30 years. These cells were the first to use the oxygen recombination principle. Whilst the cells are sealed, they have a pressure 9.9.5
Typical battery performance
release valve or rupture disc to exhaust any pressurised gas under fault conditions. The sealed cells display different Table 9.5 gives typical data on energy density, rate of characteristics when compared to vented cells, with
discharge, capacity range, life and life cycles for various internal heat generation being higher and the applied battery types. The information is based on laboratory tests system voltage levels being lower.

at constant temperature for ‘stationary’ (STAT) applications (see Table 9.4).

9.9.3
Mixed battery systems
9.9.6
Operating temperature
Accidental mixing of the electrolytes of sulphuric acid and potassium hydroxide will not only destroy the cells but result in an explosive reaction.

9.9.6.1
Effect on capacity
It is recommended that lead-acid and Ni–Cd battery
In all battery types capacity changes directly with
systems should not be installed in close proximity and temperature. Manufacturers will give the factors and maintenance facilities should be totally separate. Refer to methods by which allowance can be made for temperature.

BS 6133(5) and BS 6132(6).

9.9.6.2
Effect on battery life
The life of batteries decrease as the temperature increases by about half for every 10 K rise in temperature above the optimum for lead-acid batteries and every 20 K for Ni–Cd batteries. However, the converse is not true if tempera-Table 9.4 Battery applications
tures fall below the optimum temperature. On the
Application
Description
Code
contrary, the float voltage should be increased in order Stationary
Batteries in a fixed location (i.e. not habitually
STAT
that the battery can be maintained at the top of charge at moved from place to place) and which are
lower temperatures.

permanently connected to the load and to
the DC supply
9.9.6.3
Float voltage compensation at
Traction
Batteries used as power sources for electric
T
elevated temperatures
traction vehicles or materials handling
equipment
To conserve battery life, the float voltage should be Starter
Batteries for starting, lighting and auxiliary
SLI
reduced as the temperature increases. Appropriate values equipment with internal combustion
of compensation can be obtained from the battery
engined vehicles (e.g. cars, commercial and
manufacturers. Automatic float voltage compensation is industrial vehicles)
sometimes provided in the charger control circuits.

Portable
Batteries of the valve regulated lead-acid or
P
sealed Ni–Cd types for cyclic application in
Note: constant potential charging is not recommended for portable equipment, tools, toys etc.

sealed nickel–cadmium cells due to the risk of thermal runaway. It should only be used where low rate charging is Table 9.5 Battery performance data
Battery type
Capacity
Energy density over stated discharge period
Typical lifetime
Typical cycle life
range / A·h
(at 20 °C) / years
(laboratory test)
1 hour
15 minutes
/ cycles
W·h/kg
W·h/litre
W·h/kg
W·h/litre
Vented lead-acid:
— Planté
15–2000
8.43
18.06
4.25
9.11
20–25
400
— tubular
200–3500
10.54
29.4
5.07
13.64
10–15
1200
— flat plate
15–1000
11.02
25.3
5.31
12.65
3–12
400
Valve-regulated lead-acid:
— gelled
200–1500
11.5
28.3
6.10
15.0
5–18
400
— absorbed
20–1000
15.48
43.6
9.83
27.7
8–13
250
Vented nickel–cadmium:
— pocket
8–1540
15.8
27.2
8.2
16.27
<25
*
— sintered
11–440
21.7
32.53
13.96
20.93
<20
*
Sealed nickel–cadmium
15–160
28.47
81.27
23.61
67.4
<20
*
* The absence of data reflects the absence of suitable laboratory life cycle test and not the performance of the product. Estimates of life cycle can be obtained from the manufacturers. Life cycle data is only important for some third world countries where the mains supply can be intermittent.

9-20
Electricity in buildings
required and sophisticated control methods can be
Typical standby float charge current profiles are shown in employed.

the Figure 9.18. The charger is able to supply all the current required by the battery and the load at any time.

9.9.6.4
Storage life
Typical standby float charge current profiles with slight Storage times for new, fully charged, batteries reduce with peak discharges are shown in Figure 9.19. In this case the increase in temperature. The storage time reduces by a charger is able to supply, on average, all the current to the factor of two for every 10 K rise in the temperature. Values load and the battery, including the recharge current. The for shelf life can be obtained from the battery manufac-battery is always kept in the fully charged condition turers.

provided the the value ‘ x’ does not exceed the manufacturer’s limits. A typical value for x would be in the range 0–5% of the average float current ( I
).

9.9.7
System effects
f (ave)
In most applications battery performance will vary
9.9.7.4
Battery buffer operation
according to the system operating conditions.

This mode of operation is shown in Figure 9.20, and is 9.9.7.1
Response mode operation
characterised by a permanent float charge condition being applied to the battery and a variable load in which the When the power supply fails the load is connected to the charger supplies the current to both the battery and the battery power source with or without interruption of load.

power to the load.

Whilst the average charger current meets the currents In this mode the battery normal condition is that of required by the load and battery, the battery cannot accept receiving only a float charge provided by the charger. The the positive cycle float current efficiently in the time arrangement is shown in Figure 9.16.

available. In these conditions, the battery is not charged at all times, and this can lead to a ‘walk down’ in available 9.9.7.2
Parallel mode operation
capacity. To compensate for this situation there are the following alternatives:
The load is permanently connected to the charger and the
—
Operate the system at an elevated charge voltage
battery so that when the power supply fails, the battery and thereby keep the battery at the top of charge.

power source supports the load without interruption. The arrangement is shown in Figure 9.17.

Within parallel mode operation, the system (i.e. charger and the load) can react and have various effects upon the battery. The effects have been classified into groups of Float current ( I
)
Average ( I )
battery operational characteristics.

float
ave
Charge
9.9.7.3
Standby operation
Current / mA
This is characterised by a permanent float charge
condition being applied to the battery and a constant load in which the charger supplies the current to both the load 0
and the battery.

Time / ms
(a)
Load
Charger current ( I )
N
Charger
~
Load current ( I
)
load
=
Battery
I >
– I
+ I

N
load
float
Charge
Figure 9.16 Arrangement for response mode operation Current / A
Battery current ( I
)
float
Charger
~
0
Load
=
Time / ms
(b)
Battery
Figure 9.18 Battery standby operation; (a) float charge current with superimposed ripple current, (b) charger supplying full current to load Figure 9.17 Arrangement for parallel mode operation and battery
Uninterruptible power supplies
9-21
Float charge current ( I
)
Average ( I )
float
ave
Battery ( I )
Average ( I )
bat
ave
Charge
Current / A
Charge
Current / mA
0
0
Discharge
Discharge
Discharge
Time / ms
Time / ms
(a)
(a)
Charger current ( I )
N
Charger current ( I )
N
Load current ( I
)
load
Load current ( I
)
load
Occasionally: I < I
+ I
)
N
load
boost
I ~
– I
+ I

N
load
float
Current / A
Current / A
Battery current ( I
)
Average ( I )
Battery current ( I
)
float
ave
boost
Charge
Charge
0
0
x
Discharge
Time / s
Time / s
Discharge
(b)
(b)
Figure 9.20 Battery buffer operation; (a) float charge current with superimposed ripple current, (b) charger supplying full current to load Figure 9.19 Battery standby operation with slight peak discharges; and battery
(a) float charge current with superimposed ripple current, (b) charger supplying full current to load and battery
—
Operate the system at normal float charge voltages
these circumstances the service life would be determined and give the battery regular off line charges at
by the number and depth of the discharge cycles.

boost charge voltages.

Examples of this operation would be peak lopping systems
—
Operate the system at normal float charge voltages
or photovoltaic systems.

and allow the capacity to fall to its natural mini-
mum which is usually approximately 80% of the
catalogue value. This technique would require
9.9.8
Battery type selection
using a 25% larger battery capacity.

9.9.8.1
Standards
9.9.7.5
Battery shallow cycling operation
Standards for lead-acid batteries are primarily organised This is characterised by significant discharges of the according to application, while those for nickel–cadmium battery together with a variable float charge condition. In batteries are organised by type.

Table 9.6 Application and product standards for batteries Application*
Code*
Application standard
Product standard
(lead-acid only)
Lead-acid
Ni–Cd
Stationary
STAT
BS EN 60896: Part 1(8)
BS 6290: Part 2(4)
IEC 60623(14)
BS EN 60896: Part 2(8)
BS 6290: Part 3(4)
IEC 60622(15)
BS 6290: Part 4(4)
Traction
T
BS EN 60254(9)
BS EN 60254(9)
IEC 60623(14)
IEC 60254: Part 1(10)
IEC 60254: Part 2(10)
Starter
SLI
BS EN 60095: Part 1(11)
BS EN 60095: Part 4(11)
IEC 60623(14)
IEC 60622(15)
Portable
P
BS EN 61056: Part 1(12)
IEC 61056-2(13)
BS EN 61150(16)
* See Table 9.4
9-22
Electricity in buildings
Table 9.6 lists relevant application and product
( a)
type of application (see Table 9.7)
standards(3,7–15).

( b)
operational voltage range
9.9.8.2
Battery applications and equipment
( c)
maximum power capability
specifications
( d)
autonomy time of the battery (end of service life)
Table 9.7 lists typical battery applications and related ( e)
battery recharge time and current.

equipment specifications.

9.9.9.2
Battery size
9.9.8.3
Selection method
If the type of application is such that the load on the The operational requirements that have to be determined battery and the charger is not the load specified by the are:
client, e.g. UPS or inverter applications, then either the whole of the specified requirement should be sub-
( a)
service life
contracted to the system supplier or an enquiry placed ( b)
cycling duty
with them to establish values for ( b) and ( c) above to be supported by the battery and the charger.

( c)
maintenance
( d)
temperature range in service
The values of ( b) to ( e) pertaining to the battery will form a second part of the battery supplier enquiry procedure (see ( e)
temperature range in storage.

section 9.9.9.4) to establish the size of the battery concerned. Alternatively, for large, complex applications, the The requirements against ( a), ( b) and ( c) can be used with engineer may wish to calculate the battery size. For lead-Table 9.5 to determine the type of battery most appropriate acid batteries, a useful reference is ANSI/IEEE Standard to the client’s specification. Having established the type of 485(16).

battery and its application, the appropriate specification may be established from Tables 9.6 and 9.7.

9.9.9.3
Charger size
The effects of ( d) and ( e) upon battery service life and storage life respectively will form part of the ‘supplier To establish the charger size the following operational enquiry procedure’ for the batteries (see section 9.9.9.4), requirements will be need to be known:
together with details of the benefits of float voltage compensation on service life, if necessary and available.

( a)
maximum constant voltage
( b)
maximum power
9.9.9
Charger selection
( c)
maximum battery recharge current
( d)
whether automatic temperature/float voltage com-
9.9.9.1
Load type and size
pensation is provided.

The selection of the charger is dependent upon the size The values of ( d) form part of the charger supplier enquiry and type of the load and the size of the battery. It is not procedure, see 9.9.9.4 below.

the intention to provide the engineer with a guide on systems engineering, but to establish a position in which 9.9.9.4
Supplier enquiry procedures
the appropriate questions can be asked of the supplier.

From the client specification the following operational Batteries
requirements can be ascertained:
The enquiry procedure for batteries is in three parts as follows:
Table 9.7 Battery applications and equipment specifications ( a)
Temperature effects upon service life and storage,
Battery application
Code*
Equipment specification
and float voltage compensation benefits, see 9.9.8.3
Central battery systems:
items ( d) and ( e).

— emergency lighting
STAT
— UPS
STAT
BS 5266: Part 1(20)
( b)
Battery size, see 9.9.9.1 items ( b) to ( e) and 9.9.9.2.

— inverters
STAT
( c)
Battery dimensions, including weight, see 9.9.9.5.

— alarm systems
STAT
Floor loading criteria to be provided, together
— clock systems
STAT
BS 5839: Part 4(21)
with allocated space and height requirements.

Self-contained systems:
Access availability to be identified.

— emergency lighting
— UPS
STAT/P
BS4533-102.22(22)
— alarm systems
STAT/P
Chargers
— clock systems
STAT/P
System free batteries
The enquiry procedure for chargers is in two parts as (buildings):
follows:
— starter
STAT/SLI
( a)
Charger size, see section 9.9.9.3 ( a) to ( d).

— traction
T
* See Table 9.4
( b)
Charger dimensions, including weight.

Uninterruptible power supplies
9-23
9.9.9.5
Battery accommodation
However, it should primarily be secure, offering resilient support to the critical load. At the concept stage the The battery accommodation required is determined by the following points should be considered:
size and type of the installation. The types of installation
—
That the equipment can be installed at any stage of
are as follows.

the building works and that any future expansion
requirements can be met. Large scale dismantling
Central battery installations
will be expensive.

—
Consideration should be given to the ability to
The battery power is centralised in one room.

install heat extraction systems and provide cooling
Conventional batteries can be installed in tiers which in and combustion air for diesel driven prime
themselves can be used individually or in combination.

movers, if used.

The tier arrangement for conventional batteries allows for the cells/units to be vertically offset when used in
—
Structural loadings for modules, batteries and
combination to allow access for maintenance. Topping-up supporting plant and switchgear should be
is not necessary on valve regulated types and therefore the considered and the effect of noise and vibration
layouts can be more compact and depending upon floor investigated for diesel driven systems.

loadings can rise up to eight shelves (tiers). The stands are
—
Avoid locations in confined low level spaces where
generally of modular construction, expandable to accom-flood water could rapidly build up. Spaces with
modate various sizes of battery.

charged piped services should also be avoided.

A central battery room should be designed for that specific
—
For resilience under battery operation the space
purpose in respect of ventilation, corrosion environments, should be as high as possible to increase room
and safety.

volume such that the ambient temperature will not
rise too fast if cooling is not provided.

Office-compatible installations
—
Input and output switchgear should preferably be
local to the UPS equipment and easily identifiable.

In this type of installation the batteries are installed Consideration should be given to separation to
within the office environment. This type of battery layout allow access for manual switching in the event of
is quite simple, employing fairly high energy density the operation of any automatic fire suppression.

storage and normally using valve regulated batteries. Such
—
Noise emission should be considered from the
cabinets are very flexible in terms of depth and each shelf initial stages. This is applicable to all systems from can accommodate one or two blocks or a single large, small dedicated units up to large multiple diesel
front-connected cell.

rotary systems. Clearly this is important where
units are proposed for office or computer room
The office compatible installation does not require special environments. The effect on maintenance staff of
emphasis on ventilation or corrosion environments.

high noise levels from large diesel prime movers in
However, safety issues still apply.

plant rooms should not be overlooked.

—
In order that
Self contained systems
HVAC plant failure or maintenance
has minimal effect on the UPS operation, consider-
ation should be given to providing independent
Typical of this type of system is single point emergency access to plant located around the periphery of the
lighting and alarm equipment, in which the battery is UPS space; standby units should also be provided if
contained in the same enclosure as the charger and the possible.

end load. The batteries are usually low voltage and low capacity.

—
Separation of UPS modules and their batteries
should be considered for large systems in order to
prevent excessive loss of extinguishant, in the
System-free installations
event of accidental discharge. This also provides
the opportunity to maintain lower battery oper-
This type of installation covers those battery installations ating temperatures, thereby extending battery life.

that may be found in buildings, but whose function is more in the nature of a working battery rather than a standby battery. Typical of these installations are batteries for starting stationary engines, and batteries for mechan-9.11
UPS testing and
ical handling equipment. Both types of installation require facilities for battery charging within the building.

commissioning
9.11.1
Specification
9.10
UPS installation
The testing and commissioning activities for UPS systems can be an intensive activity employing the use of specialist 9.10.1
Space requirements
engineers and equipment. In small dedicated systems the activity is likely to be repetitive with similar units being The location of any UPS system is important and it should procured for similar office equipment and as such sample preferably be in a position where it can be accessed testing may be acceptable. On large central units used to quickly and easily in the event of any malfunction.

support PDUs or central building systems the tests will be
9-24
Electricity in buildings
unique and will probably need to be carried out both in The majority of manufacturers’ test bays are equipped the factory and on site when the installation is completed.

with high speed, computerised data gathering units that Factory tests on systems above 1 MV·A are generally only provide processed information in a standard form. These possible with linear loads since it is impractical to recreate can generally print waveforms of voltage and current a general, or particular, non-linear load.

characteristics.

For tender comparison purposes and to prove that systems The more tests specified the higher will be the cost of are as specified it is essential that the testing activities testing, which is not significant on larger systems but can required are clearly stated at the time of enquiry.

be high for systems less than 50 kV·A. For specification purposes, the manufacturer should be asked to provide some or all of the following equipment and instruments to 9.11.2
Initial inspection and testing
be used for testing purposes:
Initial inspection and testing of
—
current, voltage and power factor monitoring
UPS equipment should
embrace and prove various manufacturers’ performance equipment for both input and output
statements but should cover the following:
—
current and voltage monitoring equipment for DC
—
suitability of the equipment to be installed within
limb
the space provided
—
high sensitivity digital frequency meters
—
ability of the equipment to provide uninterrupted
—
line spectra visual display instrument with print-
conditioned power to the dedicated load under
out, set to measure percentage current harmonics.

variable input conditions of voltage and frequency
—
oscilloscope with variable timebase and hard copy
—
harmonic loads and their effect on the output
read-out to record current and voltage oscillo-
voltage waveform
grams on all phases
—
harmonic current content in the input current at
—
multi-stage three-phase resistive load bank with
various load conditions
independent adjustment of each phase
—
efficiency checks at various load levels including
—
a separate UPS with 6-pulse rectifier to provide a
unbalanced loads
distorted test load.

—
autonomy tests at specified loads and part loads if
possible (this will only be possible as an on-site
For each test condition the following readings should be test for larger equipment)
taken as a minimum:
—
continuity of supply under various fault con-
—
input line voltages
ditions within the equipment
—
input phase voltages
—
effects of continuous overloads and transient
overloads on the system in mains
—
fundamental (50 Hz) input currents per phase
—
‘healthy’ and ‘failed’ conditions
—
input phase power (kW) or phase power factors
—
acoustic tests under various load conditions.

—
input harmonic currents for orders 2 to 23
—
output line voltages
Initial inspection and testing of small dedicated units may take the form of equipment loans prior to purchase, to
—
output phase voltages
enable analysis in the actual ‘field’ conditions. In this case,
—
fundamental (50 Hz) output currents per phase
unless controlled generator power is available, it will be difficult to test the quality of output under difficult input
—
output phase power (kW) or phase power factors
conditions.

—
output harmonic voltages for 2nd, 3rd and 5th
orders.

On systems of 5 kV·A and upwards the equipment is not easily transportable due to the weight and size of
Typical tests should be carried out for the following load supporting batteries and, once the selection process has conditions:
occurred, the first tests will be just prior to actual delivery.

—
no load tests
The level of initial testing, inspection and assessment of
—
50% full load balanced at unity power factor
UPS equipment in the 1 kV·A to 20 kV·A band becomes a question of commercial viability and risk. Without major
—
unbalanced load with 50%, 100%, 100% full load
upheaval it is difficult to test in ‘field’ conditions but phase values
factory testing may be costly. The designer and client can
—
unbalanced load with 25%, 50%, 50% full load
only assess the risk.

phase values (for multi-module systems)
If factory tests are decided upon prior to delivery of the
—
mains failure with above load(s) (oscillogram)
equipment specified, it should be recognised that, for
—
removal of above load(s) and return (oscillogram)
systems using batteries as the stored energy medium, they are not always sourced from the UPS factory. Often they are
—
full load tests
delivered directly to site and erected there. This means
—
mains failure at full load (oscillogram)
that factory tests will probably be carried out with a central DC supply.

—
removal and return of full load (oscillogram)
Uninterruptible power supplies
9-25
—
operation of automatic bypass (oscillogram)
9.12
Operation and
—
150% full load and time for reversion to bypass
maintenance
—
three phase short circuit test to show fuse
clearance.

9.12.1
Operating procedures and
The above tests are suggestions only and may require instructions
adjustment to suit the exact equipment in question. Other adjustments may involve the acceptance of computerised Operating and maintenance instructions should be a
voltage, current and frequency plots in lieu of full oscillo-composite part of any enquiry sent to manufacturers in grams.

order that they make sufficient allowance for their provision. Primarily the documentation should incorporate a list of each fundamental piece of equipment supplied 9.11.3
Bringing into service
along with serial numbers, ratings and operating voltages and frequency.

Once equipment has been delivered to site and installed in its operational mode, including all fire systems or batteries Safety precautions should be included as a section within as applicable, a further set of tests should be carried out.

the documentation and should give checking procedures To maintain clear responsibility it is recommended that for isolation switching, bypass switching and for initial the manufacturers or their agent be employed to install all energisation of the component and load. Further safety equipment from system input terminals up to the main warnings should be included regarding hazardous
outgoing switchgear connection.

materials and the presence of charged capacitors, if they exist, within the specified equipment.

Initially the manufacturer should carry out no-load tests to check phase rotation, emergency and safety circuits, Where applicable, and particularly in the case of large alarms, instruments and controls. Only upon completion parallel redundant systems, details of all connections, should the system be accepted for witness testing, as interconnections and assembly procedures should be
follows:
provided along with terminal arrangements for monitor-
—
full and partial load tests on mains
ing, alarm and diagnostic connections.

—
full load test with mains interrupted
Where programmable controllers are used to monitor
—
for battery stored energy system, load take-up by
operational functions, failures and diagnostic information standby generators
its functions, features and method of use should be
indicated.

—
for battery stored energy systems, autonomy tests
for each individual module in parallel config-
A general description section should be incorporated urations, then as a complete system
including illustrations of major component parts,
—
functional switching and operational checks
technical data and dimensions, together with drawings.

For completeness and the assistance of attending main-
—
for systems using diesel back-up, fuel consumption
tenance engineers the operating instructions should
and engine function tests should be carried out at
incorporate detail drawings of each major component part various load levels.

including batteries, stands and diesel engines where applicable. Full service parts lists should be provided for To enable satisfactory testing without affecting the critical each component part including any fault finding
load (or in its absence), the need for on-site test load banks procedures.

should be assessed for each project.

Finally the operating and maintenance manual should
Prior to delivery to site certain vital functions should be incorporate regular maintenance schedules and proce-achieved. The room should obviously be secure and
dures, together with test results carried out on completion finished and subject to the needs of the equipment the of manufacture, witnessed in the factory, or subsequent room finishes sealed to prevent dust migrating to the area.

site tests after installation.

Subject to the level of financial risk and statutory requirements the room space should be provided with all 9.12.2
Metering, indications and
necessary fire protection, which may need to be opera-diagnostics
tional from the time of permanent operation.

The degree of monitoring and diagnostic information
Any necessary air conditioning or ventilation should be required by the user will be a function of the critical load checked, commissioned and available from the time that served and the emergency support facilities that are the UPS system goes into prolonged test mode or perma-available on site. In general the information will take the nent operation.

form of liquid crystal integral displays with a select button typically giving the following information:
Prior to final connection of the UPS system to the critical load the system should go through a prolonged load test of
—
input voltage
up to 100 hours continuous unsupervised operation,
—
output voltage
although this is normally achieved during the computer system tests as the whole installation is worked up.

—
input frequency
9-26
Electricity in buildings
—
output frequency
indication is essential in order that the benefit of battery autonomy can be optimised by the load operator.

—
input current
—
output current
Where central BMS systems are installed the designer should give consideration to the provision of an interface
—
output load kW and power factor
unit to give the following possible indications of the
—
normal operation
system:
—
load on bypass
—
incoming mains voltage
—
battery voltage
—
incoming mains current
—
time of load on battery autonomy
—
resultant input kV·A
—
end of autonomy
—
output voltage
—
supply voltage and frequency faults
—
output frequency
—
over-temperature
—
common fault
—
event recorder.

—
battery operation
—
load on bypass
In addition, data interface and volt-free alarm contact facilities should be available for remote indication of
—
time elapsed on battery operation
normal operating conditions and alarms.

—
theoretical time before total discharge
For monitoring purposes consideration should be given to
—
monitor status of auto bypass and manual bypass.

the provision of a complete remote monitor unit display-In large central installations it is likely that, to comply ing all of the functions listed including phase values where with client requirements or those of the insurers, the necessary and allowing interrogation from the remote designer will need to incorporate automatic gaseous
unit.

extinguishing into the UPS/battery rooms. The medium used will be subject to current availability/acceptability A very useful addition to any UPS output switchboard is but with low gas/air concentrations the cause of any fire the provision of built-in test points with integral current should be removed before extinguishing action. To achieve transducers, with fully protected outputs, for the periodic this a fire shut-down signal can be introduced to de-attachment of measuring devices including harmonic
energise the input and output to the UPS. Test facilities analysers to keep track of the load profile development should be available to allow a fire test to be carried out and any characteristic changes.

without de-energising by the inclusion of a ‘fire test inhibit’ switch.

For larger installations extending to parallel redundant arrangements, the operational and status indications To assist with operational switching in the event of fire, should be available both on a per module basis, incor-consideration should be given in the early project
porated on the module enclosure, and on a group basis planning stage to the location of switchgear outside, but available on the output/bypass cubicle. In addition mimic adjacent to, the UPS equipment room.

diagrams should be available showing the route by which energy is fed to the critical load.

Where diesel driven UPS equipment is proposed the
various local and remote monitoring facilities should In large central UPS installations it is likely that the include indication of the following:
equipment is very remote from the critical load centres and in this situation the design should give consideration
—
high diesel water temperature
to remote status panel(s) located in agreed positions and
—
low diesel oil pressure
arranged to give separate indication for each module of the following:
—
diesel failed to start.

—
normal operation
This last signal is applicable for battery backed diesel UPS
—
module on battery
only, since several attempts can be made whilst on battery.

In the case of kinetic energy storage systems, upon mains
—
module alarm
failure, it means that the critical load has been switched
—
module overload
off.

—
low battery volts
9.12.3
Remote control, diagnostics and
—
battery fully discharged
service
—
input and output out of synchronism
Many UPS systems are now produced with the ability to
—
system on bypass.

communicate over a telephone line for remote service and fault diagnostics. Modules can be programmed so as to call The panel should incorporate visual and audible alarm a pre-arranged number and report a fault. If this is a facilities with ‘mute’, ‘acknowledge test’ and ‘reset’
requirement then the designer must allow for the
functions and should, where applicable, provide further installation of a dedicated (direct) line to the UPS module.

indication of emergency or normal power status or diesel In addition, depending upon the manufacturer of the UPS, generator(s) which have failed to start. This latter status it may be required to install a modem and 13 A socket
Uninterruptible power supplies
9-27
local to the module. Additional 13 A single phase power 8
BS EN 60254: Lead-acid traction batteries; Part 1: 1997: General outlets may be required for external printers, service PCs requirements and methods of test; Part 2: 1997: Dimensions of cells and instruments.

and terminals and marking of polarity on cells (London: British Standards Institution) (1997)
9
IEC 60254: Lead-acid traction batteries; Part 1: 1997: General References
requirements and methods of test; Part 2: 2000: Dimensions of cells and terminals and marking of polarity on cells (Geneva: 1
Council Directive of 3 May 1989 on the approximation of the International Electrotechnical Commission) (1997, 2000) laws of the member states relating to electromagnetic compatibility EC Directive 89/336/EEC Official J. of the 10
BS EN 60095: Lead-acid starter batteries; Part 1: 1993: General European Communities 23.5.89 L139/19 (as amended by Council requirements and methods of test; Part 4: 1993: Dimensions of Directives 92/31/EEC (1992), 93/68/EEC (1993) and 93/97/EEC
batteries for heavy commercial vehicles (London: British (1993)) (Brussels: Commission of the European Communities) Standards Institution) (1993)
(1989–93)
11
BS EN 61056: Portable lead-acid cells and batteries (valve-regulated 2
Planning levels for harmonic voltage distortion and the connection of types); Part 1: 2003: General requirements, functional characteristics.

non-linear equipment to transmission systems and distribution Methods of test (London: British Standards Institution) (2003) networks in the United Kingdom Engineering Recommendation G5/4 (London: Electricity Association) (2001)
12
IEC 61056: General purpose lead-acid batteries (valve-regulated 3
BS 6290: Lead-acid stationary cells and batteries; Part 2: 1999: types); Part 2: 2002: Dimensions, terminals and marking (Geneva: Specification for the high-performance Plante positive type; Part 3: International Electrotechnical Commission) (2002)
1999: Specification for the flat positive plate type; Part 4: 1997: 13
IEC 60623: 2001: Secondary cells and batteries containing alkaline Specification for classifying valve regulated types (London: British Standards Institution) (1997, 1999)
or other non-acid electrolytes. Vented nickel–cadmium prismatic rechargeable single cells
(Geneva, Switz: International
4
Falk S U and Salkind A J Alkaline storage batteries (New York: Electrotechnical Commission) (2001)
John Wiley) (1969)
5
BS 6133: 1995: Code of practice for safe operation of lead-acid 14
IEC 60622: 2002: Secondary cells and batteries containing alkaline stationary batteries (London: British Standards Institution) or other non-acid electrolytes. Sealed nickel–cadmium prismatic (1995)
rechargeable single cells (Geneva: International Electrotechnical Commission) (2002)
6
BS 6132: 1983: Code of practice for safe operation of alkaline secondary cells and batteries (London: British Standards 15
BS EN 61150: 1994: Alkaline secondary cells and batteries. Sealed Institution) (1983)
nickel–cadmium rechargeable monobloc batteries in button cell design 7
BS EN 60896: Stationary lead-acid batteries. General requirements (London: British Standards Institution) (1994)
and methods of test; Part 1: 1992: Vented types; Part 2: 1996: Valve regulated types; Part 11: 2003: Vented types. General requirements 16
IEEE Recommended practice for sizing lead-acid batteries for and methods of test (London: British Standards Institution) stationary applications ANSI/IEEE Standard 485 (New York, (1992–2003)
NY: Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers) (1997)
10-1
10
Earthing
10.1


Introduction

—
BS 7361: Part 1: 1991: Cathodic protection. Code of practice for land and marine applications(5) Earthing is the process of connecting to the general mass of earth by means of electrically conducting materials 10.2.3
Related standards
those conductive parts of an installation which are not normally subject to a voltage or electrical charge. In some instances earthing may be applied also to certain conduc-Related codes and standards are as follows:
tive parts which will normally carry a small and controlled
—
Distribution Code of the Public Electricity Suppliers of voltage or charge.

England and Wales(6)
Bonding is the related process of interconnecting such
—
Engineering Recommendation G59/1: Engineering
conductive parts to ensure that even under fault condi-recommendations for the connection of embedded
tions the voltage differences between adjacent conductive generating plant to the RECs’ distribution systems(7) parts are restricted to safe levels. It should be noted that
—
Engineering Technical Report ETR113: Notes of
bonding does not ensure that adjacent surfaces remain at guidance for the protection of private generating sets up the same potential under all conditions.

to 5 MW for operation in parallel with PES distribution networks(8).

Earthing and bonding have three main objectives:
—
Safety: which is achieved primarily by limitation of the voltage which may appear on conductive
10.2.4
Definitions
surfaces under fault conditions and by limiting the
period of time for the condition to persist.

Definitions used in this section are in accordance with BS
7430(2), BS 6651(3) and BS 7671(4), as appropriate.

—
Protection of buildings, plant and equipment: which is Illustrations of some of the more commonly used terms achieved partly by voltage limitation but mainly
are given in Figures 10.1 to 10.4(2,4,9).

by ensuring that fault currents are sufficiently
large to produce effective reaction times in protec-
tive devices.

10.3
Design principles
—
Correct and precise operation of equipment: which is achieved by providing a constant and noise-free
electrical reference plane.

10.3.1
General principles
By convention the general mass of earth is taken to be at 10.2
Statutory requirements,
zero voltage. Connecting the neutral point of an electricity standards and definitions
supply system to earth therefore creates a reference plane against which all system voltages are measured and limits the possible rise in potential of any conductive surface, see Figure 10.5.

10.2.1
Statutory documents
The mass of earth, however, is not a sink. Current flow The Electricity at Work Regulations 1989(1), of which into it from an installation will flow out at the supply Regulations 8 and 9 deal specifically with earthing and the point neutral earth connection(s), to complete the current integrity of earthed conductors.

circuit. Because it is a reasonably good conductor the earth performs this function quite well. Enhanced
10.2.2
British Standards
performance is obtained by the provision of suitable protective conductors between conductive surfaces and the source neutral, as much lower and more controllable Relevant British Standards are as follows:
circuit impedances can be achieved.

—
BS 7430: 1998: Code of practice for earthing(2)
—
BS 6651: 1999: Code of practice for protection of 10.3.2
Scope
structures against lightning(3)
—
BS 7671: 2001: Requirements for electrical
This Guide is concerned mainly with low voltage systems installations. IEE Wiring Regulations. Sixteenth at normal mains frequency. High voltage considerations Edition(4)
are made where these impact upon the low voltage system.

10-2
Electricity in buildings
L
L
Intake
Intake
Source of supply
Consumer's
Source of supply
Consumer's
installation
installation
N
N
PEN
E
conductor
E
PE
Main earthing
conductor
Main earthing
terminal
terminal
Separate neutral and protective
Combined neutral and protective conductor
conductors throughout the system
in the supply source with PME applied.

(a)
Separate neutral and protective
conductors within the installation
(b)
L
Intake
Source of supply
Consumer's
installation
N
E
Main earthing
terminal
No earthing facility
provided by the supplier
(c)
Figure 10.1 Definition of supply system earthing(2,4); (a) TN-S system, (b) TN-C-S system, (c) TT system Exposed conductive part
Supplementary
equipotential
Extraneous
Supplementary
bond
conductive part
equipotential
bond
Circuit
protective
conductor
To PEN conductor for TN-C system
Extraneous
or PE conductor for TN-S system
conductive


part

Circuit protective

conductor
Main earthing
Incoming
terminal
services
Main equipotential
Earthing
bond
conductor
Earth
electrode
Figure 10.2 Definition of earthing terminology(4)
Earthing
10-3
Supply phase
Consumer's phase
conductors
conductors
L
∑ Z
∑
co
Z c
U o
Intake
I f
Fault
Z o
Z s
Supply
Main
Normal operating
transformer
earthing
load current
Load
terminal
∑ Z
∑
po
Z p
Supply PEN or
Consumer's
PE conductor
protective
N
conductors
Conductive
elements (e.g.

Z s = Supply earth loop impedance = Z o + ∑ Z co + ∑ Z po filters, power
E
supply units)
Z el = Earth loop impedance = Z o + ∑ Z co + ∑ Z c + ∑ Z p + ∑ Z po Protective conductor
current (usually mA,
(a)
may be capacitive)
(a)
∑ Z
∑
co
Z c
L
U o
Intake
I f
Fault
Z o
Z s
Fault
Supply
Main
transformer
earthing
terminal
∑ Z
Load
p
Leakage
Consumer's
protective
conductors
∑ Z eo
N
Z el = Earth loop impedance = Z o + ∑ Z co + ∑ Z c + ∑ Z p + ∑ Z po
∑ Z eo includes both electrodes and resistance of the earth mass E
(b)
Fault current (A) or
leakage current (mA)
Figure 10.3 Definition of earth loop impedance(9); (a) TN system, (b)
(b) TT system
Figure 10.4 Definition of protective conductor and leakage currents(4); (a) protective conductor current (for special requirements see BS 7671, section 607), (b) fault current or leakage current
U o
10.3.3
Supply systems
The supply systems defined in BS 7430(2) and BS 7671(4) U o
and illustrated in Figure 10.1 are coded in terms of their neutral–earth arrangements.

0 V
An IT system has an isolated or impedance-earthed neutral point with no distributed protective conductor. This form Neutral
Neutral
of supply is not permitted on public supply networks and solidly
not
earthed
earthed
is therefore not considered further in this guide.

A TT system has an earthed neutral point but the
protective conductor is not distributed. The installation must therefore be earthed by an electrode system at the point of intake.

Source
I f
Earth fault
TN systems also have the neutral point solidly earthed but the neutral conductor is distributed either as a combined neutral/protective conductor in which case it is a TN-C
system or, if it has separate neutral and protective Current in equals current out
conductors, a TN-S system. Where a TN-C supply is
provided it is commonly carried through the installation Figure 10.5 Effect of earthing the supply source(4) as TN-S, in which case the whole system is described as TN-C-S. This is the common form of protective multiple
10-4
Electricity in buildings
earthing (PME). The combined protective and neutral
10.3.5
Electrodes
conductor is designated PME but is also referred to as the combined neutral and earth (CNE) conductor or protective 10.3.5.1
Soil
earthed neutral (PEN) conductor.

The electrical resistivity of the soil has a major influence The PEN conductor is earthed at several points along its on the effectiveness of an electrode system. Many of the length. An electrode is normally provided close to the factors affecting soil resistivity vary locally and even intake point.

seasonally. Such factors as moisture content, soil structure, chemical compositions and the nature and persistence of Since the PEN may be common to several consumers it is any salts will have a major impact. Temperature by
evident that a voltage impressed on it from one consumer contrast has a marked effect only at or around freezing could be imported into the premises of another. For this point. For this reason and because of the variable height of reason it is a requirement that all metal pipework services any water table it is often advisable to ignore the first entering the premises are bonded at the earliest point onto metre depth of a driven electrode.

the consumer’s main earthing terminal.

Consideration of the type of soil and any stratification will dictate the most suitable form of electrode. For example a 10.3.4
High voltage supplies
shallow underlying rock stratum will probably lead to the use of horizontal buried electrodes, whereas a high resis-A public supply at high voltage would normally be a
tivity gravel layer with underlying clay would lend itself to three-phase three-wire system. Cable armouring and
deep driven rods.

screens would be earthed at least at the sending end and also probably at the intake point. It is a requirement of the 10.3.5.2
Electrodes
Distribution Code(6) that the public electricity supplier (PES) or regional electricity company (REC) makes available Extensive detail relating to electrodes is contained in details of the earthing arrangement and values of earth section 3 of BS 7430(2).

loop impedance at the point of connection.

The most commonly used electrode system is in the form It is not a requirement of the code that earthing facilities of copper or copper clad steel rods interconnected with for a consumer’s installation should be provided by the copper tape. In general, and for uniform soil structures, PES. A high voltage earth electrode system must therefore little extra benefit is obtained by driving very deep rods.

be provided by the consumer with an earthing conductor At effective depths of more than about 3 metres the
to a main earth terminal. Exposed conductive parts of the decrease in resistance is relatively small, see Figure 10.6(2).

consumer’s high voltage equipment must be connected to It is better to use a large number of short rods rather than the main earth terminal with suitably rated circuit
fewer long ones, unless the low resistivity soil is at the protective conductors (CPCs). These connections include: greater depth.

—
cable armouring
Rods should not be driven into disturbed ground. One of
—
cable screens
the most economical methods for installing electrodes is to use the compacted base of cable trenches to gain
—
switchgear metal framework and panelwork
maximum effect from electrodes and connecting tapes.

—
transformer casings and extraneous metalwork
—
transformer screens
10.3.5.3
Design
—
transformer metal enclosures
The theoretical design of electrode systems is extremely
—
transformer iron core laminations.

complex although it can be attempted by reference to the tables and formulae contained in BS 7430(2). A more
For oil filled transformers the screens, laminations and pragmatic approach is to design the system based on the frame are usually bonded together and a substantial
data contained in Figure 10.6 to produce a first order approximation. The installation should then proceed from earthing stud is provided. For cast resin transformers this base by trial and measurement until a satisfactory screens are provided only to special order and although design value is achieved.

these are normally provided on the outside of the low voltage winding they must nevertheless by bonded to the A practical earth electrode system is likely to have a high voltage earth system.

resistance to earth closer to 10 Ω than 1 Ω. Striving for the latter value is often both uneconomical and unnecessary.

Where a combined earth electrode resistance not
exceeding 1 Ω can be achieved a common HV/LV system is Since the earth loop impedance is determined mainly by permitted. More commonly the resistance will be between the contribution from phase and protective conductor 5 and 10 Ω. In such cases separate electrode systems must impedances, preoccupation with achieving very low
be provided (see section 10.3.5) but, as it is almost electrode resistance represents misplaced effort. As a impossible to provide electrical separation between the general rule 10 Ω should be regarded as a guide level with incoming supply, the consumer’s HV network and the LV
20 Ω as a ‘not to be exceeded’ value.

network, it is essential that all three are interlinked. The bonding links should be equal in size to the largest HV
Separation of electrode systems, e.g. high and low voltage circuit protective conductor (CPC).

systems, is required unless a 1 Ω level can be assured.

Earthing
10-5
300
connection they did in former times. Cable armouring may still be employed as a protective conductor, either 200
alone or associated with a separate circuit protective conductor (CPC).

Structural steelwork, sheet steel piling and steel
100
reinforcement of concrete piling can all provide very low 80
resistances to earth. Corrosion of steelwork within
concrete is unlikely to be caused by alternating currents.

Soil type
However, if significant levels of leakage current may 50
reasonably be anticipated, particularly where a direct 40
current component may be present, then the steelwork 30
should at best be regarded as an auxiliary electrode and Ω
ρ = 200 Ω.m
bonded to a main electrode system. Care must be taken 20
not to introduce corrosion-producing currents by connecting incompatible materials to the building steelwork, see 10.3.5.4 above. It should be remembered that as the
ρ = 100 Ω.m
Resistance /
concrete and ground dry out so the resistance will
10
rous sandstone
increase.

8
Po
ρ = 50 Ω.m
10.3.5.6
Water and other service pipes
5
orous limestoneP
4
Other metallic service pipes should not be used as earth electrodes. They must however be bonded to the main
3
Marls
earth terminal at the point of entry into the building and ρ = 20 Ω.m
may act as an auxiliary path to earth.

2
Clays
10.3.5.7
Cathodically protected structures
1
Cathodic protection works by maintaining a building’s 0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9 10
ferrous structure at a slightly negative potential with Electrode depth / m
respect to earth. Connection of an earth electrode to such a Figure 10.6 Theoretical curves of electrode resistance(4) structure may increase the current drain from the
protective source and may therefore be unacceptable. A Separation means that each system should be outside the connection may nevertheless be required for protective resistance area of another which in turn means that the and functional reasons and in such cases careful con-low voltage electrode must be sufficiently far away so as sideration must be given to the form of earth electrode. BS
not to be affected by the potential gradient surrounding 7361: Part 1(5) provides detailed guidance.

the high voltage electrode.

Copper should not be connected directly to the ferrous 10.3.5.4
Materials and corrosion
structure. Zinc may be used in some instances or
austenitic stainless steel plus a moderate earth resistance Cathodic protection is normally applied to wholly or to produce an acceptable increase in current drain.

partly buried ferrous structures in order to counteract electrolytic corrosion.

10.3.6
Earthing conductors
It is unfortunate that low resistivity soils tend to have the most aggressive and corrosive effect on electrode
It is recommended that the earthing conductor should be materials. For this reason it is recommended that in low rated to carry the full calculated earth fault current resistivity soils, i.e. in the order of 40 Ω·m, only copper or regardless of any parallel paths and auxiliary electrodes copper clad steel elements are used. Solid copper is that may exist.

particularly suitable for high fault current situations.

The duration of the current should be taken as one second Connections between dissimilar metals can have possible minimum (preferably three seconds) and not as the
galvanic effects. In general connection of galvanised steel reaction time of any protective devices.

to steel in concrete should be avoided, as should
galvanised steel to copper. In contrast, the connection of It will normally be found that solid copper strip provides copper to steel in concrete is normally safe.

the most suitable conductor although on occasion steel strip may be required. Aluminium strip is not recom-Aluminium or copper clad aluminium should not be used mended for installation direct in the ground or directly in contact with soil or in damp conditions and should not onto the electrode.

be used to make the final connection to an earth electrode.

Figure 10.7 shows graphically the current densities
10.3.5.5
Miscellaneous electrodes
sustainable for one second from an initial temperature of 30 °C for copper and steel to give various final tempera-Since the introduction of polymeric oversheaths, metallic tures. Temperatures above 500 °C are not recommended.

cable sheaths no longer provide the fortuitous earth Above 200 °C, the conductor must be visible throughout
10-6
Electricity in buildings
Maximum density / temperatures
Table 10.1 Maximum earth fault currents for
for insulated conductors
various copper sections
160 °C (70/85

°C PVC)
Section
Maximum fault current
220 °C (85°C rubber)


(/ kA) for stated time
250 °C (90°C thermosetting)


1 second
3 seconds
260
20 mm × 3 mm
9.5
5.5
25 mm × 3 mm
11.9
6.9
240
25 mm × 4 mm
15.9
9.2
25 mm × 6 mm
23.9
13.8
220
31 mm × 3 mm
14.8
8.5
31 mm × 6 mm
29.6
17.1
Copper
200
38 mm × 3 mm
18.1
10.5
38 mm × 5 mm
30.2
17.4
38 mm × 6 mm
36.3
20.9
176 180
50 mm × 3 mm
23.9
13.8
50 mm × 4 mm
31.8
18.4
166
50 mm × 6 mm
47.7
27.5
160
143
140
—
the earthing conductor
2
Aluminium
—
outgoing circuit protective conductors
120
—
main equipotential bonding conductors
100
—
bonding conductors to other earth electrode
systems, e.g. high voltage system and lightning
protection system
80
Steel
—
bonding conductors to the building structure.

—
functional (clean earth) protective conductors.

RMS current density / A·mm
60
On larger installations the terminal will usually take the 40
form of a section of flat copper bar, suitably sized to carry full fault current and to be of sufficient length and section to enable connection of all of the required protective 20
conductors without impairment of its current carrying capacity. The terminal or flat conductor should be
separated from the building structure by robust insulating 00
100
200
300
400
500
600
700
supports, both to ensure that any temperature rise will not Maximum temperature / °C
damage the structure and to allow termination of the protective conductors. Ideally all terminated protective Soft
conductors should be labelled.

soldered
Bolted
Jointing
On small installations the terminal may simply comprise a method
proprietary solid copper or brass connector block, suitably Brazed
drilled and tapped.

Welded
Figure 10.7 Protective conductor current limits(2,4) 10.3.8
Circuit protective conductors
The function of circuit protective conductors (CPCs) is to its length and be suitably supported and separated from carry earth fault currents from the seat of the fault back to organic materials. For temperatures above 150 °C certain the source. This must be achieved in complete safety.

building materials may be at risk.

Therefore the CPC must be of sufficient size to carry the fault current without damage to itself and must be of Table 10.1 shows the maximum earth fault currents for sufficiently low impedance in relation to the phase
one second and three seconds duration in various copper conductor feeding the fault so as to limit the rise in sections for a final temperature of 200 °C (from an initial voltage at the conducting surfaces in the vicinity of the temperature of 30 °C) .

fault.

10.3.7
Main earthing terminal
The CPC may consist of cable armouring and/or screens, metal containment systems, separate conductors or a
separate core within a multicore cable.

The main earthing terminal is the point at which are connected:
It should be noted that there are only two situations where
—
the incoming protective conductor
a specifically separate CPC is prescribed by the regulations:
Earthing
10-7
—
through flexible or pliable metal conduit
10.3.9
Touch voltage
—
in a final circuit intended to supply equipment
IEC 60364: Part 1(10) includes a graph of voltage against producing a protective conductor current in excess
time which represents the maximum time that a voltage of 10 mA.

should persist on a conducting surface under fault
conditions to minimise the risk of fatal shock. This graph Conduit and trunking systems can provide adequate
is reproduced here as Figure 10.8.

protection at the final circuit end of an installation although much reliance has to be placed on the mechan-An estimate of touch voltage at any point in an installation ical integrity of the connections.

can be derived from the ratio of earth return path
impedance to total earth loop impedance (see section For those situations where cables of large cross section are 10.4), i.e:
employed, the ratio of conductances between a phase
conductor and the cable armour becomes less favourable U = ( U Z ) / Z
(10.4)
t
o
p
el
as the cable section increases. Calculations are required to determine the earth fault loop impedance and hence the where U is the touch voltage (V), U is the supply phase to t
o
fault current to ascertain the suitability of the armour as a neutral voltage (V), Z is the return path impedance (Ω) p
CPC. Cable armour is unlikely to produce a suitable limit and Z is the earth fault loop impedance (Ω).

el
to the touch voltage at the seat of a fault since, at best, its effective conductance will be less than half that of the In situations where the earth loop impedance of the
phase conductor. The touch voltage therefore would rise supply is reasonably low, a good estimate of the touch to something in excess of 160 V, see section 10.3.9 below.

voltage will be obtained from a consideration of the consumer’s phase conductors and CPCs at each conductive surface. It can be shown from the formulae included in In general therefore it will be necessary or desirable to section 10.4 that, for example, where the conductance of provide separate CPCs at the heavier end of an installation the CPC is half that of the phase conductor the touch to supplement the cable armours.

voltage will approximate to two thirds of the nominal supply phase voltage, i.e. 160 V for a 240 V system.

Separate CPCs should wherever possible be installed adjacent to their associated cable or phase conductor. This From Figure 10.8(10) it can be seen that a 160 V touch will reduce the loop reactance of the earth loop. Table 10.2
voltage corresponds with a duration of only 0.1 seconds (see section 10.4) gives impedance values for various cables sizes. Note that for the smaller cables reactance can 5·0
be ignored and that, for armouring, only the resistance has 4·0
been considered. Calculation methods are considered in 3·0
section 10.4.1.

2·0
By installing the separate CPC as described above, complex calculations of earth loop reactance can be avoided and the loop reactance can be taken as approximating to the line-1·0
neutral loop reactance for single core unarmoured cables, taking the average of the phase conductor and CPC sizes.

BS 7671(4) provides the following formula for the
0·5
calculation of the cross sectional area of a CPC:
0·4
0·3
I 2 t
S =
(10.1)
0·2
k
Time / s
where S is the cross sectional area (mm2), I is the prospective earth fault current (A), t is the duration of the 0·1
fault (s) and k is a factor equivalent to the permitted current density for a given temperature rise for a
particular conductor material.

0·05
0·04
For a duration of one second the equation becomes:
0·03
S = I / k
(10.2)
0·02
For a duration of three seconds the equation becomes: 50
90
160
S = √3 × ( I / k)
(10.3)
0·01
10
20
30 40 50
100
200 300 400 500
Voltage AC RMS / V
The value of k for various materials is given in BS 7671(4) or can be taken from the current density (A/mm2) axis of Figure 10.8 Touch voltage curve(10) (reproduced from IEC 60364 by Figure 10.7.

permission of the International Electrotechnical Commission)
10-8
Electricity in buildings
and the fault interruption should ideally be designed to It should be noted that equipotential bonding does not operate within this time. However, with properly installed ensure that such surfaces will be at the same voltage level equipotential bonding these touch voltages may be
under fault conditions.

significantly reduced and BS 7671(4) states maximum
disconnect times of 5 seconds for most fixed equipment Bonding of conductive parts emanating from outside the and 0.4 seconds for equipment with which people would equipotential zone is particularly important since they normally make contact, e.g. portable tools. It must be could otherwise import unsafe charges from an external stressed that these are maximum times and faster times are fault.

recommended.

Main equipotential bonding refers to direct bonding
The recommended maximum disconnect times in BS 7671
between extraneous conductive parts and the main
of 5 s and 0.4 s relate to touch voltages of 50 V and 90 V
earthing terminal. Incoming pipework services, for
respectively. These disconnect times are based on the example, must be bonded at the earliest point of the work of International Electrotechnical Commission (IEC) consumer’s distribution system preferably before any Technical Committee TC64 (Working Group WG9). This
branching has taken place. Sections of incoming metalwork defined a third parameter, ‘prospective touch
work not belonging to the customer’s installation and/or voltage’ ( U′ ). Experience and calculations showed that U′
c
c
isolated from it by insulating gaskets etc., should be varied between 0.3 U and 0.75 U depending on the o
o
insulated.

closeness of the fault to the source and on the ratio of phase and CPC cross-sectional areas. Applying mean values Supplementary equipotential bonding can be applied as to both factors (i.e. 0.8 for proximity, and equal phase and considered necessary between:
protective conductors) equates to a disconnect time of 0.4 s with a touch voltage of 92 V.

—
exposed conductive part to exposed conductive


part

—
exposed conductive part to extraneous conductive
10.3.10
Equipotential bonding


part

The purpose of equipotential bonding is to ensure that
—
extraneous conductive part to extraneous
under fault conditions both within and without an
conductive part.

installation the potential difference between simul-
taneously accessible conductive parts, both exposed and An illustration of the requirements of equipotential extraneous, is limited to a safe level.

bonding is given in Figure 10.9.

D
E
A
F
B
PE
G
PEN
H
C
Main equipotential bond for TN-S system: C = G/2 (min. 6, max. 25) Main equipotential bond C for TN-C system: for H ≤ 35, C = 10

for H > 35 or = 50, C = 16

for H > 50 or = 95; C = 25

for H > 95 or = 150; C = 35

for H > 150; C = 50
Supplementary bond D = B (min. 4 if unprotected)
Supplementary bond E = A/2 (min. 4 if unprotected)
Figure 10.9 Equipotential
Supplementary bond F = A/2 (min. 4 if unprotected)
bonding(4)
Earthing
10-9
As mentioned previously the effect of equipotential
Consumer's phase
bonding is to reduce the touch voltage between simulta-conductors
neously accessible parts since instead of the voltage being
∑ R c
governed by the return path impedance back to the energy U
Intake
o
I f
Fault
source it becomes instead effectively the volt drop between the conductive surface at the fault and the main earth Z s
terminal, see section 10.4. The impedance of this circuit is clearly within the control of the designer.

∑ R p
Main
Consumer's protective
10.4
Calculation methods
earthing
conductors
terminal
Figure 10.10 Earth fault current calculations(5); circuits up to 100 A 10.4.1
Fault current
where Z is the earth loop impedance at seat of fault (Ω), Earth fault current is a function of the system nominal el
Z is the supply earth loop impedance (Ω), Σ R is the phase voltage and the earth loop impedance at the point in s
c
combined resistance of the consumer’s phase conductors the network under consideration, i.e:
(Ω) and Σ R is the combined resistance of the consumer’s p
protective conductors (Ω).

I = U / Z
(10.5)
f
o
el
The supply earth loop impedance is as follows:
where I is the earth fault current (A), U is the system f
o
nominal phase voltage (V) and Z
is the earth loop
—
TN-C supplies: approx. 0.35 Ω
el
impedance (Ω).

—
TN-S supplies: approx. 0.8 Ω
The calculations therefore become a matter of assessing
—
or as advised by supply company.

the values for Z throughout the installation.

el
The earth fault current is then obtained from equation Conductor impedance data for copper conductors and
10.5.

steel wire armouring are given in Table 10.2. It should be noted that impedance values are in mΩ/m and, if used Note: the loop reactance Σ ( X + X ) may be ignored; the c
p
calculation of Z needs only to be arithmetical.

directly, will produce fault currents in kiloampères (kA).

el
If a separate CPC is used together with cable armouring, 10.4.1.1
LV systems with intake up to 100 A
the combined resistance is:
See Figure 10.10.

R
R
CPC
a
R = ————
(10.7)
p
Z = Z + Σ R + Σ R
(10.6)
R
+ R
el
s
c
p
CPC
a
Table 10.2 Conductor data
Cross-sectional
R or R
( X + X )
R
R
R
c
p
c
p
a2
a3
a4
area / mm2
/ (mΩ·m–1)
/ (mΩ·m–1)
/ (mΩ·m–1)
/ (mΩ·m–1)
/ (mΩ·m–1)
1.5
15.6
—
—
—
—
2.5
9.2
—
11.2
10.3
9.6
4
5.8
—
10.0 9.2 8.4
6
3.9
—
9.0 8.1 5.2
10
2.3
—
7.7 5.0 4.5
16
1.4
—
4.2 4.0 3.5
25
0.92 0.31 4.1 2.8 2.5
35
0.66 0.29 2.8 2.5 2.2
50
0.50 0.29 2.5 2.2 2.0
70 0.34
0.28
2.2
2.0
1.3
95
0.25
0.27
1.5
1.4
1.2
120
0.20
0.26
1.4
1.2
0.84
150
0.16
0.26
1.3
0.86
0.75
185
0.13
0.26
0.90
0.78
0.67
240
0.10
0.26
0.80
0.70
0.59
300
0.08
0.25
0.74
0.64
0.54
400
0.07
0.25
—
0.53
—
Note: R or R = conductor resistance for phase or CPC; ( X + X ) = approximate loop reactance c
p
c
p
for equal size phase conductor and CPC; R , R
etc. = armour resistance for a 2-core, 3-core etc.

a2
a3
cable adjusted to allow for magnetic effect
( X + X ) = approximate armour/conductor loop reactance (= 0.3 mΩ·m–1) c
a
10-10
Electricity in buildings
Supply phase
Consumer's phase
Supply phase
Consumer's phase
conductors
conductors
conductors
conductors
∑ Z
∑
co
Z c
∑ Z
∑
co
Z c
U o
Intake
I
Fault
Intake I
f
U o
f
Fault
Z
Z el
o
Z o
Supply
U
Z
Supply
t
Main
s
Main
transformer
earthing
transformer
earthing
terminal
terminal
∑ Z
∑
∑
∑
po
Z p
Z po
Z p
Supply PEN or
Consumer's
Supply PEN or
PE conductor
protective
PE conductor
conductors
Consumer's
Equipotential
Figure 10.11 Earth fault current calculations(5); circuits above 100 A protective
bonding
Extraneous
conductors
conductor
conductive part
10.4.1.2
LV systems with above 100 A
Figure 10.12 Touch voltage calculation(5)
See Figure 10.11. The earth loop impedance is given by: 10.4.2.1
Circuits without equipotential bonding
Z = Z + Σ Z + Σ Z
(10.8)
el
s
c
p
See Figure 10.12. The touch voltage is given by:
where Z is the earth loop impedance at seat of fault (Ω), el
Z is the supply earth loop impedance (Ω), Σ Z is the U = I × Σ ( Z + Z )
(10.12)
t
f
p
po
s
c
combined impedance of the consumer’s phase conductors (Ω) and Σ Z is the combined impedance of the con-where U is the touch voltage (V) and Z is the impedance t
p
p
sumer’s protective conductors (Ω).

of the circuit protective conductors (Ω) and Z
is the
po
impedance of the supply PEN or PE conductor (Ω).

The supply earth loop impedance is given by:
Hence, substituting for I from equation 10.5: f
Z = Z + Σ Z + Σ Z
(10.9)
s
o
co
po
Σ ( Z + Z )
p
po
i.e:
U = U —————–
(10.13)
t
o
Z
—
el
TN-C supplies up to 200 A: approx. 0.35 Ω
—
TN-C supplies up to 300 A: approx. 0.2 Ω
10.4.2.2
Circuits with equipotential bonding
—
TN-C supplies above 300 A: approx. 0.15 Ω
See Figure 10.12. For circuits with equipotential bonding,
—
or as advised by supply company.

equation 10.13 reduces to:
For each section of the consumer’s network:
Σ Z p
Z + Z = ( R + R ) + j ( X + X ) (10.10) U = U ——
(10.14)
c
p
c
p
c
p
t
o
Z el
where R is the phase conductor resistance (Ω), R is the c
p
circuit protective conductor resistance (Ω) and ( X + X ) c
p
10.4.2.3
Approximate method
is the approximate loop reactance (Ω).

See Figure 10.13. For systems where the supply point Assuming Z to be predominantly reactive:
s
earth loop impedance is relatively low, Z is given by: el
2
2
Z
=
R
( + R
Z
X
X
(10.11)
) + +
[ ( + )]
el
c
p
s
c
p
Z ≈ Σ Z + Σ Z
(10.15)
el
c
p
Thus, from equation 10.5:
The earth fault current is then obtained from equation 10.5.

U o
I ≈ —————
(10.16)
f
10.4.2
Touch voltage
Σ Z + Σ Z
c
p
Calculation methods are given below for systems with and Touch voltage is given by:
without equipotential bonding. For systems where the supply point earth loop impedance is relatively low an U ≈ U – I (Σ Z )
(10.17)
t
o
f
c
appropriate calculation method is given in section
10.4.2.3.

Hence:

Σ Z

U ≈ U
c
1 −
t
o
(10.18)
Conductor data should be taken from Table 10.2.


Σ Z

+ Σ Z 
Reference should then be made to the touch voltage/time c
p
curve in Figure 10.8 to obtain suitable operating times for protective devices.

i.e:
Earthing
10-11
Consumer's phase
The clean earth may be derived from the neutral point of conductors
an isolating transformer but this point must be solidly
∑ Z c
connected to the main building earth.

U o
Intake
I
Fault
f
It must be a rule that the protective features of the Z s
U t
earthing system always outweigh any functional requirements.

∑ Z p
10.5.3
Data processing installations
Consumer's protective
Main
conductors
earthing
Data processing and telecommunication installations are terminal
not exempt from the normal safety and protective require-Equipotential
bonding
Extraneous
ments of earthing systems described above, and BS 7671(4) conductor
conductive part
is quite clear in its statement that each exposed conductive Figure 10.13 Approximate touch voltage calculation part of a data processing installation must be connected to the main earthing terminal.

Data processing equipment often gives rise to relatively Σ
large protective conductor currents. Section 607 of BS
Z p
U ≈ U —————
(10.19)
7671 details the earthing requirements for equipment and t
o Σ Z + Σ Z
systems having such currents in excess of 3.5 mA and c
p
10 mA. The requirements include the use of connectors to If, for example, Σ Z = 2 Σ Z , then: BS EN 60309-2(12) (formerly BS 4343), the size of the c
p
protective conductor and the provision of a second
U ≈ 2/ U
(10.20)
protective conductor terminated separately from the first t
3
o
CPC.

CPCs must be routed with their associated phase con-
10.5
Special requirements
ductors, preferably within a multicore laid-up cable or alternatively strapped to the power cable over its whole length. This is to minimise any field which would be set 10.5.1
Functional earthing
up within the loop area of a separated power conductor and the CPC. In any case it is bad practice to separate the As its name implies, functional earthing is provided to CPC from its power conductor as the increased inductance enable equipment to operate properly. Strictly speaking, it introduces an unnecessary additional impedance to the does not provide protection either to the equipment or to earth fault loop.

people using it.

It has been shown that the supporting structure for a Examples of functional earthing are:
raised floor can serve quite effectively as a high frequency
—
provision of a zero voltage reference point
signal reference grid. Bolted-down metal stringers making good contact with steel support pedestals provide the best
—
electromagnetic screening
system. Stringerless systems are also suitable provided
—
signalling path for communications equipment.

that they incorporate good contact springs between the floor plates and the pedestals and conducting coverings. It The functional earth conductor is permitted to be
is recommended that an earthing grid be provided with connected to the main earthing terminal either directly or cable connections to at least one pedestal in every nine.

indirectly. It should be installed in accordance with The grid should be connected with main equipotential BS 6701: Part 1(11) where used for telecommunication bonding conductors to the main earthing terminal and equipment. Where used for other purposes it may again be supplementary equipotential bonding conductors should connected to the main earthing terminal and suitably be connected between the floor grid and any exposed
labelled.

conductive part.

10.5.2
Clean earth
10.5.4
Lightning protection
The so-called ‘clean earth’ often insisted upon by data processor users should not be confused with functional BS 6651: Code of practice for protection of structures against earthing. It is essential that the clean earth conductor does lightning(3) is a comprehensive document and is used not become isolated from the normal installation earth.

extensively in the design of protection schemes. No
attempt will be made to summarise this document here.

It is common practice to provide five-core armoured
cables for data processing equipment. In this case the fifth The lightning protection system may comprise down
core is the clean earth and the armour is the CPC. The two conductors terminating in earth electrodes or may employ conductors should be connected together at every
the building structural steelwork, with or without
termination point, e.g. the power distribution unit, the additional electrodes, but the combined earth termination local link box and the processing equipment.

network must not exceed 10 Ω resistance.

10-12
Electricity in buildings
It is now a requirement of BS 6651(3), BS 7430(2) and BS
Supply from PES (REC)
7671(4) that the lightning protection network be
L1 L2 L3 N
E
adequately bonded to the electrical system. This is a fairly Generator
recent change of policy as in former times the lightning protection system and the electrical earth system were carefully segregated.

BS 7671 limits the size of the bonding conductor to a size not exceeding that of the earthing conductor.

10.5.5
Remote installations
Earthing
Main earthing
switch
terminal
On many sites electrical power supplies are taken to Neutral
buildings remote from the main intake. It is considered switch
that the best practice is to provide a substantial CPC with the power cable to maintain a low impedance earth fault loop. An alternative is to regard the remote building as a separate consumer and provide a relatively high
Consumer's
earth
impedance
(a)
L1 L2 L3 N
E
CPC, i.e. the cable armouring. This may not
electrode
permit sufficient fault current to flow and in this event a separate earth electrode would be required. It should be noted however that the neutral conductor must remain Supply from PES (REC)
isolated from the protective conductor and the remote L1 L2 L3 N
E
earth electrode.

Generator
10.5.6
Generator plant
Generator plant may be provided within an installation to operate in parallel with the public supply or in place of it in the event of a supply interruption, for example. The electricity supplier will usually agree to short periods (i.e.

Main earthing
less than one minute) of parallel operation, even for terminal
standby plant.

Regardless of the form of electricity supply, if generators are to be incorporated an independent earth electrode is required. The machine framework and all exposed and
extraneous conductive parts of the generating plant must Consumer's
be effectively connected to the main earthing terminal.

earth electrode
(b)
L1 L2 L3 N E
Neutral earthing requirements will vary depending on the Figure 10.14 Generator earthing, parallel (embedded) operation; (a) nature of the public electricity supplier’s (
non-PME supply, (b) PME supply
PES) (regional
electricity company (REC)) supply, i.e. whether or not it is a
HV/LV distribution transformer it must be treated as a non-TN-C (PME) system (see 10.3.3) and on the proposed
method of operation.

PME system.

10.5.6.1
Parallel (embedded) operation,
10.5.6.3
Standby (island) operation
non-PME supply
The star point should be permanently connected to the main earthing terminal for both supply systems. However For this mode of operation the neutral point of the
it should be noted that a neutral switch is required for a machine windings should not be earthed except in
non-
situations where the generating plant operates independ-PME supply, see Figure 10.15. It is important to note that where the
ently of the public supply. A changeover system is
LV supply is derived from a consumer’s
substation the neutral switch is not needed.

required so that the neutral point of the generator(s) is isolated while in parallel operation but connected to earth when operating alone, see Figure 10.14(a).

10.5.6.4
Multiple machines
Where it is anticipated that circulating currents, particu-10.5.6.2
Parallel (embedded) operation,
larly third harmonic currents, could cause problems by PME supply
virtue of their magnitude the following practices are available:
With a PME supply the generator star point may be
connected permanently to the supply company’s PEN
—
provision of a neutral earthing transformer
conductor at the main earthing terminal, see Figure
enabling the neutral of the installation to be
10.14(b). However if the generator is to be operated in permanently earthed and the generator neutral
parallel with a mains supply derived from the consumer’s points isolated
Earthing
10-13
—
star point switching to isolate all but one neutral
—
1.5 to 2 times rated generator current without field point
forcing
—
a tuned reactor in each generator neutral earth
—
2.5 to 3 times rated generator current with
connection to attenuate higher frequency currents.

automatic voltage regulation (AVR) action.

Modern low voltage generators have harmonic voltage
For high voltage machines the value of earthing resistance levels sufficiently low not to require the above methods or reactance must be chosen to produce earth fault
and it is quite common practice to provide permanent currents consistent with the protection system. The range neutral earth connections for each machine.

would normally be 25% to 100% of rated current.

10.5.6.5
High voltage generators
10.6
Testing
Impedance earthing is often applied to HV generators because the very high line-to-earth faults could otherwise damage the machine. Circulating currents are also more 10.6.1
Initial testing
likely to prove harmful and an isolation method as
described above will almost certainly be required.

Initial testing should include the following quantitative measurements:
10.5.6.6
Earth fault currents
—
earth electrode resistance
Steady state earth fault currents for low voltage machines
—
earthing conductor resistance
are generally in the order of:
—
earth loop impedance
Supply from PES (REC)
—
earth fault protection settings.

L1 L2 L3 N
E
Generator
Accuracy expectations for each electrode resistance using the method shown in Figure 10.16 do not exceed 5%. This Standby
is perfectly acceptable as the system will vary seasonally.

I
Normal
xy
Resistance of
Test
A
electrode X is:
current
Changeover
V
source
xz
V
R xy = Ω
switch
I xy
V xz
Main earthing
terminal
X
Z
Y
Electrode
Auxiliary
Auxiliary
Consumer's
under
electrode
electrode
(a)
earth
L1 L2 L3 N E
test
no. 2
no. 1
electrode
a
a
30 to 50 metres
Supply from PES (REC)
L1 L2 L3 PEN
(a)
Generator
I wz
A
Standby
Test
V
current
source
V xy
Normal
) a
W
X
Y
Z
Changeover
switch
Main earthing
terminal
= 1 m or (0.05 d
Test spike
Test spike
Test spike
Test spike
no. 1
no. 2
no. 3
no. 4
a
a
a
V xy
R
ρ = (2
xy = Ω
π a R xy) Ω.m
Consumer's
I wz
(b)
earth
L1 L2 L3 N E
electrode
(b)
Figure 10.15 Generator earthing, standby (island) operation; (a) non-Figure 10.16 Resistivity testing; (a) electrode resistivity testing, (b) soil PME supply, (b) PME supply
resistivity testing
10-14
Electricity in buildings
Since it is not permitted to disconnect the electrodes once References
connected, it should be appreciated that the initial test will be the most thorough. Periodic testing is only possible 1
The Electricity at Work Regulations 1989 Stautory Instruments with multiple electrodes by disconnecting individuals for 1989 No. 635 (London: Her Majestry’s Staionery Office) (1989) testing. Complex calculations are then required to assess 2
BS 7430: 1998: Code of practice for earthing (London: British the system resistance.

Standards Institution) (1998)
3
BS 6651: 1999: Code of practice for protection of structures against The earth conductor resistance may be measured by either lightning (London: British Standards Institution) (1999) a direct reading DC ohmmeter or an AC isolated test set conforming to BS EN 60742 (BS 3535)(13). The AC tester 4
BS 7671: 2001: Requirements for electrical installations. IEE
can produce high test currents up to about 25 A. The Wiring Regulations. Sixteenth Edition
(London: British
resistance of test leads and connections should obviously Standards Institution) (2001)
be kept as low as possible.

5
BS 7361: Part 1: 1991: Cathodic protection. Code of practice for land and marine applications (London: British Standards Proprietary earth loop impedance testers are usually of the Institution) (1991)
AC mains type and work by drawing a current from the 6
Distribution Code of the Public Electricity Suppliers of England and phase conductor and injecting this at low voltage back to Wales (London: Office of Gas and Electricity Markets) (1990) the source via the earth return path.

7
Engineering recommendations for the connection of embedded Indicative testers, bells, flashers etc. must not be used as generating plant to the RECs’ distribution systems Engineering these provide no quantitative results.

Recommendation G.59/1 (London: Electricity Association) (1995)
8
Notes for guidance for the protection of embedded generating plant up 10.6.2
Periodic testing
to 5 MW for operation in parallel with PES distribution networks Engineering Technical Report ETR113 (London: Electricty As mentioned above, periodic testing of earth electrode Association) (1995)
resistance is not very practicable. It is recommended that 9
Protection Against Overcurrent Guidance Note 6 to IEE Wiring careful scrutiny only is carried out on this element. The Regulations (London: Institution of Electrical Engineers) same comments could apply equally to the earthing
(1999) ISBN: 0852969597
conductor.

10
IEC 60364: Electrical installations of buildings: Part 1: 2001: Fundamental principles, assessment of general characteristics, Quantitative earth loop impedance tests and secondary definitions (Geneva: International Electrotechnical Commission) injection testing of protection settings should be carried (2001)
out at intervals not exceeding five years.

11
BS 6701: 1994: Code of practice for installation of apparatus Testing of residual current devices (
intended for connection to certain telecommunication systems RCDs) with trip
(London: British Standards Institution) (1994)
settings of 100 mA or less should be tested annually with a proprietary tester giving current and time readout. The 12
BS EN 60309-2: 1998: (IEC 60309-2: 1997): Plugs, socket-outlets test button on RCDs is not a reliable indicator of correct and couplers for industrial purposes. Dimensional interchangeability operation within declared limits.

requirements for pin and contact-tube accessories (London: British Standards Institution) (1998)
Routine visual inspections should be carried out at least 13
BS EN 60742:1996: (BS 3535-1:1996): Isolating transformers and annually on all aspects of the earthing installation safety isolating transformers. Requirements (London: British including main and supplementary equipotential bonding.

Standards Institution) (1996)
11-1
11
Electromagnetic compatibility
11.1


Introduction

to the client’s requirements, the building services engineer must consider the EM environment required for the
The world is bathed in electromagnetic waves. The
successful operation of the building’s management
frequency spectrum ranges from very high frequency, e.g.

systems, information networks and process/plant control light, infrared, radio and
equipment. The latter may be more difficult to achieve TV waves, to very low frequency,
e.g. 50 Hz power and below, plus direct current (
since such equipment will be either located with, or at DC).

Much electrical equipment relies on receiving and trans-least connected to, the heavy plant of the building
mitting electromagnetic radiation. The sensitivity of such services.

equipment to extraneous radiation and the amount of
ambient radiation must be compatible. Furthermore, there are statutory requirements to avoid causing interference to 11.2
EMC Directive and UK
radio and TV systems.

legal obligations
In every aspect of modern living, electronics systems feature to some degree or other. Since, by definition, In order to establish free trade in electrical goods which electronics must respond to electromagnetic energy, it is are sensitive to electromagnetic radiation, the EU has important to minimise the response to extraneous signals issued Directives to control the sensitivity and the and to control or eliminate the coupling of electro-emissions of electromagnetic radiation by equipment on magnetic interference to the electronic circuits and the market, and systems which are installed. The
components. This is achieved through ensuring
Directive(1) requires member states to enforce the require-
‘electromagnetic compatibility’ (EMC), which is the ability ments of the Directive. The UK legislation to implement of an electronic component, unit or system to co-exist the Directive is the Electromagnetic Compatibility
with its electromagnetic (EM) environment.

Regulations 1992(2).

As electronics finds wider and wider usage in a diversity The EU directive has been explained in European
of applications, the importance of ensuring that EMC is Commission Guidelines(3).

achieved will increase. Similarly, there will be an increase in the requirement to understand and predict all
This section of the Guide is intended to assist electrical electromagnetic environmental effects. Today, with the engineers to provide electrical building services installa-proliferation of digital and communications equipment tions that comply with the requirements of this
constantly finding new applications, the control of both legislation.

external and internal electromagnetic interference (EMI) must be considered in any new building project. This is Equipment which is supplied to the building should be particularly true when considering the information
sufficiently insensitive to operate successfully in the technology of the ‘electronic office’, building management building environment; it should not emit excessive
systems (BMS) and fire command systems.

radiation. Broadly this means it should be manufactured to levels given in standards that implement the require-It is important that all these systems operate correctly and ments of the Directive. Problems from electromagnetic consistently if the quality of life is not to be affected. If a interference (EMI) will be minimised by procurement of TV remote control suffered from interference it would be a equipment that complies with relevant standards, is
nuisance to a single individual. However, if the central supplied with a relevant EMC declaration of conformity record database of a large tax office or bank were
(DOC), and is installed and maintained using good EMC
corrupted it would affect a large sector of the population practices.

and would require considerable effort and cost to correct.

Similarly, if certain types of process control were
The installation must be designed and installed so that it corrupted by interference a safety hazard could occur does not generate electromagnetic radiation that is likely leading perhaps to a large-scale industrial accident.

to cause interference to other systems that have the correct immunity for the intended environment.

In the design and construction of a building or complex there are two distinct EMC problems for the architect and the building services engineers to consider. On the one 11.2.1
The EMC Directive
hand, a benign EM environment must be created by the building for the prospective client’s personnel and
The Directive(1) has proven to be very contentious for equipment. This user environment must be provided over many reasons, caused partly and inherently by the fact it is the predicted life of the building and may, therefore, have a new-approach Directive. As such, the EMC Directive to account for future increases in the external EM pollution lays down essential protection requirements in broad levels anticipated at the site. On the other hand, additional terms, and leaves the task of defining specific technical
11-2
Electricity in buildings
requirements to the European standards-making bodies responsibilities may include, for example,
such as CENELEC and ETSI.

specifying compliant equipment, defining a
compliant installation, and certifying compliance.

11.2.1.1
Aim of the EMC Directive
—
Responsibilities of manufacturers and installers
for the provision of management rules for the
The EMC Directive has two inter-related aims as follows: installation and continuing operation of systems in
—
Removal of barriers to trade between companies
a building, with respect to containing electro-
operating within the European Economic Area
magnetic emissions and ensuring that systems do
(EEA). This can only be achieved through the
not become more susceptible over time.

harmonisation of local legislation, approval
procedures, performance standards and certifica-
This code gives guidance to building services engineers to tion requirements.

assist them in designing for electromagnetic compatibility.

Basically, as a fixed installation, a building does not need
—
Achievement of an electromagnetic environment
to be CE-marked but it should not incorporate equipment that is controlled through the application of
which emits too much radiation or which is unduly
essential protection requirements, allowing
sensitive.

apparatus placed within that environment to
operate as intended.

An EMC management code of practice should give
guidance on the application of the EMC Directive with The essential protection requirements (Article 4) of the respect to the installation and use of products and systems.

Directive are as follows:
A code of practice helps to ensure that the essential The apparatus shall be so constructed that:
protection requirements of the EMC Directive are met or, at least, that due diligence has been adequately demon-
(a)
The electromagnetic disturbance it generates does not exceed a level allowing radio and telecommunications strated when the systems in a building commence
equipment and other apparatus to operate as intended; operation, i.e. the building is occupied.

(b) The apparatus has an adequate level of intrinsic immunity to electromagnetic disturbance to enable it to operate as 11.2.2
The Electromagnetic
intended.

Compatibility Regulations
Both objectives of the Directive have clear benefits to manufacturers wishing to market and trade within the The Electromagnetic Compatibility (EMC) Regulations(2) EEA.

enact the requirements of the EMC Directive for the UK.

Where a Directive, which has regulatory force, is
In order to be placed onto the European market, the
introduced by the Commission, each European Member
apparatus must comply with harmonised standards,
State must introduce its own legal regulations to
reference to which has been published in the Official implement the Directive. The regulation in each Member Journal of the European Communities. In addition, the State should be identical. This may not always be the case conformity of the apparatus with this Directive must be but compliance with the UK regulations allows a UK
certified by an EC declaration of conformity (DOC) issued manufacturer to place a product onto the market of other by the manufacturer or its authorised representative Member States. Complaints of non-compliance by another established within the Community. The apparatus shall Member State should be addressed to the UK authorities, display the EC conformity mark, consisting of the letters at the Department of Trade and Industry (DTI).

‘CE’.

In principle, the UK regulations are divided into four 11.2.1.2
EC guidelines on the EMC Directive
broad categories:
The need for interpretation of the Directive has been
—
application of the regulations to relevant
addressed by the European Commission through the
apparatus, and exclusions
publication of amplified guidelines, the most recent
—
general requirements of supply and taking into
version of which were published in July 1997(3). These service of apparatus
guidelines offer help on a range of issues including:
—
routes to compliance via the use of standards, and
—
Exclusions from the Directive, e.g. equipment that
the use of the technical construction file and EC-
is covered by other Directives such as medical
type examination route
equipment.

—
enforcement officers and procedures, including
—
Definitions of and applications of the EMC
procedures and penalties when non-conforming
Directive to components, finished products,
apparatus is discovered.

systems and installations within the EMC
Directive: building services engineers need to
Important terms within the regulations are defined in the know the difference between equipment that is
following sections.

stand alone, e.g. an air conditioner operating in a
single room, and multiple equipment systems and
how these should be addressed when they are built
11.2.2.1
Relevant apparatus
into an installation.

The Directive applies to:
—
Responsibilities of manufacturers, importers,
suppliers, system assemblers and installers: these
—
electrical equipment
Electromagnetic compatibility
11-3
—
systems made up from combinations of electrical
11.2.2.3
Supply and taking into service
equipment.

From the UK Regulations(2), regulations 28 and 30 require Relevant apparatus is electrical apparatus for which the that no person shall supply relevant apparatus unless it: majority of the regulations apply, and is defined as:
—
conforms with the protection requirements
—
a product with an intrinsic function intended for
—
meets the conformity assessment requirements
the end user; and
—
has the CE marking properly applied
—
is supplied or intended for supply or taken into
service or intended to be taken into service, as a
—
has an EC declaration of conformity certificate.

single commercial unit, which is:
Regulation 29 requires that no person shall take into ( a)
an electrical appliance
service relevant apparatus unless it conforms with the (
protection requirements.

b)
an electronic appliance
( c)
a system.

For example, apparatus covered by the EMC Directive is taken into service when it is first used, i.e. by the end user It is important to note that relevant apparatus includes that operates the apparatus, e.g. escalators.

equipment and systems that are purchased in a number of ways. Examples are as follows:
‘Taking into service’ does not include the area of
energising, testing and commissioning of the apparatus by
—
‘off the shelf ’ equipment, e.g. a TV set
the manufacturer before the handover of the apparatus to
—
‘customised’ equipment, e.g. a pumping set
the end user.

—
‘built to order’ equipment, e.g. a control panel.

The apparatus manufacturer will be in a position of
overall control in ensuring that the essential protection The designer and manufacturer of the relevant apparatus requirements are satisfied and assumes legal responsibility is the person responsible for complying with the EMC
for compliance. Data must also be provided for the end Directive. The Directive requires that a single person user to ensure that these requirements are satisfied within an organisation be authorised to bind the company throughout the operational life of the apparatus.

in meeting the requirements of the Directive.

11.2.2.4
Presumption of conformity
11.2.2.2
Installation
Regulation 32 states that relevant apparatus supplied with The Directive also applies to installations.

the correct EMC certification and conforming to the
appropriate standards or technical construction file An installation, within the terms of the EMC Directive, declaration can be presumed to conform to the protection can be either fixed or movable. A fixed installation is requirements.

defined as(3):
This presumption remains valid if the relevant apparatus a combination of several equipment, systems, finished products supplied is installed, maintained and used for the
and/or components (hereinafter called parts), assembled and/or purposes for which it was intended.

erected by an assembler/installer at a given place to operate together in an expected environment to perform a specific task, This presumption means that the operator or owner of the but not intended to be placed on the market as a single functional or commercial unit.

building or installation is not required to carry out (or have carried out) any further tests if supplied components This type of installation must comply with the essential and equipment are operated within the specified environ-requirements of the EMC Directive but, as it cannot enjoy ment.

free movement within the EU market, there is no need for CE marking or an EC declaration of conformity (DOC).

11.2.2.5
CE mark
Yet, the person responsible for the design, engineering and construction of the installation becomes the manufacturer All apparatus covered by the Directive in accordance with in the sense of the Directive. That person then assumes the protection requirements and accompanied by
the responsibility for the installation’s compliance with all certification documents such as a declaration of
applicable provisions of the Directive.

conformity (DOC) must bear the CE mark. Those who
specify equipment for installation in buildings must A movable installation must comply with all provisions of ensure that CE-marked equipment is satisfactory for use the Directive, like a system as described above. However, within that building, e.g. the requirements for an air some movable installations are intended to replace or conditioning unit’s EMC specification will vary depending extend a fixed installation and should be treated as fixed on whether it is to be used in a domestic or a heavy installations, if their connection to an existing fixed industrial environment
installation is carefully planned and set up.

11.2.2.6
User manual
A moveable installation such as a TV outside broadcast vehicle or a prefabricated building should be marked so All equipment, systems or installation should be provided that it can travel freely throughout Europe.

with a user manual for operation and maintenance. This
11-4
Electricity in buildings
manual should include essential information on EMC, so
—
in the case of a public installation (e.g. a shopping that the user is aware of the intended use and limitations mall or a railway station), particular data for care of the apparatus, and how EMC should be dealt with in to be taken to prevent any safety risk
order to ensure the good operation of the apparatus during
—
knowledge of who is responsible for the main-
its whole life-cycle.

tenance of the installation.

The instructions for use must contain all the information The same questions arise for modifications to the
required in order to use the apparatus in accordance with installation.

the intended purpose and in the defined electromagnetic environment. These instructions must give the following In other words, the operator needs very comprehensive information:
instructions for the installation, with very clear explana-tions concerning the EMC environment and management,
—
intended conditions of use
see section 11.2.2.6.

—
instructions on:
( a)
installation
( b)
assembly
11.4
EMC requirements as part
( c)
adjustment
of the project brief
( d)
taking into service
This section refers to the definition of the electromagnetic ( e)
use
environment that should be considered for the project brief specification, together with the various standards ( f)
maintenance
which need to be considered, if relevant to the project.

( g)
where necessary, warnings about
limitations on use.

11.4.1
Evaluation of the electro-
magnetic environment
11.3
Responsibilities for EMC
The project brief defines specifications that should be compliance
implemented by the contractor in order to provide a safe and reliable installation. Among the specifications, some are related to the EMC aspect of an installation. The The building services engineer and the owner/operator of electromagnetic environment is an important aspect to a building each have responsibility, under the Directive to consider in the design of a new installation. It will indeed ensure that compliance with the directive is met and put constraints on:
maintained. These responsibilities are outlined below.

—
the equipment to purchase, which will need to
comply to different sets of specifications
11.3.1
Responsibilities of the building
—
the equipment layout
services engineer
—
the necessary level of protection for each item of
equipment or system.

The person(s) responsible for the design, engineering and construction (assembly and erection) become(s) the
Some standards define electromagnetic environments.

‘manufacturer’ for the purposes of the EMC Directive, and These are outlined in the following sections.

assume(s) the responsibility for the installation’s compliance with all applicable provisions of the Directive, when 11.4.1.1
BS EN 61000-6-1 and BS EN 61000-6-3
taken into service. The whole method of installation has to be in accordance with good engineering practice within BS EN 61000-6-1(4) and BS EN 61000-6-3(5) define the the context of installation, as well as installation rules domestic, commercial and light industry environment.

(local, regional, national) that will ensure the compliance Clause 5 of BS EN 61000-6-3 reads:
of the whole installation with the essential requirements of the EMC Directive.

The environments encompassed …. are both indoor and
outdoor. The following list, although not comprehensive, gives an indication of locations which are included:
11.3.2
Responsibilities of the
—
Residential properties, e.g. houses, apartments, etc; installation operator
—
Commercial premises e.g.

—
Retail outlets, e.g. shops, supermarkets, etc;
The operator is the person who uses the installation,
—
Business premises, e.g. offices, banks, etc;
possibly daily. The operator can reasonably expect to be provided with the maximum of information about the
—
Areas of public entertainment, e.g. cinemas, public bars, dance halls, etc;
installation. The information needed may include:
—
Outdoor locations, e.g. petrol stations, car parks,
—
knowledge of the exact purpose of each part of the
amusement and sports centres, etc;
installation
—
Light-industrial locations, e.g. workshops, laboratories,
—
knowledge of the EMC environment
service centres, etc.

Electromagnetic compatibility
11-5
Locations which are characterised by being supplied directly at The correct starting point is to use IEC 61000-2-5, which low voltage from the public mains are considered to be provides an overall description of all types of installations residential, commercial or light industrial.

and then likely levels encountered for many types of disturbances. This then defines the type of equipment to Radiated emission limits are given at a measurement
be purchased.

distance of 10 metres.

11.4.1.2
BS EN 61000-6-2 and BS EN 61000-6-4
11.4.2
EMC standards for specific
equipment and cables
BS EN 61000-6-2(6) and 61000-6-4(7) define the industrial environment. Clause 5 of BS EN 61000-6-4 reads:
Many standards have been issued that cover equipment and cables. Some of these are given below, a comprehen-Industrial locations are characterised by the existence of one or sive list can be viewed on the European Commission’s more of the following conditions:
website*.

—
Industrial, scientific and medical apparatus (ISM) are present;
11.4.2.1
Equipment
—
Heavy inductive or capacitive loads are frequently
switched;
Buildings contain different kinds of equipment, all of
—
Currents and associated magnetic fields are high.

which must comply with relevant EMC standards.

Examples(4–7,9–17) of these are presented in Table 11.1.

—
These are the major contributors to the industrial
Current standards can be viewed on the EC website†.

electromagnetic environment and as such distinguish the industrial from the other environments.

11.4.2.2
Cables
The scope of this standard adds:
It is also possible to find low voltage and high voltage Apparatus covered by this standard is not intended for connection to a public mains network but is intended to be cables run together with telecommunications and IT
connected to a power network supplied from a high- or cables. Therefore, it is necessary to use the relevant medium-voltage transformer dedicated for the supply of an standards during the various stages of a new building installation feeding manufacturing or similar plant. This construction. These are mainly from the BS EN 50174(18) standard applies to apparatus intended to operate in industrial locations or in proximity of industrial power installations.

* http://europa.eu.int/comm/enterprise/newapproach/standardization/
harmstds/reflist.html
11.4.1.3
IEC 61000-2-5
† http://europa.eu.int/comm/enterprise/newapproach/standardization/
Standard IEC 61000-2-5(8) in particular provides a
harmstds/reflist/emc.html
rationale for assessing the relevant type of installation, and therefore the levels likely to be encountered, as follows: Table 11.1 EMC standards for equipment
—
Eight types of installations are defined, according
Type of equipment
Applicable standard(s)
to the types of equipment that can be encountered
Access control units
BS EN 50130-4(9) plus Admt. 1: 1998
within the enclosure (or at a close proximity), the
Air handling units
BS EN 61000-6-1/2/3/4(4–7)
type of AC and DC power supply, the signal/control
lines and earthing practices.

Audio amplifiers
BS EN 61000-6-1/2/3/4(4–7)
—
For these types of installation, and for each type of Battery charger
BS EN 61000-6-1/2/3/4(4–7)
disturbance, there are associated disturbance
Boilers
BS EN 61000-6-1/2/3/4(4–7)
categories are associated, which are defined as
CCTV control panels
BS EN 61000-6-1/2/3/4(4–7)
follows:
Chillers
BS EN 61000-6-1/2/3/4(4–7)
( a)
Class A: controlled environment, i.e.

UPS
BS EN 50091-2(10): 1995
controlled by the nature of the building or
any particular installation practices.

Extract fans
BS EN 61000-6-1/2/3/4(4–7)
Fire alarm system
BS EN 50130-4(9) Admt. 1: 1998
( b)
Classes 1, 2, etc. (up to 5, depending on the
BS EN 50270(11)
type of disturbance considered) correspond
to natural environments, and are classified
HV switch gear
BS EN 61000-6-1/2/3/4(4–7)
from the lowest to the highest levels.

HVAC control system
BS EN 60730-2(12)
( c)
Class X (harsh environment) is an
IT equipment used in BMS/EMS,
BS EN 55022(13)
environment where the degree of
CCTV, access control, intruder
disturbance is higher than is generally
alarm, and fire detection systems
encountered.

Lifts
BS EN 12015(14) (emission)
BS EN 12016(15) (immunity)
The levels for classes A and X are defined on a
case-by-case basis.

Lighting equipment
BS EN 55015(16) plus Admt. 1: 1997
and Amdt. 2: 1999
—
For each type of disturbance, tables are provided
LV switch gear
BS EN 60947(17)
with the level likely to be encountered according
to the degree of disturbance.

Power distribution units
BS EN 61000-6-1/2/3/4(4–7)
11-6
Electricity in buildings
Table 11.2 Standards for cabling
Phase
Relevant standard(s)
Subject areas
Building design phase
BS EN 50310(19)
Common bonding network (CBN) within a building; AC distribution system and bonding of the protective conductor (TN-S)
Cabling design phase
BS EN 50173(20) or (and)
BS EN 50098-1(21) or (and)
BS EN 50098-2(21) or (and)
other application standards
Planning phase
BS EN 50174-1(18) and
Specification considerations; quality assurance; cabling administration BS EN 50174-2(18) and
Safety requirements; general installation practices for metallic and optical fibre cabling additional installation practice for metallic cabling; additional installation practice for optical fibre cabling
BS EN 50174-3(18) and Equipotential
bonding
BS EN 50310(19)
Common bonding network (CBN) within a building; AC distribution system and bonding of the protective conductor (TN-S)
Implementation phase
BS EN 50174-1(18) and
Documentation; cabling administration
BS EN 50174-2(18) and
Safety requirements; general installation practices for metallic and optical fibre cabling; additional installation practice for metallic cabling; additional installation practice for optical fibre cabling
BS EN 50174-3(18) and
Equipotential bonding
BS EN 50310(19)
Common bonding network (CBN) within a building; AC distribution system and bonding of the protective conductor (TN-S)
Operational phase
BS EN 50174-1(18)
Quality assurance; cabling administration; repair and maintenance series of standards. These and other relevant
Some of the contents of a typical management control plan standards(19–21) are summarised in the Table 11.2.

are outlined as follows:
Different standards may be used at different stages and
—
product definition, in terms of the Directive
this is illustrated in the table.

—
electromagnetic environment assessments and risk
analysis
11.5
Construction
—
definition of legal requirements, compliance
routes and decision flow charts
management plans
—
purchasing rules and supplier audits
With the increasing integration of electrical with
—
conformity in installation
electronic systems, there is a greater need to successfully manage the EMC compliance of the whole building and its
—
installation, assembly and operation techniques.

infrastructure. Certain rules need to be implemented; some of these are described below.

11.6
Good design practices
EMC compliance for building management systems (BMS) requires a total EMC approach to installing systems such that compliance becomes an integral part of the system’s Good EMC design practices applied at the commencement life-cycle. Consequently, continuing compliance involves a of design will significantly reduce the installation and variety of business disciplines not normally considered to remedial costs inherent in not applying the practices until be involved in the EMC process. The business framework later in the project. Best practices that have the most requires that EMC codes of practice and quality assurance significant effect on containing electromagnetic problems systems are introduced at all stages of design, develop-are given below.

ment, approval, procurement, installation and operation.

In addition, procedures should be in place, which address ongoing maintenance up to the withdrawal of systems in 11.6.1
System shielding
use.

Electromagnetic disturbances can be either radiated or The starting point for achieving whole-life EMC manage-conducted. It is therefore essential to protect the environment is the preparation of an EMC management control ment from such disturbances (emission problem) and/or plan. The objective of such a plan is to set out what needs to be protected from the disturbances in the environment to be done so that systems achieve compliance from
(immunity problem). Both radiated and conducted
completion of the installation, continue to comply during disturbances must be taken into account. There are several modifications and up to replacement by more modern
general approaches to obtain EMC immunity for a system, systems. All of this should be achieved at the lowest these are shown in Figure 11.1 and are described below: possible cost. In addition, the EMC control plan should be part of the existing business procedures (e.g. quality ( a)
Global protection by single barrier: a screen surrounds assurance, quality control) and not stand outside of them.

all devices of a system, and suitable devices protect
Electromagnetic compatibility
11-7
Incident
wave
Multiple
reflections
within the
shield ( M dB)
Shield
attenuation
Reflected
(a)
(b)
(c)
waves ( R dB)
Transmitted
Unshielded
Shielded
Surge
waves ( A dB)
device or
device or
protective
cable
cable
device
Figure 11.1 Shielding strategy; (a) global protection by single barrier, (b) global protection by multiple barriers, (c) distributed protection all cable entries. No specific protection is applied to the individual units, see Figure 11.1(a).

( b)
Global protection by multiple barriers: same as above, Figure 11.2 Illustration of shielding effectiveness but some particularly sensitive or noisy devices are The reflection loss ( R
) is caused by the impedance
separated in a second enclosure, nested in the first dB
mismatch between the incident wave and the shield. It can one. There can be as many zones nested in one
be shown that the source wave impedance depends on the another as necessary, see Figure 11.1(b).

type of the source (i.e. electric or magnetic) and the ( c)
Distributed protection: only the sensitive and/or distance from the source. This gives three relations for noisy devices are protected, in an individual
R
, as follows.

dB
manner, see Figure 11.1(c).

For planes waves:
In all situations, there is a separation between electro-magnetically noisy zones and quiet zones, and there may R
= 168 – 10 log ( f µ / σ )
(11.3)
dB
r
r
be several levels of quiet zones, as in case (b). These separations are an essential process in the shielding For an electric field source:
strategy, since it is not often possible to attenuate disturbances by 80 dB at all frequencies with the use of a R
= 168 – 10 log ( r 3 f 3 µ / σ )
(11.4)
dB
r
r
single screen. Moreover, some systems do not need such attenuation and providing a high level of shielding effec-For a magnetic field source:
tiveness is often expensive. Therefore, a cost and risk
= 168 – 10 log (µ 2 /
)
(11.5)
analysis should be performed in order to choose the most R
r 2 f σ
dB
r
r
appropriate strategy.

where r is the distance from the source (m).

The shielding effectiveness ( S
) is obtained by the
dB
A list of typical shield materials is given in Table 11.3, product of three terms, each representing one loss
together with values of µ , σ , √(µ σ ) and [10 log (µ /σ )].

parameter, i.e. reflection loss ( R), absorption loss ( A) and r
r
r
r
r
r
multiple reflection ( M). The situation is indicated in It can be seen that A
for iron is some 14 times that for
Figure 11.2. Expressing the factors in dB terms, they may dB
copper, while R
is about 37 dB lower.

be added to give:
dB
The amount of shielding to achieve the desired electro-S
= A + R + M
(11.1)
dB
dB
dB
dB
magnetic field inside a building can be calculated.

However, the problem is complex, depending on the
where S
is the shielding effectiveness (dB), AdB is the dB
absorption loss (dB), R
is the reflection loss (dB) and
dB
Table 11.3 Characteristics of screening materials M
is the multiple reflection (dB).

dB
Metal
µ
σ
√(µ /σ )
10 log
(µ /σ )
r
r
r
r
10
r
r
The internal multiple reflections ( M
) are negligible
Copper
1
1
1
0
dB
when the absorption loss ( A ) is greater than 10 dB. The dB
Aluminium
1
0.6
0.8
2.3
absorption loss depends mainly on the characteristics of Magnesium
1
0.4
0.5
4
the material and is defined by:
Zinc
1
0.3
0.4
5
A
= 131 66
.

t
f µ σ
(11.2)
Nickel
1
0.2
0.3
7
dB
r
r
Lead
1
0.08
0.2
11
where t is the thickness (m), f is the frequency (MHz), µ is Iron
103
0.2
14
37
r
the permeability (H·m–1) and σ is the conductivity (S·m–1).

r
Steel
103
0.1
10
40
11-8
Electricity in buildings
number of radio frequency sources outside and inside the impedance through into the equipment. If this is
building, the building construction materials and the not done, then energy is lost as radiation into the
amount of internal reflections caused by the type of environment. This spurious radiation (emission) is
building materials used. Specialist EMC advice should be what causes interference into other systems.

sought that addresses both measurement and calculation of these fields.

—
Metal cable trays, if not already in use, should be
installed. With an adequate mesh for the frequen-
cies in use and good earthing, the tray will
11.6.2
Cable segregation and
effectively become a screen or enclosure for the
cables. Multi-compartment trunking is usually
separation
used but cable separation as defined below must be
maintained.

11.6.2.1
Cable segregation
11.6.2.2
Cable separation
Cables should be segregated from each other depending on their function. In EMC engineering practice, the following To reduce capacitive and inductive coupling between general guidelines should be observed:
cables, they should be separated as far as possible from
—
Mains cables, including power feeds and lighting
each other. In particular, it is necessary to separate power circuits, carrying up to 250 V should not be
cables from digital cables. Tables 11.4 to 11.9 summarise grouped with sensitive cables (i.e. data cables).

the cable separation recommendation. They are given for different building installation environments.

—
All cabling should avoid any proximity to radio or
television transmitters, beacons and overhead
transmission lines.

11.6.3
System layout
—
High-level impulses on cables, due to their fast rise times, produce a large frequency distribution of
Within an installation the layout of equipment is as disturbance. Special precautions need to be taken
important as the layout of cables. Like cables, the rule is to where these types of cabling exist; heavy
separate radiating equipment from sensitive equipment, so screening, clean earthing at both ends and an
the first approach is to gather the equipment with high increase in the separation with adjacent cables
emission characteristics at one part of the installation. On would need to be implemented.

a large site, this equipment may require to be located at a
—
All cables should be terminated in accordance
minimum distance of 30 m from residential premises, to with their characteristic impedance. The for-prevent them from being affected by radiated interference.

mation of the wires in the cable determine the
If possible, the same distance should be maintained
resistance (impedance) of the cable between the
between electrically noisy and sensitive equipment within wires. To achieve best transfer of energy (at 50 Hz
the site. This may be difficult on a small site, so the and at higher frequencies used for communica-solution is to isolate the equipment that could be a source tions, for example), requires that the connection to of interference by enclosing it within either a shielded equipment (connector) should continue the
enclosure or a shielded building.

Table 11.4 Guide to separation tables
Type of installation
Coupled cables involved
Table number(s)
Source
Victim
Single occupancy IT building
Power
Data
11.5, 11.6, 11.7
Multi-occupancy IT building
Power
Data
11.5, 11.6, 11.7
Power
Control
11.7
3-phase
Control
11.7
Heavy industrial environment
Power
Data
11.5, 11.6, 11.7
Power
Control
11.7
3-phase
Control
11.7
Switched power line
Control
11.7
Hospital environment
Power
Data
11.5, 11.6, 11.7
Power
Control
11.7
3-phase
Control
11.7
Railways over or under-ground
Switched power line
Data
11.7
Switched power line
Control
11.7
Switched power line
Data (crossing)
11.9
Shopping mall
Power
Data
11.5, 11.6, 11.7
3-phase
Data
11.7
Switched power line
Data
11.7
Common services
Switched power line
Control
11.7
Fluorescent lamps
Data
11.7
Any type of installation
Parallel runs of cables
11.8
Electromagnetic compatibility
11-9
Table 11.5 Separation between power and signal cables according to Table 11.7 Separation between source and victim cables when shielding
unshielded
Signal cable type
Separation from stated power
Susceptibility
Separation from source cable of stated noise level / mm cable type / mm
of victim cable
Indifferent
Noisy
Very noisy
Fluorescent
Twin and
Steel wire
MICC
lamp
earth
armoured
Very sensitive
300
450
600
—
Plain
150
125
Touching
Sensitive
150
300
450
130
UTP
75*
50
Touching
125†
50
Touching
Table 11.8 Maximum parallel runs of cables
Screened
Touching
Touching
Touching
Type of cable
Separation
Maximum
*
below 100 MHz
/ mm
parallel run / m
†
above 100 MHz
Any; very well armoured and separated
Close
100
by a metallic divider
Table 11.6 Separation between power and signal cables according to the method of separation
IT/power
25
5
50
9
Cable type
Separation for stated
separation method / mm
IT/power (under carpet)
130
15
460
>15
Metal
Plastic
Unscreened power lines, or electrical
150
300
Table 11.9 Minimum clearances between overhead telecommunications equipment and unscreened IT lines
and power lines
Unscreened power lines, or electrical
30
70
Telecom.

Minimum clearance from power line
equipment and screened IT lines *
line
carrying stated voltage /m
Screened power lines*, or electrical
2
3
< 1000 V
> 1000 V
equipment and unscreened IT lines
Conductors
Poles
Conductors*
Poles
Screened power lines*, or electrical
1
2
equipment and screened IT lines*
Cables
0.5
—
(3 + 0.0015 U)
—
* ‘screened’ = screened and earthed at both ends
Poles
0.5
0.3
(1.5 + 0.0015 U) >1
* U = voltage in kV
11.7
Hazards of non-ionising
radiation
11.7.1
ICNIRP basic restriction
For some years there has been concern regarding limits The basic restrictions on the electromagnetic exposures for safe exposure from the non-ionising radiation emitted are presented in Table 11.10.

from equipment such as transformers and cables.

Standards have been published that set limits both
nationally and internationally.

11.7.2
ICNIRP reference levels
In April 1998, the International Commission on Non-
The reference levels for low frequency exposures (0 Hz to Ionising Radiation Protection (ICNIRP) published
100 kHz) are based on instantaneous short-term effects.

guidelines(22) for limiting exposure to time-varying These include surface charge perception effects, nerve electric, magnetic and electromagnetic fields in the stimulation and shocks from ungrounded large metallic frequency range up to 300 GHz. These guidelines, which structures and vehicles immersed in low frequency fields.

are intended to prevent the acute effects of exposure to DC, Reference levels for high frequency exposures, 100 kHz to low frequency, radio frequency (RF) and microwave fields 300 GHz, are based on whole body heat stress, localised on humans, are based on biological considerations from heating of sensitive body tissues and superficial heating, as which dosimetric quantities are derived, including a well as radio-frequency burns resulting from contact with suitable safety margin. These are known as ‘basic
ungrounded large metallic structures and vehicles
restrictions’. These quantities, relating to electromagnetic immersed in high frequency fields. All reference levels energy absorption and current flow in the tissues of the given by ICNIRP are presented in a two-tier system, one body, are not directly measurable. However, electro-set of levels for occupational exposures and the other set magnetic quantities such as electric and magnetic field for general public exposures. In general, the occupational strengths and the equivalent plane wave power flux
exposure levels are a factor five greater than exposure density (PFD) may be derived from them, assuming whole levels for the general public, as shown in Table 11.11.

body exposure in the far-field. These values are known as the ‘reference levels’ in the ICNIRP guidelines(22) and are given in Figures 11.3 and 11.4. The ICNIRP guidelines give reference levels for occupational and the general 11.8
Effect of the external EM
public exposures.

environment
Within the UK, the National Radiological Protection
Board (NRPB) has set limits for safe exposure. These The external environment must also be considered. For limits are similar to those expressed in the ICNIRP
example, is the building going to be near to high power guidelines, but expert guidance should be sought in order radar sources such as those found at airports? If safety that proper levels are defined or measured.

critical equipment is to be installed in the building, e.g.

11-10
Electricity in buildings
106
105
–1
105
–1
ICNIRP Occupational
104
ICNIRP Occupational
104
ICNIRP General Public
ICNIRP General Public
103
103
102
102
10
1
10
Electric field strength / V·m
Magnetic field strength / A·m 10–1
1
10–2 1 10 102 103 104 105 106 107 108 109 1010 1011 1012
1
10 102 103 104 105 106 107 108 109 1010 1011 1012
Frequency / Hz
Frequency / Hz
Figure 11.3 ICNIRP reference levels for magnetic field strength(22) Figure 11.4 ICNIRP reference levels for electric field strength(22) Table 11.10 ICNIRP basic restrictions for occupational and the general public for frequencies up to 300 GHz Frequency range
Exposure
Basic restriction*
Comments*
Up to 1Hz
Occupational
40 mA·m–2
Induced current density in the head and trunk. All current density values given are General public
8 mA·m–2
RMS. For frequencies below 100 kHz the peak current density can be calculated by multiplying the RMS value by √2. Because of the electrical inhomogeneity of the body, the current density should be averaged over a section 1 cm2, normal to the current flow. For frequencies up to 100 kHz and for pulsed magnetic fields, the maximum current density can be calculated from the rise/fall times, and the maximum rate of change of magnetic flux density. The induced current density can then be compared with the appropriate basic restriction.

1 Hz to 4 Hz
Occupational
(40 / f ) mA·m–2
As above
General public
(8 / f ) mA·m–2
4 Hz to 1 kHz
Occupational
10 mA·m–2
As above
General public
2 mA·m–2
1 kHz to 10 MHz
Occupational
( f / 100) mA·m–2
As above
General public
( f / 500) mA·m–2
100 kHz to 10 GHz
Occupational
0.4 W·kg–1
Whole body average SAR
10 W·kg–1
Localised SAR in the head and trunk
20 W·kg–1
Localised SAR in the limbs
General public
0.08 W·kg–1
Whole body average SAR
2 W·kg–1
Localised SAR in the head and trunk
4 W·kg–1
Localised SAR in the limbs
10 GHz to 300 GHz
Occupational
50 W·m–2
Power density
General public
10 W·m–2
* f = frequency (Hz); SAR = specific absorption rate Notes:
(1) All SAR values are to be averaged over 6-minute period.

(2) Localised SAR averaging mass is 10 g of the exposed tissue and is taken in a volume of 1cm3; the maximum SAR so obtained should be the value used for the estimation of exposure.

(3) For pulses of duration t the equivalent frequency to apply in the basic restrictions should be calculated as: f = 1/(2 t ) p
p
(4) To avoid auditory effects in the frequency range 0.3 GHz to 10 GHz from pulsed exposure, the SAR should not exceed 10 mJ·kg–1 for workers and 2 mJ·kg–1 for the general public, averaged over 10 g of tissue.

(5) Power densities are to be averaged over any 20 cm2 of exposed area and any minute period to compensate the decreasing penetration depth with increasing frequency.

(6) Spatial maximum power densities, averaged over 1 cm2, should not exceed 20 times the values of the power densities given.

life support systems in a hospital, then additional mitiga-11.9
Effect of new technologies
tion measures, such as building shielding or filtering of cables into the building, may need to be applied. Where on maintaining compliance
the building is located over high magnetic or electric field sources, e.g. above an underground railway system, then The advanced electronic controls that are widely used in analysis of the effects on systems installed in the building providing building services can be affected by electrical should be performed. A risk analysis as described below, noise from sources such as IT equipment, industrial
will be required to be performed.

machinery and RF transmitters.

Electromagnetic compatibility
11-11
Table 11.11 ICNIRP reference levels for occupational and general public exposure from 0 Hz to 300 GHz Occupancy
Frequency range
ICNIRP reference level
Electric field
Magnetic flux
Magnetic field
Equivalent plane
strength / V·m–1
density ( B) / mT
strength ( H) / A·m–1
wave PDF / W·m–2
Occupational
Up to 1 Hz
—
200 000
163 000
—
General public
Up to 1 Hz
—
40 000
32 000
—
Occupational
1 Hz to 8 Hz
20 000
200 000 / f 2
163 000 / f 2
—
General public
1 Hz to 8 Hz
10 000
40 000 / f 2
32 000 / f 2
—
Occupational
8 Hz to 25 Hz
20 000
25 000 / f
20 000 / f
—
General public
8 Hz to 25 Hz
10 000
5 000 / f
4 000 / f
—
Occupational
25 Hz to 820 Hz
500 / f
25 / f
20 / f
—
General public
25 Hz to 800 Hz
250 / f
5 / f
4 / f
—
Occupational
0.82 kHz to 65 kHz
610
30.7
24.4
—
65 kHz to 1 MHz
610
2.0 / f
1.6 / f
—
General public
0.8 kHz to 3 kHz
250 / f
6.25
5
—
3 kHz to 150 kHz
87
6.25
5
—
150 kHz to 1 MHz
87
0.92 / f
0.73 / f
—
Occupational
1 MHz to 10 MHz
610 / f
2.0 / f
1.6 / f
—
General public
1 MHz to 10 MHz
87 / f 1/2
0.92 / f
0.73 / f
—
Occupational
10 MHz to 400 MHz
61
0.2
0.16
10
General public
10 MHz to 400 MHz
28
0.092
0.073
2
Occupational
400 MHz to 2 GHz
3 f 1/2
0.01 f 1/2
0.008 f 1/2
f / 40
General public
400 MHz to 2 GHz
1.375 f 1/2
0.0046 f 1/2
0.0037 f 1/2
f / 200
Occupational
2 GHz to 300 GHz
137
0.45
0.36
50
General public
2 GHz to 300 GHz
61
0.2
0.16
10
Note: f = frequency (Hz)
Wireless communication
• GSM
• UMTS
USB
Wired communication
• PSTN
• ISDN
GSM
• xDSL
• ATM
Coax
Wireless local bus
HD drive
• Bluetooth
DVD
• UMTS
• DECT
IEEE1394
Wired local bus
• IEEE 1394, copper / POF
• USB, copper
Communications system
• TV
UMTS
• Radio
• Circuit switched Telco
• Packet switched Telco
DECT
xDSL
Cable modem
Coax
ATM
HE
HE
Twisted pair
PDTS/ISDN
ATM
PSTN/ISDN
Figure 11.5 Typical data and control systems
The newer electronic systems, see Figure 11.5, offer a wide electrical and electronic equipment of all sorts is installed range of facilities but in certain cases they will be more and used in buildings. Most of the sensors operate at low susceptible to electrical interference. The level of electrical level and so are particularly sensitive to interference. The noise in the environment is increasing as the use of electromagnetic fields generated by radio systems and/or
11-12
Electricity in buildings
mobile telephones generate induced voltage currents and This analysis is the first step of a complete study of EMC
voltage on signal or control conductors. So they may have risk. The findings of this analysis show that a quantitative an impact on safety implications e.g. fire alarm controllers.

risk assessment should be performed.

To analyse the potential EMC risk, a risk matrix can be used. An example of a this matrix is given as Table 11.12.

It lists the likely sources (rows) and victims (columns) of References
disturbance in a building. ‘Yes’ indicates that there is potentially an EMC problem between a given source and a 1
Council Directive of 3 May 1989 on the approximation of the given victim, while ‘No’ means that no EMC problem
laws of the member states relating to electromagnetic should occur between the two systems.

compatibility EC Directive 89/336/EEC Official J. of the European Communities 23.5.89 L139/19 (as amended by Council Where a ‘Yes’ is given, then further analysis and
Directives 92/31/EEC (1992), 93/68/EEC (1993) and 93/97/EEC
investigation is required. An example of the analysis (1993)) (Brussels: Commission of the European Communities) needed is given below.

(1989–93)
2
The Electromagnetic Compatibility Regulations 1992
Each intersection should be analysed and an explanation Statutory Instruments 1992 No. 2372; The Electrocompatibility presented. For example, for row D:
(Amendment) Regulations 1994 Statutory Instruments 1994 No
—
Row D (‘Yes’):
3080; The Electrocompatibility (Amendment) Regulations LV switchgear and distribution
board are the source of the same type of distur-
1995 Statutory Instruments 1995 No 3180 (London: Her bance. Nearly all systems are supplied by the
Majesty’s Stationery Office) (1992–95)
LV
system so that the disturbances are propagated to
3
Guidelines on the application of council directive 89/336/EEC
many types of systems. For those systems marked
(Brussels: Commission of the European Communities) (1997)
‘Yes’, further analysis will be required.

(with subsequent amendments)
—
Row D (‘No’): those systems marked with a ‘No’
4
BS EN 61000-6-1: 2001: Electromagnetic compatibility (EMC).

are new systems which will not be connected to
Generic standards. Immunity for residential, commercial and light-the existing LV switchgear so that no interference
industrial environments (London: British Standards Institution) problems should occur.

(2001)
Table 11.12 Example risk matrix
Source system
Victim system
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
plant
AC
equipment
switchgear and power
elephone
ire alarms
CCTV
T
HV
F
Lifts and escalators
IT
LV
distribution boards
Control rooms
(A) 11 kV cables
No
No
No
No
Yes
Yes
No
No
(B) HV switchgear
No
No
No
No
No
Yes
Yes
No
(C) Transformers
No
No
Yes
No
Yes
Yes
Yes
No
(D) LV switchgear
Yes
Yes
No
Yes
No
Yes
—
No
(E) Small power
No
No
No
No
No
Yes
No
No
(F) Lighting
No
No
No
No
No
No
No
No
(G) CCTV
No
No
No
No
No
No
No
No
(H) Telephone
No
—
No
No
No
No
No
No
(I) HVAC plant
No
No
—
No
No
No
No
No
(J) Fire alarm
No
No
No
—
No
No
No
No
(K) Water pumps
No
No
No
No
No
No
No
No
(L) Lifts and escalators
No
No
No
No
—
No
No
No
(M) Mobile phones
No
Yes
No
No
Yes
Yes
No
Yes
(O) Broadcast transmitters
No
No
No
No
No
No
No
No
(P) ISM equipment
No
Yes
No
No
No
Yes
No
Yes
(Q) IT equipment
No
No
No
No
No
—
No
No
Note: ‘Yes’ indicates potential EMC problem between indicated systems; ‘No’ indicates no potential problem
Electromagnetic compatibility
11-13
5
BS EN 61000-6-3: 2001: Electromagnetic compatibility (EMC).

14
BS EN 12015: 1998: Electromagnetic compatibility. Product family Generic standards. Emission standard for residential, commercial and standard for lifts, escalators and passenger conveyors. Emission light-industrial environments
(London: British Standards
(London: British Standards Institution) (1998)
Institution) (2001)
15
BS EN 12016: 1998: Electromagnetic compatibility. Product family 6
BS EN 61000-6-2: 2001: Electromagnetic compatibility (EMC).

standard for lifts, escalators and passenger conveyors. Immunity Generic standards. Immunity standard for industrial environments (London: British Standards Institution) (1998)
(London: British Standards Institution) (2001)
16
BS EN 55015: 2001: Limits and methods of measurement of radio disturbance characteristics of electrical lighting and similar equipment 7
BS EN 61000-6-4: 2001: Electromagnetic compatibility (EMC).

(London: British Standards Institution) (2001)
Generic standards. Emission standard for industrial environments (London: British Standards Institution) (2001)
17
BS EN 60947: Specification for low-voltage switchgear and control gear
(8 parts) (London: British Standards Institution)
8
IEC 61000-2-5: 1995: Electromagnetic compatibility (EMC); Part 2: (1996–2003)
Environment; Section 5: Classification of electromagnetic environments (Geneva, Switz: International Electrotechnical 18
BS EN 50174: Information technology. Cabling installation; Part 1: Commission) (1995)
2001: Specification and quality assurance; Part 2: 2001: Installation planning and practices inside buildings; Part 3 (draft for 9
BS EN 50130-4: 1996: Alarm systems. Electromagnetic comment): 2002: Installation planning and practices outside compatibility. Product family standard: Immunity requirements for buildings (London: British Standards Institution) (2001, 2002) components of fire, intruder and social alarm systems (London: 19
BS EN 50310: 2000: Application of equipotential bonding and British Standards Institution) (1996)
earthing in buildings with information technology equipment 10
BS EN 50091-2: 1996: Specification for uninterruptible power (London: British Standards Institution) (2000)
systems (UPS). EMC requirements (London: British Standards 20
BS EN 50173-1: 2002: Information technology. Generic cabling Institution) (1996)
systems. General requirements and office areas (London: British Standards Institution) (2002)
11
BS EN 50270: 1999: Electromagnetic compatibility. Electrical apparatus for the detection and measurement of combustible gases, 21
BS EN 50098: Customer premises cabling for information toxic gases or oxygen (London: British Standards Institution) technology; Part 1: 1999: ISDN basic access; Part 2: 1996: (1999)
2048 kbit/s ISDN primary access and leased line network interface (London: British Standards Institution) (1999, 1996) 12
BS EN 60730-2: Specification for automatic electrical controls for household and similar use. Particular requirements (22 parts) 22
Allen S G, Chadwick P J, Dimbylow P J, McKinlay A F, (London: British Standards Institution) (1997–2002)
Muirhead C R, Sienkiewicz Z J and Stather J W 1998 ICNIRP
Guidelines for Limiting Exposure to Time-Varying Electric, Magnetic 13
BS EN 55022: 1998: Information technology equipment. Radio and Electromagnetic Fields (up to 300 GHz): NRPB Advice on disturbance characteristics. Limits and methods of measurement Aspects of Implementation in the UK (Didcot: National (London: British Standards Institution) (1998)
Radiological Protection Board) (1998)
12-1
12
Inspection, testing, operation and
maintenance
12.1


Introduction

HSE guidance(4) on the Electricity at Work Regulations highlights the need for safety isolation procedures to be It is a requirement of the Electricity at Work Regulations formalised in written instructions. Where appropriate, a 1989(1) that any electrical system be constructed and
‘permit-to-work’ may form part of that procedure.

maintained as to prevent, so far as reasonably practicable, danger.

Where work is to be carried out on or near a live conductor, regulation 14 requires that the following criteria must BS 7671(2) states that:
be met:
Every installation shall, during erection and/or on completion ( a)
it is unreasonable in all circumstances for it to be before being put into service be inspected and tested to verify, dead
so far as is reasonably practicable, that the requirements of the and
regulations have been met.

( b)
it is reasonable in all the circumstances for
The importance of these activities is such that they must him[/her] to be at work on or near it whilst it is
be carried out by a competent person and the results of the live
inspection and test is validated against the design criteria.

and
Records of the inspection and test must be included in ( c)
suitable precautions (including where necessary
operational manuals, together with precise details of each the provision of suitable protective equipment) are
item of equipment.

taken to prevent injury.

It follows that the inspection and test activities must be carried out by a competent person and be carefully
12.2
Scope
planned to ensure that no danger will arise to either persons or property.

This section relates mainly to inspection, testing and maintenance of low voltage installations although
reference is made to high voltage equipment where it would form part of the end-user’s electrical installation.

12.4
Initial verification
Reference is made to the inspection and testing
requirements of BS 7671(2) and IEE Guidance Note 3:
12.4.1
General
Inspection and Testing(3), together with additional requirements of the Electricity at Work Regulations(1), BS 7671(2) clearly sets out the requirements of inspection Health and Safety Executive guidance and relevant British during erection and on completion of an installation.

Standards.

To be effective inspection activities must be undertaken at It does not include the requirements and procedures for the correct time in the construction process. In planning emergency lighting, general lighting and fire alarm
the inspection and testing activities the intentions of the systems.

client, regarding witnessing, should be ascertained.

In order to carry out the work the inspector must be in possession of information regarding the installation. BS
12.3
Safety
7671 sections 311, 312, 313 require that the following are determined prior to an inspection or before an alteration Electrical testing inherently involves some degree of or addition to the installation:
danger due mainly to the proximity to live parts during
—
the maximum demand
the testing procedure. This is also the case during
—
the arrangement of live conductors and the type of
inspection where the supply is available, for example, earthing
during periodic inspection of an installation.

—
the nature of the supply
The Electricity at Work Regulations 1989(1) must be
—
the design criteria.

complied with during all activities related to an electrical system. Regulation 13 requires that adequate precautions shall be taken to prevent equipment which has been made dead from becoming electrically charged during the work to be undertaken if danger may arise.

12-2
Electricity in buildings
12.4.2
Initial inspection
would indicate an immediate problem which should be
investigated.

The inspection should be carried out to confirm that the installed electrical equipment is:
12.4.3
Initial testing
—
in compliance with section 511 of BS 7671(2)
—
correctly selected and erected in accordance with
The testing of a new installation or an addition to an BS 7671
existing installation must be carried out in a prescribed sequence and the results of those tests compared with
—
not visibly damaged or defective so as to impair
relevant pass criteria.

safety.

The following forms a schedule of items that, where
12.4.3.1
Sequence of tests
relevant, should be inspected as a minimum. For more detail on the items listed reference should be made to BS
Before energisation
7671 and IEE Guidance Note 3: Inspection and Testing(3).

( a)
Continuity of protective conductors: all protective ( a)
Connection of conductors.

conductors including earthing conductors, circuit
protective conductors, main and supplementary
( b)
Identification of conductors.

bonding conductors should be tested to verify
( c)
Routing of cables in safe zones or protection
connection and continuity. Wherever possible
against mechanical damage.

parallel earth paths should be eliminated from the
test, however this is not always possible or indeed
( d)
Selection of conductors for current carrying
practical. Where parallel earth paths cannot be
capacity and voltage drop.

disconnected the test should be supplemented
( e)
Connection of single-pole devices for protection or
with inspection to confirm the integrity of the
switching in phase conductors only.

protective conductors.

( f)
Correct connection of accessories and equipment.

( b)
Continuity of ring final circuit conductors: the continuity of each conductor of a ring final circuit
( g)
Presence of fire barriers, fire seals and protection should be verified to ensure the ring is complete
against thermal effects.

and is not interconnected.

( h)
Methods of protection against electric shock by:
( c)
Insulation resistance: the insulation resistance
—
protection against both indirect and direct
between all conductors, between conductors and
contact
earth, and of accessories should be measured and
verified in accordance with BS 7671(2) Table 71A
—
protection against direct contact
(see Table 12.1).

—
protection against indirect contact.

Care must be taken whilst performing this test to
( i)
Prevention of mutual detrimental influence.

disconnect all current using equipment; where
this is not possible a test to earth with phase and
( j)
Presence of appropriate and correctly labelled
neutral strapped together should be made.

devices for isolation and switching.

The test must be carried out with all switches
( k)
Presence of under voltage protective devices.

and/or devices in the closed position to ensure all
parts of the circuit are tested.

( l)
Choice and setting of protective and monitoring
devices.

( d)
Polarity: the polarity of every circuit should be verified to ensure correct connection of conductors
( m)
Labelling of protective devices, switches and
and that all single pole switches or protective
terminals.

devices are in the phase conductor only.

( n)
Selection of equipment and protective measures
For ring final circuits the polarity is proved during appropriate to external influences.

the continuity of ring final circuit conductors.

( o)
Adequacy of access to switchgear and equipment.

For radial circuits and lighting circuits the
( p)
Presence of danger notices and other warning
procedure for testing continuity of protective
signs.

conductors, as described in IEE Guidance
( q)
Presence of diagrams, instructions and similar
information.

Table 12.1 Minimum values of insulation resistance Circuit nominal
Test voltage (DC)
Minimum
( r)
Erection methods.

voltage / V
insulation
resistance / MΩ
This list is not exhaustive and should be supplemented by Separated extra-low voltage
250
0.25
additional items where appropriate. Installations which (SELV) and protective extra-low
are considered as special locations, as defined in BS 7671
voltage (PELV)
Part 6, must also be inspected to confirm compliance.

Up to and including
500
0.5
500 V with the exception
It should be noted that inspection is not simply a visual of the above systems
check. Connections and fixings can only be checked by touch. Also, the smell of burning or the sound of arcing Above 500 V
1000
1.0
Inspection, testing, operation and maintenance 12-3
Note 3(3), would effectively prove polarity.

( k)
Prospective fault current: the prospective fault Providing all devices are operated during the test
current should be measured at the origin of an
there would be no need to retest polarity prior to
installation and at all other relevant points.

energisation.

The test should include both prospective short
( e)
Earth electrode resistance: where applicable it will be circuit current and prospective earth fault current, necessary to measure the resistance of the earth
the greater of the two being compared to the rating
electrode to the general mass of earth to ensure the of the protective device.

earthing arrangement satisfies the requirements of
( l)
Earth fault loop impedance: the earth fault loop both BS 7671 and the design parameters for the
impedance should be measured at both the origin
particular installation.

of the installation (external earth fault loop
impedance Z ) and at the furthest point of each It should be noted that any test requiring the
e
distribution circuit (maximum earth fault loop
disconnection of the electrode must be performed
impedance Z ).

with the supply to the installation isolated.

s
When measuring the external earth fault loop
Where appropriate:
impedance of an installation the earthing
( f)
Site applied insulation: where insulation is applied conductor must be disconnected from the main
during erection, not including the assembly of
earthing terminal, and on any other bonding
type tested switchgear on site, a test should be
conductors and circuit protective conductors, to
ensure that false readings due to parallel paths are performed between the live conductors and the
not obtained. For this reason it is imperative that
external surfaces of the insulation.

the installation is isolated from the supply during
Test voltages and duration should be in accordance
the test.

with the appropriate British Standard for similar
On completion of the test the earthing conductors
factory built equipment.

must be reconnected before energisation of the
The test involves the application of high voltage
installation. Alternatively Z may be determined e
and should therefore be strictly controlled by a
by enquiry or by calculation, though with either of
suitably authorised and competent person.

these two methods a measurement should be taken
to ensure a connection with earth exists.

( g)
Protection by separation of circuits: where protection is afforded by separation of circuits utilising either The measurement of maximum earth fault loop
separated extra-low voltage (
impedance ( Z ) should be taken at the remote end SELV) or protective
s
of all final circuits, in the case of ring final circuits extra-low voltage (PELV) the separation should be
at the mid-point. This will necessitate a test at
verified between the primary and secondary live
each socket outlet to determine the mid-point.

conductors and, in addition, for SELV circuits
between the secondary live conductors and the
Before carrying out the test, it must be confirmed
protective conductors of any adjacent higher
that all earthing conductors, circuit protective
voltage system. Test voltage will be in accordance
conductors and bonding conductors are in place.

with BS 7671(2) Table 71A.

As the test instrument used for this procedure
( h)
Protection by barriers or enclosures provided during passes a test current in the order of 23 A through
erection: where protection against direct contact is the phase earth loop, it may not be possible to
afforded by a barrier or enclosure is should be
perform the test, for example, in circuits protected by low rated
verified that the degree of protection meets IP 2X
MCBs or where there is a risk of
damage to electronic controls. In this case it is
or IP XXB and IP 4X on any accessible horizontal
possible to calculate the maximum earth fault loop
surface. (Degrees of protection afforded by
impedance using ( R + R ) values obtained whilst enclosures and defined in BS EN 60529(5), see
1
2
testing the circuit protective conductors and
section 7.3.2).

adding the test results obtained for other parts of
( i)
Insulation of non-conducting floor and walls: where the circuit, i.e:
protection against indirect contact is provided by a non-conducting location it should be verified that
Z = Z + ( R + R )
(12.1)
s
e
1
2
under normal circumstances there can be no
where Z
is the maximum earth fault loop
simultaneous contact between exposed conductive
s
impedance (Ω), Z is the external earth fault loop parts and extraneous conductive parts and that the
e
impedance (this may also be the reading obtained
resistance of insulating floors and walls to the
at the distribution board or control panel
main protective conductor is above 50 kΩ, (for a
supplying the final circuit under test) (Ω), R is system not exceeding 500 V) where the resistance
1
the resistance of the phase conductor (Ω) and R is is less than that specified the wall on floor should 2
the resistance of the circuit protective conductor
be deemed to be an extraneous conductive part.

(Ω).

It should be noted that the measured Z value After energisation
s
would include all parallel earth paths and this
( j)
Recheck polarity: polarity checks should be carried should be taken into account when making a
out once the system has been energised using an
comparison to measured ( R + R ) value.

1
2
approved test lamp in accordance with HSE
Where circuits are protected by RCDs, instruments
GS 38(6).

are available which, by either utilising a reduced
12-4
Electricity in buildings
test current or by saturating the core of the RCD,
circuit.

allow a test to be made without operating the
—
Appropriate injection of other devices.

device.

Where one of these instruments is not available,
( b)
LV switchgear:
the method using ( R + R ) values should be used.

1
2
—
Physical inspection to ensure compliance
At no time should the device be bypassed during
with the specification and to confirm the
the test.

general arrangement is as per the design.

( m)
Functional test of devices including residual current operated devices: a series of tests should be per-
—
Primary injection of restricted earth fault
formed on residual current devices to test their
protection to prove sensitivity when
effectiveness after installation. The tests are in
current is passed through one CT and
addition to the proving of the integral test button, selectivity when current is passed through
which must be checked after the test sequence.

two CTs .

The test sequence is as follows:
—
Primary and secondary injection of over-
current protective devices in accordance
(1)
At a test current of 50% of the rated
with manufacturer’s commissioning guides
tripping current of the RCD, the device
to prove correct operation. Where the
should not open.

device and all its components are
(2)
At a test current of 100% of the rated
contained within one unit the device
tripping current of the RCD, the device
manufacturer’s test certificates would be
should operate in less than 200 ms for
acceptable. However, where components,
general purpose RCDs to BS 4293(7), and
e.g. current transformers, are mounted and
less than 300 ms for general purpose RCDs
wired by the panel manufacturer then tests
to BS EN 61008(8) or RCBOs to BS EN
must be carried out to verify the compo-
61009(9).

nents are correctly installed.

(3)
Where the device provides supplementary
—
Function test to prove correct operation of
protection against direct contact, an
equipment including both mechanical and
additional test should be carried out at
electrical interlocks.

500% of the rated tripping current. The
—
Primary insulation resistance tests and
device should operate in less than 40 ms.

voltage withstand tests in accordance with
Where the device incorporates a time delay, the
appropriate British Standards.

manufacturer’s instructions should be consulted.

—
Confirmation of neutral earthing arrange-
( n)
Functional test of switchgear and control gear: all site ments.

built assemblies must be tested to prove that they
are installed in accordance with regulations and in
Following erection on site the following tests must be accordance with manufacturers instructions. With
carried out:
many assemblies such tests may be carried out
prior to dispatch therefore eliminating difficult
( a)
HV switchgear:
and often expensive testing on-site.

—
Physical inspection to ensure erection to
The following forms a list of items that, where applicable, manufacturer’s recommendations.

should be proved during manufacturers’ acceptance
—
Busbar joint integrity test by either torque
testing:
or resistance method.

( a)
HV switchgear:
—
Insulation resistance, pressure test, to
—
Physical inspection to ensure compliance
manufacturer’s recommendations.

with specification and to confirm the
—
Secondary injection test of protection
general arrangement is as per the design. It
relays to prove operation at service
should also be confirmed that the
settings.

equipment is suitable for operation under
the end user’s safety rules.

—
Primary injection of unit protection
schemes to prove sensitivity and
—
Function test to ensure correct operation
selectivity.

of equipment.

—
Overall function check to prove correct
—
Insulation resistance and pressure test at
operation of equipment and controls, and
appropriate voltages, to approved stan-
intertripping.

dards.

—
Primary injection of overcurrent, earth
( b)
HV cables:
fault protection, to prove sensitivity and
—
Physical inspection to ensure that the cable
selectivity and CT ratio.

installation is complete and in accordance
—
Secondary injection of protection relays in
with the design. It should also be
accordance with manufacturer’s commis-
confirmed that methods of cleating and
sioning guides to prove correct operation
bending radii of cables are compliant with
and to confirm the operation of the trip
manufacturer’s guidance.

Inspection, testing, operation and maintenance 12-5
—
Terminations of cables should be inspected
( d)
Transformers:
to confirm installation as per the manu-
—
Physical inspection to ensure installation
facturer’s instruction, and be checked for
to manufacturers recommendations.

correct separation of conductors within dry
termination boxes. The minimum distance
—
Insulation resistance: pressure test to
between conductors and between conduc-
manufacturer’s recommendations.

tors and earth for a paper insulated cable to
—
Over-temperature control to be proved to
BS 6480(10) is 10 mm at the ‘crutch’ of the
operate correctly.

termination increasing immediately to 20
mm. For a XLPE insulated screened cable to
—
Buchholz device operation to be proved to
BS 6622(11) a minimum distance of 15 mm
operate correctly, where applicable.

between conductors and between conduc-
tors and earth should be met at the end of
the screen increasing to 20 mm at the end
12.4.4
Verification of test results
of the stress relieving tubing.

It is the responsibility of the person carrying out the
—
A test should be carried out to prove
inspection and test activities to verify that the results continuity and polarity.

comply with relevant pass/fail criteria. It is therefore
—
An insulation resistance test should be
essential that the designer provides the information to the carried out at 1000 V.

person carrying out the construction and, where different,
—
The cable should be pressure tested in
the inspection and testing. Where this is not available, accordance with the appropriate British
reference should be made to appropriate tables in BS
Standard. Table 12.2 shows test voltages for
7671(2) and/or other relevant documents.

new cables. These test voltages should be
applied for a period of 15 minutes.

In relation to the measurement of earth fault loop
impedance IEE Guidance Note 3(3) details four methods of Where the installation comprises cables
verifying test results, these are as follows:
that have been in service, then a reduced
test voltage should be applied. The test
( a)
Table 41B or Table 41D of BS 7671, after
voltage should be agreed with both the
correction for temperature.

cable manufacturer and the client.

Where conductors are tested at a temperature
—
Following a pressure test, the insulation
which is different to its normal operating
test should be repeated.

temperature, adjustment should be made to the
readings. The formula for this adjustment is:
( c)
LV switchgear:
—
Physical inspection to ensure erection to
Z + F ( R + R )
< Z
(12.2)
e
1
2 test
s
manufacturer’s recommendations.

where Z is the external earth fault loop impedance e
—
Busbar joint integrity test by either torque
(Ω), F is the conductor temperature resistance or resistance method.

factor (see IEE Guidance Note 3(3), Appendix 1,
Table 1C), ( R + R )
is the measured value of
—
Insulation resistance test in accordance
1
2 test
( R + R ) at the ambient temperature during the with BS 7671(2).

1
2
test (Ω) and Z is the maximum earth fault loop s
—
With service setting applied protection
impedance (see BS 7671(2), Table 41B1, 41B2, 41D)
relays should be secondary injected to
(Ω).

prove operation. Where the device or its
( b)
Earth fault loop impedance figures provided by the
wiring will not be affected by trans-
designer.

portation the tests performed at the
manufacturer’s works would suffice.

IEE Guidance Note 3(3) gives the following
formula, which may be used by designers to give
—
An overall function check to prove correct
maximum Z values:
operation of equipment, controls, inter-
s
tripping and interlocks.

Z
≤ ( Z / F)
(12.3)
test
s
—
Neutral earthing arrangements to be
where Z
is the earth fault loop impedance
test
confirmed and recorded.

obtained when testing an installation at an
ambient temperature of 20 ºC (Ω), Z is the
—
Following energisation the phase rotation
s
maximum earth fault loop impedance (see BS
and voltage should be checked and
7671(2) Table 41B1, 41B2, 41D) (Ω) and F is the recorded.

conductor temperature resistance factor (see IEE
Guidance Note 3(3), Appendix 1, Table 1C).

( c)
Rule of thumb.

The measured value should not exceed 75% of the
Table 12.2 Test voltages for cables up to 33 kV
figures given in Table 41B1, 41B2, 41D of BS
Cable type
Test voltage
Test voltage
7671(2).

phase-to-phase
phase-to-earth
This provides a relatively quick method of
Paper insulated to BS 6480(ref)
34 kV (DC)
25 kV (DC)
verifying that the circuit will operate within the
XLPE insulated to BS 6622(ref)
Not applicable
25 kV (DC)
appropriate disconnection time. However, should
12-6
Electricity in buildings
the test value be greater than the 75% value,
—
condition of flexible cables and cords
further investigation is required by either of the
—
internal inspection of a sample of switching
other methods mentioned or by discussion with
devices
the designer.

—
presence and integrity of fire barriers where
( d)
For standard PVC circuits, values are given in
reasonably practicable
Appendix 2 of IEE Guidance Note 3(3).

—
means of protection against direct contact with
A comparison can be made of Z test values against s
live conductors
the tables; as these figures are based on tests being carried out at an ambient temperature of 10–20 °C
—
means of protection against indirect contact
no correction need be carried out under normal
—
presence, identification, condition and acces-
test conditions.

sibility of protective devices and switching devices
—
condition and integrity of enclosures and
mechanical protection
12.5
Periodic inspection
—
correct labelling of installations with regard to
and test
next inspection, earthing, voltages and presence of
residual current devices
12.5.1
General
—
any changes in either the external influences
which may effect the installations or alterations
and additions that are not appropriate to the
All electrical installations will deteriorate to some extent particular external influences present.

throughout their expected lifetime. This could be due to damage or wear and tear, but could also be due to excessive loading or adverse environmental influences.

12.5.3
Periodic testing
For this reason it is necessary to carry out periodic As stated in section 12.5.1, periodic inspection should be inspection supplemented by tests at intervals dependant supplemented by testing. The level of testing may not be on the type of installation.

the same as that for an initial test. However, should a sample test indicate either deterioration or failure, then The requirement for electrical installations to be
sampling must be increased.

maintained in a safe condition dictates that periodic inspection and testing be carried out. In the instance of It should be noted that periodic testing involves a
licensed properties, periodic inspection is essential in the potentially increased risk to safety and therefore the use of renewal of a licence.

competent persons with careful planning and preparation is essential.

Prior to an inspection being carried out it is necessary to obtain relevant diagrams, schedules and information
regarding previous inspections, and any alterations or 12.5.4
Test procedures
additions. Should these not be available some survey work would be required in order to ensure that the inspection The methods for carrying out periodic tests are the same and testing can be carried out in a safe and effective as those for initial verification. However, a different manner.

sequence of test should be adopted to reflect the need to confirm the integrity of the earthing prior to carrying out 12.5.2
Periodic inspection
further tests.

The following sequence should be used:
Inspection should take into account the following with regard to the electrical installation and all connected (1)
Continuity or protective conductors including
electrical equipment:
earthing and bonding conductors: care must be
taken whilst carrying out these tests as a dangerous
—
safety
potential can exist between CPC and the main
—
wear and tear
earthing terminal when the CPC is disconnected
particularly where the CPC provides functional
—
corrosion etc by external influence
earthing. For this reason no earthing conductors
—
damage
should be disconnected with an installation
energised.

—
excessive loading/over heating
(2)
Polarity tests should be carried out, however,
—
age of the installation
where the testing of the CPC utilises the ( R + R ) 1
2
—
suitability of installed equipment
method which incorporates polarity testing as
described in IEE Guidance Note 3(3). No further
—
function of the installation.

test need be performed.

Individual inspections should include items as follows: (3)
Earth fault loop impedance tests must be carried
out initially at the point of the incoming supply
—
a sample of joints and connections
and then at the remote end of each radial circuit
—
identification and condition of conductors
and at every socket outlet.

Inspection, testing, operation and maintenance 12-7
(4)
An insulation resistance test should be carried out
The model for this certificate given in BS 7671 Appendix between conductors and between conductors and
6 is a single page certificate, and is therefore appropriate earth. All equipment susceptible to damage by this
for this type of work.

test should be disconnected. Where this is not
possible, only a test to earth can be performed.

It should be noted that it is not acceptable to use this This should be carried out with all phase and
certificate for additions or alterations to more than one neutral conductors strapped together.

circuit, nor for replacement of switchgear not on a ‘like for like’ basis or where the switchgear incorporates protective (5)
All devices used for switching and isolation should
devices for more than one circuit.

be proved to function correctly.

(6)
All residual current devices should be proved to
12.6.1.3
Periodic inspection and testing
function correctly by simulating earth fault
conditions and by the operation of any integral
Following a periodic inspection, a periodic inspection test buttons.

Report must be issued and should include the following: (7)
Overcurrent protective devices should be proved
—
the extent of the installation covered by the report to function manually.

—
agreed limitations, if any, on the inspection
(8)
Where there is evidence of alteration, it would also be required that the continuity of ring final circuit
—
the purpose for which the report has been carried
conductors is proved.

out (whether this be following a fire or flood, for
licensing application or at the end of a recom-
mended period)
12.6
Certification
—
observations and recommendations for actions to
be taken; any recommendations should be
categorised using a code number as follows:
12.6.1
General
(1)
Requires urgent attention.

(2)
Requires improvement.

It is a requirement of BS 7671(2) that, on completion of a new installation or where additions or alterations have (3)
Requires further investigation.

been made to an existing installation, certification must be (4)
Does not comply with BS 7671 (this does
produced. It is also a requirement that, where a periodic not imply that the electrical installation
inspection of an installation is completed, a periodic inspected is unsafe).

inspection report is issued. All certification must be signed by a competent person or persons.

—
a summary of the inspection detailing the
condition of the installation with regard to safety
Model forms can be found in BS 7671 Appendix 6.

—
a schedule of inspection, testing and test results.

12.6.1.1
Electrical installation certificate
12.7
Operation and
For a new installation or for an addition or alteration which includes the provision of a new circuit, an electrical maintenance procedures
installation certificate must be issued upon completion of the works.

12.7.1
Operation and maintenance
The certificate should include the following:
manuals
—
extent of the installation covered by the certificate
—
schedules of inspection and testing
An essential part of any building services contract is the provision of an operation and maintenance manual to the
—
schedules of test results and circuits details
client or end user upon completion of the contract.

—
details of persons responsible for design, construc-
This document should form part of the effective operation tion, and inspection and test.

of the system and as such should be carefully prepared to include a comprehensive source of reference of the
In the case of alterations or additions, any defects found installed equipment.

on the existing installation should be recorded on the certificate. (Defects which would have an effect on the The information within the manual should also provide safety of the new work must be rectified before the
for the safety of the end user and as a basis for the training installation is put back in to service.)

of personnel in the operation of the installation.

12.6.1.2
Minor electrical installation works
One of the most important uses of the manual is as a certificate
reference base for use during modification or additions to an installation and during periodic inspections. It is Where an addition or alteration does not include the therefore necessary that following all modifications to the provision of a new circuit a minor electrical installation installation, the operation and maintenance (O&M) manual works certificate may be issued.

is updated to reflect the changes made.

12-8
Electricity in buildings
12.7.2
Contents
equipment be constructed, maintained and used in such a way as to prevent danger.

The O&M manual should contain the following information:
Accidents have occurred due to unsuitable test probes, excessive currents being drawn through test probes when
—
the purpose and use of the installation
instruments are incorrectly used, and where makeshift test
—
the technical specification of the installation
equipment i.e. test lamps are used.

—
‘as fitted’ drawings
In order to reduce the risk involved in the use of test
—
instruction in the operation of the installation
equipment, a number of documents have been produced,
—
recommended maintenance procedures
including the following:
—
recommended maintenance schedules
—
HSE GS 38: Electrical test equipment for use by
electricians(6)
—
a list of recommended spares
—
BS EN 61010: Safety requirements for electrical
—
instructions in the modification of plant or system
equipment for measurement, control and laboratory where permitted by the system designer or
use(13)
manufacturer; space should also be provided for
records of the modifications
—
BS EN 61557: Electrical safety in low voltage distri-
—
instructions for the disposal of equipment with
bution systems up to 1000 V AC and 1500 V DC(14).

regard to the safety of persons and the environ-
ment
HSE GS 38 requires that test leads and probes have the following safeguards:
—
details of all manufacturers and suppliers of
equipment together with details of the parties
—
finger barriers or a shape to prevent accidental
responsible for design, construction and instal-
contact with the conductors under test
lation.

—
insulated to leave a maximum of 4 mm of exposed
conductors at the tip of the test probe
12.7.3
Recommended maintenance
—
fused or current limiting resistor and a fuse
procedures
—
adequately coloured to distinguish between each
lead/probe
In order to ensure that systems remain in a safe condition, it is necessary to carry out periodic inspection see section
—
leads of an adequate length to allow the test to be
12.5. However this is not sufficient on its own as damage performed safely
or deterioration can occur on a daily basis. It is therefore
—
should leads become detached during a test, no
necessary that systems be subjected to a maintenance routine appropriate to the use and type of the installation.

conductive parts other than the tip of the probe
can become accessible.

Maintenance can be broken down in to three categories:
—
Breakdown maintenance: replacement or repair of 12.8.2
Accuracy
equipment as and when it breaks down; clearly
this simplest approach to maintenance is only
It is necessary that the accuracy and consistency of test appropriate to certain types of equipment and
equipment is maintained by calibration at intervals
installation.

recommended by the instrument manufacturer, and
certificates of the calibration be produced. It follows that
—
Preventative maintenance: planned maintenance of equipment to a prepared schedule to avoid the
in maintaining the calibration status of equipment all breakdown of equipment.

items of equipment must be identifiable by a unique serial number. This also provides for traceability of instruments
—
Condition monitored maintenance: this requires that from test records.

equipment is monitored during its operation for
signs of deterioration, e.g. temperature readings,
The performance criteria of test instruments are detailed from which maintenance can be carried out to
in BS EN 61557(14) and are also summarised in IEE
prevent breakdown.

Guidance Note 3(3).

Recommended schedules for maintenance procedures are detailed in HVCA Standard Maintenance Specification for Mechanical Services in Buildings(12).

References
1
The Electricity at Work Regulations 1989 Statutory
Instruments 1989 No. 635 (London: Her Majesty’s Stationery 12.8
Test instruments
Office) (1989)
2
BS 7671: 2001: Requirements for electrical installations. IEE
12.8.1
Safety
Wiring Regulations. Sixteenth edition (London: British Standards Institution) (2001)
To comply with the requirements of the Electricity at 3
Inspection and testing IEE Guidance Note 3 (London: Institution Work Regulations 1989(1), it is essential that test
of Electrical Engineers) (2002)
Inspection, testing, operation and maintenance 12-9
4
Memorandum of guidance on the Electricity at Work Regulations 10
BS 6480: 1988: Specification for impregnated paper-insulated lead 1989 Health and safety booklet HS(R)25 (London: Health and or lead alloy sheathed electric cables of rated voltages up to and Safety Executive) (1998)
including 33000 V (London: British Standards Institution) (1988)
5
BS EN 60529: 1992: Specification for degrees of protection provided by enclosures (IP code) (London: British Standards Institution) 11
BS 6622: 1999: Specification for cables with extruded cross-linked (1992)
polyethylene or ethylene propylene rubber insulation for rated voltages from 3.8/6.6 kV up to 19/33 kV (London: British Standards 6
Electrical test equipment for use by electricians General Series Institution) (1988)
Guidance Note GS38 (London: Health and Safety Executive) (1995)
12
Standard Maintenance Specification for Mechanical Services in Buildings HVCA SFG 20/M1 (CD-ROM) (London: Heating and 7
BS 4293: 1983: Specification for residual current-operated circuit-Ventilating Contractors’ Association) (2004)
breakers (London: British Standards Institution) (1983) 13
BS EN 61010: Safety requirements for electrical equipment for 8
BS EN 61008: Specification for residual current operated circuit-measurement, control and laboratory use (19 parts) (London: breakers without integral overcurrent protection for household and British Standards Institution) (1993–2003)
similar uses (RCCBs); Part 1: 1995: General rules; Part 2: 1995: Applicability of the general rules to RCCBs functionally independent of 14
BS EN 61557: Electrical safety in low voltage distribution systems up line voltage (London: British Standards Institution) (1995) to 1000 V AC and 1500 V DC (10 parts) (London: British Standards Institution) (1997–2001)
9
BS EN 61009: Specification for residual current operated circuit-breakers with integral overcurrent protection for household and similar uses (RCBOs); Part 1: 1995: General rules; Part 2: 1995: Applicability of the general rules to RCBOs functionally independent of line voltage (London: British Standards Institution) (1995)
Index
I-1
Index
BS 5839-1
8-18
BS EN 61008
12-4
BS 5992 (IEC 60255)
5-1
BS EN 61009
12-4
Above-ground drainage
3-3 to 3-6
BS 6004
8-9
BS EN 61010
12-8
Absorbed electrolyte cells
9-17
BS 6132
9-19
BS EN 61330
5-1, 5-6
Access
BS 6133
9-19
BS EN 61378
6-3
diesel fuel storage
4-8
BS 6290
9-15
BS EN 61386
8-14
high voltage systems
5-2, 5-5, 5-16
BS 6360
8-6, 8-9
BS EN 61537
8-14
low voltage switchgear
7-8 to 7-9; 12-2
BS 6387
8-7, 8-18
BS EN 61557
12-8
substations
4-3; 5-2, 5-6, 5-16
BS 6436
6-3
BS EN 61558
6-3
transformer enclosures
6-7 to 6-8
BS 6480
5-1, 5-15; 12-5
BS EN 62271
5-1
see also Space requirements
BS 6500
8-9
BS ISO 3046-1
4-5, 4-9
Active power
3-1, 3-2
BS 6553
5-1
Buffer operation, batteries
9-20 to 9-21
Air conditioning
3-3, 3-5; 9-14, 9-25
BS 6622
5-1; 12-5
Building management systems
8-18; 9-4, 9-11,
see also Cooling; Heating; Ventilation
BS 6626
5-1, 5-17
9-26; 11-6
Alarms
8-2, 8-18; 9-11, 9-26
BS 6651
10-1, 10-12
Building Regulations 2000
2-1 to 2; 7-8
Alternators
4-5 to 4-6, 4-9 to 4-10;
BS 6701: Part 1
10-11
Building Standards (Scotland) Regulations
9-6, 9-13, 9-14
BS 6878
5-1
2-1
Aluminium
8-6; 10-5; 11-7
BS 7197
5-1
Building wiring systems
8-1 to 8-24
Apparent power
3-1, 3-2; 4-6
BS 7211
8-9
Buried cables
2-2; 8-5, 8-9, 8-12, 8-13
Arc quenching
7-5
BS 7315
5-1
Busbars
8-2, 8-3, 8-16 to 8-17,
Armouring see Cable armouring
BS 7361
10-1, 10-5
8-22 to 8-23
ATEX Directive
8-19
BS 7430
4-3; 10-1, 10-3, 10-4, 10-12
high voltage systems
5-6, 5-7; 12-4
Authorised persons
4-6; 5-4, 5-14, 5-15
BS 7452
6-3
low voltage systems
7-2, 7-3, 7-6,
to 5-16; 12-3
BS 7628
6-3
7-8, 7-9; 12-5
Autotransformers
6-3, 6-7; 7-2
BS 7629
8-7
UPS
9-11, 9-12, 9-13
Availability, electricity supply
9-8 to 9-9
BS 7671
2-1, 2-2
Bypassing
7-8; 9-3 to 9-4, 9-10 to
busbars
8-17
9-11, 9-12, 9-13
Balanced voltage relays
5-13
cabling
8-3, 8-5, 8-7, 8-11, 8-19
Balancing, loads
7-5; 8-3
circuits
8-1, 8-2
Cable armouring
5-14; 8-9
Band I and Band II voltages
8-1 to 8-2
colour-coding
8-3 to 8-4
buried cables
8-5
Barriers
4-6; 11-7; 12-3
CPCs
10-7
cable glands
8-11, 8-13
see also Enclosures
earthing
8-21; 10-1, 10-3, 10-11;
CPCs
8-9, 8-11, 8-21; 10-5, 10-6,
Base kV·A value
5-9
12-3
10-9, 10-11, 10-12
Basic restrictions, non-ionising radiation
Guidance Notes
8-2, 8-5
data processing installations
11-10
IEC 364 and
2-3
10-11
Batteries
4-5, 4-10, 4-11; 5-18;
inspection and testing
8-21 to 8-22;
earthing arrangements
8-9, 8-21; 10-4,
9-15 to 9-23
12-1, 12-2, 12-3, 12-5, 12-7
10-5, 10-7, 10-11, 10-12
Battery-backed diesel supported rotary UPS
lightning protection systems
single core cables
8-10
9-6 to 9-7, 9-26
10-12
Cable ducts
8-5, 8-19
Battery supported rotary UPS
9-5 to 9-6,
low voltage systems
7-1, 7-4, 7-10
Cable glands
8-10 to 8-11, 8-13,
9-11, 9-14
protective device operation
8-20
8-14, 8-15
Bending radius, cables
8-10 to 8-11,
voltages
1-2; 8-1 to 8-2; 10-8
Cable supports
8-15, 8-16, 8-21
8-12
BS 7735
6-3
Cable trenches
4-3; 5-5; 7-9 to 7-10;
Bonding
8-20, 8-21; 10-1, 10-2,
BS 7821
6-3, 6-7
8-5, 8-19; 10-4
10-8 to 10-9
BS 7835
5-1
Cables
8-1 to 8-16, 8-17 to 8-19
earth electrodes
10-4
BS 7844
6-3
clean earths
10-11
earthing grids
10-11
BS 7846
8-7
data processing installations
earthing terminals
10-5, 10-8
BS 7919
8-9
10-11; 11-8
inspection and testing
10-14; 12-2,
BS 8434: Part 1
8-7
fault calculations
5-10
12-3, 12-6
BS EN 81-72
8-18
fault protection
5-5, 5-13, 5-14; 8-5
lightning protection
10-12
BS EN 12845
8-18
harmonics
3-4; 8-20
metal pipework
10-4, 10-5, 10-8
BS EN 50174
11-5 to 11-6
high voltage systems
5-2, 5-4, 5-5,
touch voltages and
10-8, 10-10 to
BS EN 50187
5-1
5-14 to 5-15; 8-5, 8-12
10-11
BS EN 50200
8-7
to 8-13; 12-4 to 12-5
Bonding conductors
8-21; 10-6, 10-12;
BS EN 60034-2
4-5, 4-9
inspection and testing
5-14 to 5-15;
12-2, 12-3, 12-6
BS EN 60044-1
5-1, 5-8; 6-3
8-6; 12-2, 12-4 to 12-5,
Booster transformers
6-3, 6-7
BS EN 60076
6-2, 6-3, 6-5
12-6
British Energy
4-1
BS EN 60079: Part 10
8-19, 8-20
installation
8-10 to 8-12, 8-20, 8-22
British Wind Energy Association
4-5
BS EN 60129
5-1, 5-7
insulation
5-14 to 5-15; 8-5,
BS 159
5-1
BS EN 60255
5-1
8-6 to 8-7, 8-8, 8-9,
BS 171
6-3
BS EN 60265
5-1, 5-9
8-10, 8-12 to 8-13
BS 923
5-1
BS EN 60282
5-1
lighting circuits
8-3 to 8-4, 8-6,
BS 3535
6-3; 10-14
BS EN 60298
5-1
8-9, 8-10, 8-21
BS 3811
5-17
BS EN 60309-2
10-11
non-ionising radiation
11-8
BS 3941
5-1, 5-7; 6-3
BS EN 60420
5-1
overseas installations
8-7, 8-8 to 8-9,
BS 4293
12-4
BS EN 60439-1
7-2
8-20, 8-22
BS 4343
10-11
BS EN 60470
5-1
power losses
4-1 to 4-2; 5-1, 5-2
BS 4568: Part 1
8-14
BS EN 60529
6-7; 7-6; 12-3
ring circuits
5-4; 8-3
BS 4678
8-13, 8-14
BS EN 60644
5-1
separation
8-2; 11-8, 11-9
BS 5000: Part 3
4-5, 4-9
BS EN 60694
5-1
sub-mains
8-2, 8-9, 8-18 to 8-19, 8-22
BS 5207
5-1
BS EN 60702-1
8-7
substations
4-3; 5-6
BS 5266-1
8-18
BS EN 60726
6-3
switchgear
5-15; 7-1, 7-8 to 7-9;
BS 5306-2
8-18
BS EN 60742
6-3; 10-14
8-10, 8-18 to 8-19
BS 5311
5-1, 5-6, 5-8
BS EN 60947-1
8-11
transformers
6-5, 6-7; 8-10
BS 5588-5
8-18
BS EN 61000-6
11-4 to 11-5
UPS
9-11, 9-13
I-2
Electricity in buildings
voltages
4-6; 5-2, 5-15; 8-4 to
Compression lugs
8-11, 8-12
Crest factors
9-3, 9-5, 9-7, 9-8, 9-9,
8-5, 8-8
Computers see Data processing installations
9-10, 9-11
Conductors
8-6
Cross-linked polyethylene (XLPE) insulation
see also Buried cables; Conductors;
cable identification
8-8, 8-9
8-6, 8-9
Electromagnetic compatibility (EMC);
final circuits
7-1; 8-2
Current transformers
5-7 to 5-8, 5-12; 12-4
Multicore cables; Overhead cables
impedance data
10-9
Cathodic protection
10-5
inspection and testing
12-1, 12-2,
Data processing installations
11-6
CE mark
11-2, 11-3
12-3, 12-5, 12-6 to 12-7
cables
10-11; 11-8
Ceiling trunking
8-17, 8-23
lighting circuits
8-4
earthing
10-3
CENELEC (Comité Europeéan de
MI cables
8-7
harmonics
3-3
Normalisation Electrotechnique)
11-2
multicore cables
8-7, 8-9
load assessment
3-2; 4-5, 4-6
Central Electricity Generating Board
4-1
non-linear loads
4-6
standby generation
4-3
Certification
4-6; 7-10; 8-22; 12-7, 12-8
thermosetting plastic cables
8-12
see also Electromagnetic compatibility;
see also Declarations of conformity (DOCs)
Office buildings; Uninterruptible power
UPS
9-11
CHP (combined heat and power) systems
4-3,
see also Bonding conductors; Busbars;
supplies
4-4
Cables; Circuit protective conductors
Declarations of conformity (DOCs)
11-1,
CIBSE Guide A: Environmental design
3-2
(
11-2, 11-3
CPCs); Conduit; Earthing conductors;
CIBSE Guide D: Transportation systems in
Neutral conductors; Trunking
Dedicated UPS
9-2 to 9-3, 9-9 to 9-10,
buildings
3-3
Conduit
8-10, 8-14 to 8-15, 8-17,
9-24
CIBSE Guide F: Energy efficiency in buildings
8-21, 8-22; 10-7
Delta-star connections
6-1, 6-2, 6-3,
4-4
Confined Spaces Regulations 1997
2-3
6-5
CIBSE Lighting Guides
3-2
Connected loads
3-1, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5
see also Star connections
Cinemas
8-19
Connection boxes
8-17 to 8-18
Demand factor
3-1, 3-4, 3-5
Circuit breakers
see also Junction boxes
Demand load see Loads, assessment;
battery racks
9-16
Connections
6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-5,
Maximum demand
high voltage systems
5-4, 5-5, 5-6 to
6-7; 7-2; 10-12
Diagrams see Documentation
5-7, 5-8, 5-12 to 5-13, 5-14, 5-18
Diesel oil-fired generators
4-6, 4-7, 4-8;
see also Earthing; Joints; Terminals;
low voltage systems
5-14; 7-4
Terminations
9-2, 9-13, 9-23
UPS
9-4, 9-11, 9-12
Diesel oil storage
4-8; 9-11
Construction (Design and Management)
see also Miniature circuit breakers
Diesel supported
Regulations 1994
2-1, 2-3
UPS
9-4, 9-6 to 9-7, 9-11,
(MCBs); Moulded case circuit breakers
9-15, 9-16, 9-26
Consumer Protection Act 1987
2-1
Circuit protective conductors (CPCs)
Discrimination
5-10 to 5-11; 7-7, 7-8;
Contactors
7-2
8-20; 10-6 to 10-8
9-13
Containment systems
8-1, 8-5, 8-13 to
busbars
8-16, 8-17
Distribution
2-2; 7-5; 8-3; 9-7,
8-15; 10-6
cable armouring
8-9, 8-11, 8-21; 10-5,
9-12, 9-13
see also Conduit; Enclosures;
10-6, 10-9, 10-11, 10-12
see also Circuits; Power distribution
Trunking
colour-coding
8-4
units (PDUs)
Control of Asbestos at Work Regulations 2002
conduit
8-14, 8-21; 10-7
Distribution boards
7-3, 7-4; 8-2, 8-3
2-3
data processing installations
Distribution cables
8-9
Control of Lead at Work Regulations 2002
2-3
10-11
Distribution Code of the Public Electricity
Control of Substances Hazardous to Health
definition
10-2
Suppliers of England and Wales
10-1,
Regulations 2002
2-1, 2-3
earth fault loop impedance
10-2, 10-7,
10-4
Controls
10-11, 10-12; 12-3
Distribution substations
5-2, 5-5, 5-6
commissioning
4-10
high voltage supplies
10-4
Distribution transformers
6-5 to 6-6
electromagnetic compatibility
inspection and testing
12-2, 12-3, 12-6
Disturbance categories
11-5
11-10 to 11-12
lighting circuits
8-21
Diversity
3-4 to 3-5
harmonics
3-3, 3-4
multicore cables
10-6, 10-11
DOCs (declarations of conformity)
11-1,
inspection and testing
12-4
remote installations
10-12
11-2, 11-3
lifts
3-3
single core cables
8-21
Documentation
lighting
7-10
trunking
8-21
buried cables
2-2
mains signalling
8-20
see also Earthing; Protective conductor
electromagnetic compatibility
11-3
multiple generators
4-3, 4-7
currents
to 11-4
oversized equipment
3-5
Circuits
7-1; 8-1 to 8-4, 8-5,
generators
4-10, 4-11
8-14; 12-2 to 12-3
UPS
9-11 to 9-12, 9-16, 9-25,
inspection and testing
12-1, 12-2,
9-26 to 9-27
see also Final circuits; Lighting
12-6, 12-7 to 12-8
circuits; Radial circuits; Ring
see also Contactors; Protective devices;
low voltage systems
7-10
circuits; Short circuits; Sub-mains
Relays; Switchgear
substations
5-16
Circulating current relays
5-13
Cookers
3-4; 8-3, 8-9
UPS
9-25
Clean earths
10-6, 10-11; 11-8
Cooling
see also Certification; Declarations
Clearances see Separation
generators
4-7 to 4-8
of conformity (DOCs); Permits to work;
Closed ring mains
5-4 to 5-5
load assessment
3-3, 3-5
Warning notices
Closing mechanisms, circuit breakers
5-8
transformers
6-4
Domestic installations
4-2; 8-3 to 8-4,
Code for lighting
3-2
UPS
9-4, 9-11, 9-15, 9-23
8-9, 8-22
Codes see Standards
see also Ventilation
Doors
4-8; 5-6; 6-7 to 6-8; 7-10
Colour-coding
8-3 to 8-4
Copper
8-6; 10-4, 10-5 to 10-6,
Drop rods
8-15 to 8-16
see also Identification
10-9; 11-7
Ducts
8-5, 8-19
Combined conductors
10-4, 10-12
Copper losses
6-2
Duty cycles see Loads
Combined heat and power (CHP) systems
Core losses
6-6
4-3, 4-4
Corrosion
4-8; 7-5; 8-13, 8-16; 10-5
Earth electrodes
10-4 to 10-5
Commissioning
4-9 to 4-10; 7-10;
Costs
generators
10-12
9-23 to 9-25
generator sizing
4-5 to 4-6
inspection and testing
5-18; 10-13 to
Communications installations
4-3; 8-2; 10-11;
low voltage switchgear
7-3
10-14; 12-3
11-6, 11-8
private generation
4-4, 4-7
lightning protection systems
Competent persons
5-16; 12-1, 12-3,
UPS
9-2, 9-6, 9-7, 9-10
10-11
12-6, 12-7
voltage systems
4-6; 5-2
remote installations
10-12
Index
I-3
TT systems
10-3
see also Standby generators;
see also Circuit breakers; Earthing; Unit
Earth fault currents see Fault currents
Uninterruptible power supplies; Voltages
protection
Earth fault loop impedance
8-20 to 8-21;
Electricity transmission
4-1 to 4-2; 5-1
Fault protection
5-5, 5-8, 5-9 to 5-14;
10-3
Electrics in buildings
12-8
7-1, 7-7 to 7-10; 10-13; 12-3
CPCs
10-2, 10-7, 10-11, 10-12; 12-3
Electrodes see Earth electrodes
see also Discrimination; Earth fault
earth electrodes
10-4
protection; Earthing; Isolation;
fault currents and
10-9 to 10-11
Electromagnetic compatibility (EMC)
Overcurrent protection; Uninterruptible
inspection and testing
10-13, 10-14;
8-20; 9-10, 9-12;
power supplies
12-3 to 12-4, 12-5 to 12-6
11-1 to 13
Feed units, busbars
8-17
public supplies
10-4
Electromagnetic Compatibility
Fencing
4-3
touch voltages
10-7
Regulations 1992
2-1, 2-3; 11-1,
Ferro-resonant transformers
9-3, 9-10
Earth fault protection
5-13; 8-20; 10-6
11-2 to 4
Filters
cables
5-14; 8-5
Embedded operation see Parallel operation
load levels
9-12
testing
10-13; 12-3, 12-4
Emergency exits
5-6; 7-9
maintenance
4-11; 9-14
see also Earthing conductors
Emergency generators see Standby generators
off-line UPS
9-2, 9-3
Earth paths, parallel
12-2, 12-3
Emergency lighting circuits
8-2, 8-18
specification
3-4; 9-10, 9-13
Earthed equipotential bonding see Bonding
Emergency systems
8-18
static UPS
9-11
Earthing
8-9, 8-20 to 8-21;
see also Fire precautions
thyristor UPS
9-3, 9-4
10-1 to 10-14
Enclosures
transistorised UPS
9-5
health and safety
5-17; 10-1
cable joints
8-12
triport UPS
9-2
high voltage systems
4-6; 5-7, 5-18;
earthing
10-4
see also Harmonics
10-4, 10-5, 10-13
electromagnetic compatibility (
Final circuits
7-1; 8-2 to 8-4, 8-22
EMC)
inspection and testing
5-18; 10-13 to
11-6 to 11-7
cable sizing
8-5
10-14; 12-1, 12-2, 12-3
generators
4-7, 4-8
CPCs
10-7
to 12-4, 12-5 to 12-6
inspection and testing
5-18; 12-3, 12-6
inspection and testing
12-2, 12-3, 12-7
oil switches
5-7
single core cables
8-10
low voltage switchgear
7-2 to 7-3
substations
4-3; 5-6
Fire precautions
8-18
substations
4-2, 4-3
transformers
6-7; 10-4, 10-12
alarm circuits
8-2, 8-18
transformers
6-7 to 6-8
see also Circuit protective conductors
inspection and testing
12-2, 12-6
see also Barriers; Containment systems
(CPCs)
substations
4-3; 5-18
Engineering Recommendation G5/4
3-3;
Earthing conductors
10-2, 10-4,
switchrooms
7-10
9-10, 9-12, 9-13 to 9-14
10-5 to 10-6
transformers
6-6
Engineering Recommendation G59/1
4-4;
colour-coding
8-4
UPS
9-11, 9-14, 9-23, 9-25, 9-26
10-1
inspection and testing
10-14; 12-2,
Fire-resistant cables
8-7
Engineering Technical Report ETR113
4-4;
12-3, 12-6
Fixed installations, EMC Regulations
11-3
10-1
see also Earth fault protection
Flat twin and earth cables
8-4, 8-6, 8-9,
Engines see Prime movers
Earthing grids
10-11
8-22
Entertainment buildings
8-19
Earthing terminals
10-6
Flexible cables and cords
8-2, 8-9 to 8-10,
Environmental factors
4-5, 4-8; 5-6;
bonding to
10-5, 10-8
8-23
7-5 to 7-6; 8-5; 9-6, 9-14 to 9-15
definition
10-2
busbars and
8-16
see also Temperature
earth electrodes and
10-4
colour-coding
8-4
Environments
functional and clean earths
10-11
glands
8-11
electromagnetic compatibility
11-4
generators
10-12
inspection and testing
12-6
to 11-5, 11-9 to 11-10
testing
12-6
prefabricated wiring
8-17
see also Hazardous environments
Easements
4-3
Flexible conductors
8-6
Equipotential bonding see Bonding
Electrak
8-17
Flexible conduit
8-10, 8-14 to 8-15, 8-17
Electrical Equipment (Safety) Regulations
Essential loads
7-5
Float voltage compensation
9-19 to 9-20
1994
2-1
Ethylene propylene rubber (EPR) insulation
Floors
5-6; 7-9; 8-22; 9-15; 10-11; 12-3
Electrical installation certificates
12-7
8-6
see also Underfloor busbars; Underfloor
Electrical interference see Electromagnetic
heating cables
compatibility (
European Committee for Electrotechnical
EMC); Harmonics
Free-standing UPS
9-3 to 9-4, 9-10 to 9-11
Electricity Act 1989
2-1, 2-2; 4-1
Standardisation see CENELEC
Fuels
4-4, 4-8; 9-11
Electricity at Work Regulations 1989
2-1,
European Committee for Standardisation
Functional earthing
10-6, 10-11; 12-6
2-2
see CEN
Fuse switches
5-4, 5-7, 5-9, 5-18
earthing
10-1
European Directives
2-3; 8-19; 9-12;
see also High rupturing capacity (HRC)
electricity supply
4-6, 4-10
11-1 to 4
fuses; Ring main units
high voltage distribution systems
5-15,
European practices see Overseas installations
Fuses
7-3 to 7-4
5-17
European Standards see Standards
see also High rupturing capacity (HRC)
maintenance
5-17; 12-1
Expansion joints, busbars
8-17
fuses
test instruments
12-8
Exposure limits, non-ionising radiation
11-9
Electricity Council
4-1
to 11-10, 11-11
Galvanic effects
9-2, 9-7; 10-5
Electricity Safety, Quality and Continuity
External environment, electromagnetic
Gas turbines
4-3, 4-4, 4-7
Regulations 2002
2-1, 2-2, 2-3;
compatibility (EMC)
11-9 to 11-10
Gelled electrolyte cells
9-17
4-2, 4-3; 5-6
External substations
4-3; 5-6
Generators
4-3 to 4-11; 7-8; 8-6; 10-12
Electricity (Standards of Performance)
Extra-low voltages
1-2; 8-1; 12-2, 12-3
to 10-13
Regulations 2001
2-1, 2-2
see also Alternators; Diesel oil-fired
Electricity supply
4-1 to 4-11
Fault currents
10-3, 10-6 to 10-7
generators; Electricity supply; Standby
availability
9-8 to 9-9
calculation
5-9 to 5-10; 6-5, 6-6;
generators
cables
8-9, 8-18 to 8-19
10-9 to 10-11
Glands
8-10 to 8-11, 8-13, 8-14, 8-15
earthing
10-4
generators
4-6; 10-13
Regional Electricity Companies (RECs)
high voltage cable sizing
8-13
Hangars
8-15 to 8-16
4-2 to 4-3; 5-1 to 5-2
inspection and testing
12-3
Harmonics
3-3 to 3-4; 8-20
separation
8-19
low voltage systems
5-10; 10-13
multiple generators
10-12 to 10-13
testing
7-10; 12-1
steelwork corrosion
10-5
neutral currents
3-3, 3-4; 6-2
voltages
4-2; 5-1; 6-6
transformers
5-9, 5-10; 6-5
non-linear loads
4-6
I-4
Electricity in buildings
rotary UPS
9-5, 9-6, 9-7
ICNIRP (International Commission on
International Commission on Non-Ionising
static UPS
9-2, 9-3, 9-4, 9-10, 9-11,
Non-Ionising Radiation Protection)
Radiation Protection (ICNIRP)
11-9,
9-15
11-9, 11-10
11-10
transformers
3-4; 6-2
Identification
transistorised UPS
9-5
cables
8-8 to 8-9
International standards see Standards
UPS
3-3; 9-10, 9-11, 9-12,
hazardous areas
8-19
Intertripping
5-14; 12-4, 12-5
9-13, 9-14, 9-24
test instruments
12-8
Inverse definite minimum time (IDMT) relays
see also Filters
see also Colour-coding; Warning notices
5-11, 5-12 to 5-13
Harmonisation Directives
2-3
IEC 60255
5-1
Iron losses
6-2
Hazardous environments
7-5 to 7-6;
IEC 60354
6-3, 6-6
ISO 3
6-5
8-19 to 8-20
IEC 60364
10-7
Isolation
5-15; 7-1, 7-8; 10-12 to 10-13;
Health and safety
IEC 60905
6-3, 6-6
11-8; 12-1, 12-3
earthing
5-17; 10-1
IEC 60909
6-5
Isolation devices
5-3, 5-7; 7-1 to 7-2,
electricity generation
4-3, 4-10
IEC 61000-2-5
11-5
7-8; 12-2, 12-7
high voltage systems
5-15 to 5-17
IT equipment and cables see Data processing
inspection and testing
12-1, 12-6, 12-8
IEE Guidance Note 3: Inspection and
installations
legislation
2-1 to 3
testing
12-1, 12-2 to 12-3, 12-5,
substations
5-6
12-6, 12-8
Joints
8-11 to 8-12, 8-14, 8-16, 8-17, 8-18
UPS
9-25
IEE Wiring Regulations see BS 7671
Junction boxes
8-3, 8-12
voltage system selection
4-6
Impedance
5-9 to 5-10; 6-6 to
see also Emergency exits; Emergency
6-7; 8-5; 9-10; 10-9 to 10-11; 11-8
Kinetic energy diesel supported
systems; Hazardous environments;
see also Earth fault loop impedance
rotary UPS
9-6, 9-16, 9-26
Protection; Warning notices
In-room UPS
9-2 to 9-3, 9-9 to 9-10, 9-24
Health and Safety at Work etc. Act 1974
2-1,
In-rush currents
5-12
Lead-acid batteries
9-15, 9-16 to 9-17, 9-18,
2-2; 4-10
Industrial buildings
8-22
9-19, 9-21, 9-22
Health and Safety (Safety Signs and Signals)
Life expectancy, cables
8-6
cables
8-5
Regulations 1996
2-1, 2-2
Life safety systems
8-18
electromagnetic environments
11-5
Heat generation
see also Fire precautions
lighting
3-5
cables
8-5
Lifting beams, substations
5-6
low voltage switchgear
7-1
low voltage switchgear
7-7
Lifts
3-3; 8-18
voltages
4-2; 6-6; 7-5
substations
4-3
Lighting
Ingress protection (IP) rating
6-7; 7-6; 8-11,
transformers
5-6; 6-2, 6-4, 6-6
controls
7-10
8-13, 8-14; 12-3
UPS
9-4, 9-10
diversity
3-4, 3-5
Initial verification
7-10; 8-22; 12-1 to 12-6
see also Power losses; Temperature
electromagnetic compatibility
11-8
Inspection and testing
8-21 to 8-22;
Heating
harmonics
3-3
12-1 to 12-9
load assessment
3-3, 3-5; 4-5
loads
3-2, 3-3, 3-5; 4-5, 4-6; 7-5
bonding
10-14; 12-2, 12-3, 12-6
miniature circuit breakers (MCBs)
7-4
miniature circuit breakers (MCBs)
7-4
cables
5-14 to 5-15; 8-6; 12-2,
off-site electricity supplies
4-2
substations
5-6
12-4 to 12-5, 12-6
on-site generation
4-3, 4-5
switchrooms
7-10
earthing
5-18; 10-13 to 10-14;
substations
5-6
trunking systems
8-17
12-1, 12-2, 12-3 to 12-4, 12-5 to 12-6
see also Combined heat and power (CHP)
Lighting circuits
8-2, 8-3 to 8-4, 8-18,
electricity supply
7-10; 12-1
systems; Trace heating cables; Underfloor
8-22, 8-23
enclosures
5-18; 12-3, 12-6
heating cables
cables
8-3 to 8-4, 8-6, 8-9, 8-10,
fault protection
10-13; 12-3
High rupturing capacity (HRC) fuses
5-7,
8-21
generators
4-8 to 4-10
5-11 to 5-12; 7-3, 7-4
CPCs
8-21
high voltage systems
5-14 to 5-15,
High voltage systems
5-1 to 5-19
inspection and testing
12-2 to 12-3
5-17, 5-18; 12-4 to 12-5
cables
5-2, 5-4, 5-5, 5-14 to
prefabricated wiring systems
8-18
insulation
5-14 to 5-15; 7-10;
5-15; 8-5, 8-12 to 8-13; 12-4 to 12-5
Lightning protection
10-11 to 10-12
12-2, 12-3, 12-4, 12-5, 12-7
CPCs
10-4
Live conductors
4-6; 8-4; 12-1, 12-3
isolation during
5-15; 12-3
earthing
4-6; 5-7, 5-18; 10-4, 10-5,
Load centres
5-2; 7-1, 7-3, 7-4 to 7-5,
low voltage systems
7-10; 12-1 to
10-13
7-6, 7-9
12-9
inspection and testing
5-14 to 5-15,
Load factor
3-1 to 3-2
5-17, 5-18; 12-4 to 12-5
residual current devices (RCDs)
Load losses
6-6
selection
4-6
10-14; 12-3 to 12-4, 12-7
Loads
substations
4-2; 5-2, 5-3, 5-4,
switchgear
4-9; 5-15; 12-2, 12-4,
assessment
3-1 to 3-5; 4-3, 4-5 to 4-6
5-5 to 5-6
12-5, 12-6, 12-7
balancing
7-5; 8-3
switchgear
4-2; 5-3 to 5-9, 5-10,
transformers
5-18; 6-8; 12-5
battery charger selection
9-22
5-12, 5-17, 5-18; 12-4
UPS
9-23 to 9-25
calculation
3-3
tariffs
4-2
warning notices
5-15; 12-2, 12-6
characteristics
4-5, 4-6; 7-4, 7-5
transformers
5-3, 5-6, 5-7 to 5-8,
see also Maintenance; Type tests
generators
4-3, 4-5 to 4-6, 4-9 to 4-10;
5-12; 6-2
Insulation
7-5
voltages
1-2; 5-1 to 5-2
cables
5-14 to 5-15; 8-5, 8-6 to
HRC fuse selection
5-12
High voltages, definition
1-2; 8-1
8-7, 8-8, 8-9, 8-10, 8-12 to 8-13
lighting
3-2, 3-3, 3-5; 4-5, 4-6; 7-5
Hospital equipment
earthing terminals
10-6
motors
3-3; 4-5, 4-6
electromagnetic compatibility
11-2,
fire detection and alarm cables
8-18
National Grid
4-2
11-10
floors
12-3
prime movers
4-4 to 4-6
load characteristics
4-5; 7-4, 7-5
high voltage systems
5-2, 5-14 to
transformers
6-2, 6-6
low voltage systems
7-3, 7-4, 7-5,
5-15
see also Maximum demand; Non-linear
7-6, 7-7
incoming metalwork
10-8
loads; Overloading; Peak lopping; Small
HSE Guidance Note GS 38: Electrical test
inspection and testing
5-14 to 5-15;
power loads; Uninterruptible power
equipment for use by electricians
12-3,
7-10; 12-2, 12-3, 12-4, 12-5, 12-7
supplies
12-8
transformers
6-4
Log books see Documentation
HVCA Standard Maintenance Specification
Insulation level, circuit breakers
5-8
Losses see Power losses
for Mechanical Services in Buildings
12-8
Intake substations
5-2, 5-5
Low smoke and fume (LSF) insulation
8-6,
Hybrid cells
9-17
Interlinking see Bonding
8-7, 8-9, 8-18
Index
I-5
Low smoke, zero halogen (LS0H) insulation
Mobile generating sets
4-4
Office buildings
3-1, 3-2 to 3-3, 3-5;
8-7, 8-9, 8-18
Modular wiring systems
8-17 to 8-18,
8-22; 9-23; 11-4 to 11-5
Low Voltage Directive
2-3
8-23
see also Data processing installations;
Low voltage systems
7-1 to 7-10;
Modules
Electromagnetic compatibility (EMC)
12-1 to 12-9
UPS
9-8 to 9-9
Office for the Regulation of Electricity and Gas
circuit breakers
5-14; 7-4
see also Parallel UPS
(OFREG)
4-1
earth electrodes
10-5
Monitoring
Office of Gas and Electricity Markets
fault currents
5-10; 10-13
UPS
9-11, 9-12, 9-25 to 9-26
(OFGEM)
2-2; 4-1
maintenance
5-18; 7-9
see also Building management systems;
Oil spills
4-8; 5-6
off-site supplies
4-2
Metering
Oil switches
5-7, 5-18
protective devices
5-11; 7-1 to 7-2,
Motors
3-3, 3-4; 4-5, 4-6; 6-2; 7-2; 8-20
see also Circuit breakers; Fuse switches;
7-3 to 7-4, 7-7 to 7-8
Moulded case circuit breakers (MCCBs)
Ring main units
selection
4-6
5-11; 7-4
On-line UPS
9-2 to 9-3, 9-5, 9-7, 9-9,
substations
4-2, 4-3; 5-6; 7-1
Moveable installations, EMC Regulations 11-3
9-10
transformers
6-2; 7-4
Moving-coil transformers
6-7
On-site generation
4-3 to 4-11
voltages
1-2; 4-6; 5-2; 7-5; 8-1 to
Multi-compartment trunking
8-14
see also Generators
8-2
Multi-module UPS see Parallel UPS
One second short circuit rating
8-13
Low voltages, definition
1-2
Multicore cables
8-7 to 8-10
Open conduit
8-15
busbars
8-17
Open connections, transformers
6-5
Main circuits
7-1
cable glands
8-11
Open ring mains
5-4
Mains signalling
8-20
cable support
8-15
Operation
4-7, 4-10 to 4-11; 5-17 to
Maintenance
12-7 to 12-8
circuit protective conductors
10-6,
5-18; 9-25 to 9-27; 10-12; 11-4;
air conditioning
9-14
10-11
12-7 to 12-8
batteries
4-11; 5-18; 9-15
colour-coding
8-3 to 8-4
Operation and maintenance manuals
circuit breakers
5-18
earthing
8-21
see Documentation
electromagnetic compatibility
11-6
flexible conductors
8-6
Overcurrent protection
filters
4-11; 9-14
harmonics
3-4
high voltage systems
5-5, 5-8, 5-10
generators
4-3, 4-6, 4-7, 4-10 to 4-11
hazardous areas
8-20
inspection and testing
12-4, 12-7
high voltage systems
5-17 to 5-18
junction boxes
8-12
inverse definite minimum time (IDMT)
Regional Electricity Companies (RECs)
lighting circuits
8-3, 8-6
relays
5-12
4-6
open conduit
8-15
low voltage systems
7-1, 7-7
switchgear
5-18; 7-9
sub-main circuits
8-2
non-linear loads
4-6
transformers
5-18
underground
8-5
see also Circuit breakers; Fault protection;
UPS
9-2, 9-4, 9-11, 9-12, 9-13, 9-23,
Multiple generators
4-3, 4-7, 4-10; 10-12
Residual current devices (RCDs); Trip coils
9-25 to 9-27
to 10-13
Overhead cables
2-2
see also Inspection and testing
see also Parallel operation
Overloading
4-6; 7-1, 7-7; 8-2; 9-3, 9-24
Maintenance manuals see Documentation
Overseas installations
Management of Health and Safety at Work
Naming see Identification
cables
8-7, 8-8 to 8-9, 8-20, 8-22
Regulations 1999
2-1, 2-3
National Grid
4-1, 4-2, 4-4; 6-1
conduit
8-15
Mass impregnated non-draining (MIND)
National Power
4-1
load assessment standards
3-4
cables
8-13
Network protection systems see Unit
transformers
6-6
Maximum current rating
8-5, 8-7
protection
wiring systems
8-3, 8-4, 8-5
Maximum demand
Neutral conductors
assessment
3-1 to 3-2, 3-3
busbars
8-16
Packaged substations
5-6
definition
3-1
Paper insulated cables (
diversity
3-4, 3-5
cables
8-9
PILC)
8-13
Parallel earth paths
12-2, 12-3
electricity supply
4-2
colour-coding
8-4
heating loads
3-5
earthing
10-3, 10-12; 12-4, 12-5
Parallel on-line UPS
9-2, 9-6 to 9-7, 9-11, 9-14
inspection and testing
12-1
loads
4-6
Parallel operation
4-7; 9-20; 10-12
metering
3-2; 7-8
UPS
9-13
see also Multiple generators
transformers
6-2
Neutral connections, transformers
6-7
Parallel UPS
9-8, 9-9, 9-11 to 9-12, 9-16,
see also Loads, assessment
Neutral currents, harmonics
3-3, 3-4; 6-2
9-25, 9-26
Maximum demand tariff
4-2, 4-7
Nickel-cadmium batteries
9-15, 9-17 to
Pasted plate cells
9-17
Maximum earth fault currents
10-6
9-19, 9-21
Pasted rod or plate lead-acid batteries
9-15,
Mean down time (
No-load losses
6-6
9-16 to 9-17
MDT
9-1, 9-8 to 9-9
Mean time between failures (
Noise and noise control
Peak lopping
4-3, 4-4, 4-7; 9-21
MTBF)
9-1,
9-4, 9-5 to 9-6, 9-8 to 9-9, 9-10
busbars
8-16
Percentage impedance
5-9 to 5-10; 6-6
Medical equipment see Hospital equipment
generators
4-5, 4-8, 4-9, 4-10
to 6-7
Memorandum of Guidance on the Electricity at
transformers
6-8
Permits to work
4-6; 5-16, 5-17, 5-18; 12-1
Work Regulations 1989
2-2
UPS
9-3, 9-10, 9-11, 9-15, 9-23, 9-24
Phase angles
6-5
Metal clad (MC) cables
8-10, 8-17
Non-essential loads
7-5
Pinch screw terminals
8-11
Metal conduit
8-14, 8-21, 8-22; 10-7
Non-ionising radiation
11-8, 11-9 to
Pipes and pipework
8-5; 9-23; 10-4, 10-5, 10-8
Metal pipework
10-4, 10-5, 10-8
11-10, 11-11
Plane wave power flux density (PFD)
11-9
see also Service pipes
Non-linear loads
4-5, 4-6; 9-3, 9-5, 9-7, 9-24
Planté lead-acid batteries
9-15, 9-16
Metals
10-4, 10-5, 10-6; 11-7
Normal current, circuit breakers
5-8
Plastic conduit
8-14
see also Aluminium; Copper; Corrosion;
Northern Ireland Electricity
4-1
Plastic trunking
8-14, 8-18
Steel; Zinc
Notching
3-3
Plugs
8-3, 8-17 to 8-18
Metalwork, insulation
10-8
Notices see Warning notices
see also Socket outlets
Metering
3-2; 7-1, 7-8; 9-25 to 9-26
Nuclear Electric
4-1
Pocket plate cells
9-17
Mineral insulated (MI) cables
8-6 to 8-7, 8-10,
Occupational exposure limits, non-ionising
Polarity, testing
12-2 to 12-3, 12-5, 12-6
8-12, 8-18
radiation
11-9 to 11-10,
Polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs)
6-4
Mini trunking
8-14
11-11
Polyethylene insulation
8-6
Miniature circuit breakers (MCBs)
7-3,
Occupiers Liability Acts
2-1
Polyvinyl chloride (PVC) insulation
7-4; 9-4
Off-line UPS
9-2, 9-3, 9-9 to 9-10
8-6, 8-9
Mixed battery systems
9-19
Off-site electricity supply
4-1 to 4-3
Pool, the
4-2
I-6
Electricity in buildings
Power demands see Loads, assessment;
Reference levels, non-ionising radiation
11-9,
see also Circuit breakers; Fault currents
Maximum demand
11-10, 11-11
Signs see Warning notices
Power distribution units (PDUs)
9-2, 9-4, 9-10,
Regenerative effects
4-6
Silicones, transformer cooling
6-4
9-13, 9-23
Regional Electricity Companies (RECs)
4-1
Single core cables
8-10, 8-22
Power factor
3-2, 3-5; 9-8, 9-11
earthing arrangements
10-4
busbars
8-17
Power losses
4-1 to 4-2; 5-1,
electricity supply
4-2 to 4-3; 5-1
cable support
8-15
5-2; 6-2, 6-6
to 5-2
CPCs
8-21
see also Heat generation; Uninterruptible
private generation
4-3 to 4-4, 4-7
flexible conductors
8-6
power supplies
switching and maintenance operations
hazardous areas
8-20
Power supply see Electricity supply
4-6; 5-5
lighting circuits
8-3, 8-10
PowerGen
4-1
transformers
6-1
naming conventions
8-8 to 8-9
Prefabricated wiring systems
8-17 to 8-18,
UPS
9-13
sub-main circuits
8-2
8-23
Relays
5-7, 5-8, 5-11, 5-12 to 5-13; 12-4, 12-5
underground
8-5
Pressure testing, cables
5-14 to 5-15;
Relevant apparatus, EMC Regulations
11-2
Single module UPS
9-8, 9-9
12-4, 12-5
to 11-3
Sintered plate cells
9-17
Presumption of conformity, EMC Directive
Reliability
8-19; 9-7 to 9-8
Site conditions see Environmental factors
11-3
see also Availability; Quality
Sizing
Primary windings, transformers
6-1, 6-3, 6-4,
Remote installations
10-12
cables
8-5, 8-13
6-5
Residual current breakers with overcurrent
generators
4-5 to 4-6
Prime movers
4-3, 4-4 to 4-6, 4-7,
protection (RCBOs)
7-4; 12-4
transformers
6-2
4-8, 4-9 to 4-10
Residual current devices (RCDs)
7-4; 10-14;
see also Space requirements
see also Generators
12-3 to 12-4, 12-7
Slip joint conduit systems
8-14
Private generation
4-3 to 4-11
Response mode, battery operation
9-20
Small power loads
see also Generators
Restricted protection
5-10, 5-13; 12-4
assessment
3-2
Prospective touch voltages
10-8
Retail stores
7-6 to 7-7
diversity
3-4, 3-5
Rewirable conduit
8-15
wiring
8-3, 8-9, 8-10, 8-17 to 8-18,
Protection
Ring circuits
8-2 to 8-3, 8-22
8-22
cables
8-5
high voltage systems
5-4 to 5-5, 5-12
Socket outlets
see also Cathodic protection; Earth fault
inspection and testing
12-2, 12-3, 12-7
diversity
3-4
protection; Fault protection; Ingress
low voltage systems
7-1
hospitals
7-5
protection (IP) rating; Lightning
Ring main units
5-3, 5-4, 5-7, 5-8, 5-9
inspection and testing
12-3, 12-6
protection; Overcurrent protection;
Ring mains see Ring circuits
substations
5-6
Restricted protection; Security; Shielding;
Risk assessment
2-3; 11-10, 11-12
Time graded protection; Unit protection
UPS
9-3, 9-26 to 9-27
electromagnetic compatibility
wiring
8-2, 8-3, 8-17 to 8-18
Protection types, hazardous areas
8-19
11-10, 11-12
Soils, earth electrodes
10-4, 10-5
to 8-20
Rotary transformers
6-7
Sound reduction see Noise and noise control
Protective conductor currents
10-3, 10-6,
Rotary UPS
9-4, 9-5 to 9-7, 9-11, 9-14,
Space requirements
10-7, 10-11
9-15, 9-16, 9-26
batteries
9-23
Protective conductors see Bonding conductors;
generators
4-7
Circuit protective conductors (CPCs);
Safety see Health and safety; Security;
low voltage switchgear
7-8 to 7-10
Earthing conductors
Warning notices
substations
4-2 to 4-3; 5-5
Protective devices
5-11; 7-1 to 7-2, 7-3 to
Scottish electricity suppliers
4-1
UPS
9-11, 9-23, 9-24
7-4, 7-7 to 7-8
Screw clamp terminals
8-11
see also Access; Sizing
inspection and testing
12-2, 12-4,
Sealed cells
9-18
Spare parts, generators
4-11
12-5, 12-6, 12-7
Secondary windings
6-1, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 6-6
Sprinkler system pumps
8-18
see also Circuit breakers; Discrimination;
Security
2-3; 4-3; 5-6, 5-16; 7-10
Spurs
8-2, 8-3
Fuse switches; Oil switches; Ring main
Self-contained battery systems
9-23
Standards
2-1
units
Sensors see Controls
batteries
9-21, 9-22
Protective earthed neutral (PEN) conductors
Separated extra-low voltage (SELV)
conductors
8-6
10-4, 10-12
systems
12-3
earthing
10-1
Protective extra-low voltage (PELV) systems
Separation
electromagnetic environments
11-2,
12-3
cables
8-2; 11-8, 11-9
11-4 to 11-6
Protective multiple earthing (PME)
10-3
circuits
8-2, 8-14; 12-3
high voltage systems
5-1
to 10-4, 10-12
conductors
12-5
load assessment
3-4
Provision and Use of Work Equipment
earth electrodes
10-4 to 10-5
transformers
6-3
Regulations 1998
2-1, 2-3
electricity supplies
8-19
see also BS; IEC; ISO 3
Public Electricity Supply Companies
10-4
electromagnetic compatibility
11-7,
Standby generators
4-3, 4-4, 4-7
Public entertainment buildings
8-19
11-8, 11-9
bypassing
7-8
Pumps, sprinkler systems
8-18
high voltage systems
5-5, 5-11
earthing
10-12
low voltage switchgear
7-2 to 7-3
environmental requirements
4-8
Quality
substations
4-3
fuels
4-8
electricity supply
4-2
UPS
9-23
harmonics
3-3
see also Availability; Electricity
Series on-line UPS
9-2, 9-5, 9-7
lifts
3-3
Safety, Quality and Continuity
Service pipes
8-5; 9-23; 10-5
loads
4-3; 7-5
Regulations 2002; Reliability
Shallow cycling operation, batteries
9-21
low voltage systems
7-4 to 7-5
Radial circuits
5-3 to 5-4, 5-12; 7-1; 8-3;
Shielding
11-6 to 11-8, 11-10
starting
4-5
12-2 to 12-3, 12-6
Short circuit breaking current
5-8
substations
5-2, 5-3
Radiation
11-8, 11-9 to 11-10, 11-11
Short circuit impedance
6-6 to 6-7; 8-5
testing
4-9
Raised floors
8-17, 8-22; 10-11
Short circuits
UPS
9-4, 9-11, 9-13, 9-14
Rated short time making current
5-8
flexible cables and cords
8-2
Standby operation, batteries
9-20, 9-21
Real power see Active power
generator testing
4-9
Standby ratings, prime movers
4-5
Reciprocating engines see Prime movers
HV cable sizing
8-13
Standby substations
5-2, 5-3
Rectifiers
4-2, 4-6
low voltage systems
7-7
Star connections
6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-5, 6-7; 7-2;
see also Uninterruptible power supplies
transformers
6-5, 6-6
10-12
Reference Documents (CENELEC)
2-3
UPS
9-3, 9-11
Starting
4-5, 4-6, 4-8, 4-10; 6-2; 7-2
Index
I-7
Static protection relays
5-11
Terminations, cables
8-10, 8-12 to 8-13
User training
4-10; 5-2, 5-5; 12-7
Static UPS
9-2, 9-3 to 9-5, 9-10, 9-11
Test certificates see Certification
Utilities Act 2000
2-1, 2-2
to 9-12, 9-15
Test instruments
5-17; 10-14; 12-3, 12-8
Steam turbines
4-4
Test voltages
5-15; 7-10; 12-3, 12-5
Valve-regulated lead-acid batteries
9-15,
Steel
10-5, 10-6; 11-7
Testing see Inspection and testing
9-17
see also Cable armouring; Metalwork
Theatres
8-19
Variable air volume (VAV) systems
3-5
Steel conduit
8-14, 8-21, 8-22
Thermosetting insulation
8-6
Variable speed drives
8-20
Steel trunking
8-13 to 8-14, 8-20, 8-21,
Thermosetting plastic cables
8-12 to 8-13
Variation allowance, voltage stability
6-6
8-22
Thrust blocks, busbars
8-17
Vector groups
6-5 to 6-6
Step-down and step-up transformers
6-1,
Thyristor UPS
9-3, 9-4, 9-5 to 9-6
Vented cells
9-18
6-3
Time graded protection
5-10, 5-11
Vented lead-acid batteries
9-15, 9-17
Storage, fuels
4-8; 9-11
see also High rupturing capacity (HRC)
Ventilation
Storage life, batteries
9-20
fuses; Inverse definite minimum time
load assessment
3-3
Stored energy generating systems
4-8
(IDMT) relays; Trip coils
substations
4-3; 5-6
Stress relief
8-12, 8-13
Time-limit fuses (TLFs)
5-8, 5-11, 5-12
transformers
6-4
Sub-mains
7-1; 8-2, 8-5, 8-9, 8-18 to
TN systems
10-2, 10-3 to 10-4, 10-9
UPS
9-11, 9-14, 9-15, 9-23, 9-25
8-19, 8-22
to 10-10, 10-12
see also Air conditioning; Cooling
Substations
4-2 to 4-3; 5-2, 5-3, 5-4,
Tools, generators
4-10 to 4-11
Vibration
4-8, 4-9, 4-10; 6-8; 9-23
5-5 to 5-6; 7-1
Total harmonic voltage distortion (THD)
9-4,
see also Noise and noise control
access
4-3; 5-2, 5-6, 5-16
9-7, 9-8, 9-9, 9-10 to 9-11
Visual inspection see Initial verification
documentation
5-16
see also Harmonics
Voltage bands
8-1 to 8-2
fire precautions
4-3; 5-18
Touch voltages
10-7 to 10-8, 10-9, 10-10 to
Voltage differences
6-1, 6-5, 6-7; 10-1
security
2-2, 2-3; 4-3; 5-6, 5-16
10-11
Voltage drops
3-3, 3-5; 4-6; 5-2; 8-5; 10-9
Supplementary equipotential bonding
Trace heating cables
8-6
see also Voltage stability
see Bonding
Training see User training
Voltage ratio see Voltage differences
Supply see Electricity supply
Transformers
6-1 to 6-8
Voltage stability
3-3, 3-5; 4-5, 4-6; 6-6
Switched mode power supplies
7-4, 7-10;
busbars
8-16
see also Uninterruptible power supplies;
9-1, 9-7
cables
6-5, 6-7; 8-10
Voltage drops
Switchgear
discrimination
5-11
Voltage system selection
4-6; 5-2
access
7-8 to 7-9; 12-2
earthing
6-7; 10-4, 10-11, 10-12
Voltage transformers
5-7
cables
5-15; 7-1, 7-8 to 7-9; 8-10,
fault currents
5-9, 5-10; 6-5
Voltages
8-18 to 8-19
harmonics
3-4; 6-2
cables
4-6; 5-2, 5-15; 8-4 to 8-5,
definition
7-1
heat generation
5-6; 6-2, 6-4, 6-6
8-8
earthing
10-4
high voltage systems
5-3, 5-6, 5-7 to
circuit breakers
5-8
high voltage systems
4-2; 5-3 to 5-9,
5-8, 5-12; 6-2
definitions
1-2; 8-1
5-10, 5-12, 5-17, 5-18; 12-4
inspection and testing
5-18; 6-8; 12-5
electricity supply and transmission
4-1
inspection and testing
4-9; 5-15; 12-2,
low voltage systems
6-2; 7-4
to 4-2; 5-1; 6-6
12-4, 12-5, 12-6, 12-7
maintenance
5-18
industrial buildings
4-2; 6-6; 7-5
low voltage systems
7-1 to 7-10
non-ionising radiation
11-8
Low Voltage Directive
2-3
maintenance
5-18; 7-9
substations
4-2
see also Extra-low voltages; Float voltage
substations
4-2, 4-3; 5-6; 7-1
temperature
6-6; 12-5
compensation; Harmonics; High voltage
transformers
5-7 to 5-8, 5-12; 6-5
UPS
9-1 to 9-2, 9-3, 9-12, 9-13
systems; Low voltage systems; Test
UPS
9-13, 9-23, 9-26
see also Autotransformers; Current
voltages; Touch voltages; Transformers;
see also Circuit breakers; Controls;
transformers; Ferro-resonant
Undervoltages
Oil switches
transformers; Voltage transformers
Switching
4-6; 5-5; 7-1
Transistorised UPS
9-3 to 9-5
Warning notices
Switchrooms
7-8 to 7-10; 8-19
Trenches see Cable trenches
high voltage systems
5-16, 5-17, 5-18
System-free battery installations
9-23
Trip coils
5-8, 5-11, 5-12, 5-13; 7-4
inspection and testing
5-15; 12-2, 12-6
Triport UPS
9-2, 9-11, 9-14
substations
2-2; 5-6
Taking into service, EMC Directive
11-3
Trunking
8-10, 8-13 to 8-14, 8-16 to
switchrooms
7-10
Tap-offs
8-16 to 8-17, 8-18
8-17, 8-21; 10-7; 11-8
see also Colour-coding; Identification
Tappings
6-7
see also Busbars; Ceiling trunking;
Water pipes see Pipes and pipework
Tariffs
4-2, 4-7
Plastic trunking; Steel trunking
Water-powered prime movers
4-4, 4-8
Telecommunications installations
4-3;
TT systems
10-2, 10-3
Water storage
4-8
8-2; 10-11; 11-6, 11-8
Tubular cell lead-acid batteries
9-16, 9-17
Wayleaves
4-3
Temperature
Turbines
4-3, 4-4, 4-7, 4-8
Wholesale electricity
4-2
batteries
9-19 to 9-20, 9-23
Type tests
4-9; 6-8; 7-10
Wind generators
4-4 to 4-5
cables
8-5, 8-6, 8-7, 8-8, 8-17
Winding losses
6-6
conductor testing
12-5, 12-6
Underfloor busbars
8-17
Windings
6-3, 6-4, 6-5 to 6-6, 6-7;
earthing equipment
10-4, 10-5 to
Underfloor heating cables
8-6
7-4; 9-5, 9-6
10-6
Underground cables see Buried cables
Windows, substations
5-6
prime movers
4-5
Undervoltages
7-1, 7-7; 12-2
Wiring Regulations see BS 7671
substations
5-6
Underwater cables
8-5
Wiring systems
8-1 to 8-24
transformers
6-6; 12-5
Uninterruptible power supplies
3-3; 4-5; 7-4;
Works tests
4-9
UPS
9-3, 9-14, 9-15, 9-23
9-1 to 9-27
see also Environmental factors; Heat
Unistrut systems
8-16
XLPE (cross-linked polyethylene) insulation
generation; Insulation
Unit loads
3-3, 3-5
8-6, 8-9
Temporary generating sets
4-4
Unit protection
5-5, 5-10, 5-13; 12-4
Terminals
6-5, 6-7; 8-10, 8-11;
Unrestricted protection
5-10, 5-13
Zigzag connections
6-5
12-2, 12-6
Useful power see Active power
Zinc
10-5; 11-7
see also Connections; Earthing terminals
User manuals see Documentation
Zone boxes
8-17 to 8-18


